Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26851 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
III. Otras Resoluciones
Consejería de Agricultura, Ganadería, Pesca y Soberanía Alimentaria
2566 Instituto Canario de Investigaciones Agrarias.- Resolución de 2 de julio de 2026,
del Secretario General, por la que se ordena la publicación del Convenio Específico
de Colaboración entre el Instituto Canario de Investigaciones Agrarias y el Cabildo
Insular de Tenerife para la realización del Proyecto “Raíces y Tubérculos menores
que fomentan la agrodiversidad y los servicios ecosistémicos (ROTATES)”.
De conformidad con lo dispuesto en el artículo 29 apartado 2 y 3 de la Ley 12/2014,
de 26 de diciembre, de transparencia y de acceso a la información pública, y en el artículo
20 apartado 1 del Decreto 11/2019, de 11 de febrero, por el que se regula la actividad
convencional y se crean y regulan el Registro General Electrónico de Convenios del Sector
Público de la Comunidad Autónoma y el Registro Electrónico de Órganos de Cooperación
de la Administración Pública de la Comunidad Autónoma de Canarias, los convenios que
se celebren por los órganos de la Administración pública de la Comunidad Autónoma de
Canarias y de los organismos y entidades vinculadas o dependientes de la misma, con otras
administraciones públicas y otros sujetos, públicos o privados, así como las modificaciones,
prórrogas y anexos o adendas a los mismos, deberán publicarse en el Boletín Oficial de
Canarias dentro de los veinte días siguientes a su firma.
En cumplimiento de los referidos preceptos y con la finalidad de facilitar el público
conocimiento de los compromisos asumidos en el ámbito de la actividad convencional del
sector público autonómico,
RESUELVO:
Ordenar la publicación en el Boletín Oficial de Canarias del Convenio Específico de
Cooperación entre el Instituto Canario de Investigaciones Agrarias y Excmo. Cabildo Insular
de Tenerife para la realización del Proyecto “raíces y tubérculos menores que fomentan la
agrodiversidad y los servicios ecosistémicos (ROTATES)”, cuyo texto se acompaña como
anexo.
Santa Cruz de Tenerife, a 2 de julio de 2026.- El Secretario General, Jesús Manuel
García Benítez.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26852 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
ANEXO
CONVENIO ESPECÍFICO DE COOPERACIÓN ENTRE EL INSTITUTO CANARIO
DE INVESTIGACIONES AGRARIAS Y EXCMO. CABILDO INSULAR DE TENERIFE
PARA LA REALIZACIÓN DEL PROYECTO “RAÍCES Y TUBÉRCULOS MENORES
QUE FOMENTAN LA AGRODIVERSIDAD Y LOS SERVICIOS ECOSISTÉMICOS
(ROTATES)”.
REUNIDOS
De una parte, Dña. Janira Gutiérrez Peraza, en calidad de Presidenta del Instituto
Canario de Investigaciones Agrarias, con CIF Q8850003H (en adelante ICIA), con
domicilio en Carretera del Boquerón, s/n, Valle de Guerra, 38270 - La Laguna, actuando
en nombre y representación de la misma, en virtud del Decreto 324/2023, de 1 de agosto,
por el que se dispone su nombramiento, y conforme a las atribuciones que le confiere el
artículo 7, letra c), de la Ley 4/1995, de 27 de marzo, de creación del Instituto Canario de
Investigaciones Agrarias y del Consejo Asesor de Investigaciones Agrarias, y los artículos
31 y 32 del Decreto 77/2002, de 17 de junio, por el que se aprueba el Reglamento de dicho
Instituto.
De otra parte, la Excma. Sra. Dña. Rosa Elena Dávila Mamely, con DNI ***7951**,
en calidad de Presidenta del Excmo. Cabildo Insular de Tenerife (en adelante ECIT),
domiciliado a estos efectos en el Ed. del Palacio Insular, Plaza de España, n.º 1, de Santa
Cruz de Tenerife; en calidad de Presidenta (se adjunta certificado de D. Domingo Jesús
Hernández Hernández, Secretario General del Pleno del Excmo. Cabildo Insular de
Tenerife).
En la representación que ostentan, las partes se reconocen capacidad jurídica y de obrar
necesaria para el otorgamiento y formalización del presente Convenio de Cooperación, a
cuyos efectos,
EXPONEN
Primero.- El ICIA es un Organismo Autónomo de carácter administrativo de la
Comunidad Autónoma de Canarias, que ostenta personalidad jurídica y patrimonio propios
y plena capacidad de obrar para el cumplimiento de sus fines, adscrito a la Consejería
competente en materia de Agricultura.
De conformidad con el artículo 3 de la Ley 4/1995, de 27 de marzo, de Creación del
Instituto Canario de Investigaciones Agrarias y del Consejo Asesor de Investigaciones
Agrarias, tiene entre sus fines los de programación, ejecución y seguimiento de las
actividades de investigación y el desarrollo y transferencia de tecnologías agrarias en el
ámbito de la Comunidad Autónoma de Canarias, así como aquellos otros que en materia de
investigación y desarrollo tecnológico agrarios le atribuyan los órganos competentes de la
Administración Pública de la Comunidad Autónoma de Canarias.
En atención a lo dispuesto en el artículo 31 del Reglamento del Instituto Canario de
Investigaciones Agrarias, aprobado por Decreto 77/2002, de 17 de junio, “El ICIA podrá
establecer relaciones de colaboración con las universidades, organismos públicos de
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26853 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
investigación, cabildos insulares y empresas públicas o privadas para el mejor desarrollo
de sus funciones, sin detrimento de sus competencias, obligaciones y actuaciones en el
marco del Plan Sectorial Agrario y Alimentario. Dichas relaciones se instrumentalizarán a
través de los correspondientes contratos o convenios de colaboración y cooperación, que
serán suscritos por el Presidente del ICIA.
Segundo.- El Cabildo de Tenerife, como Corporación Local Territorial, tiene atribuido
el gobierno, la administración y representación de cada isla y goza de plena autonomía
para el ejercicio de sus competencias propias que corresponden a las islas y las que le
sean delegadas por otras administraciones públicas de acuerdo con lo establecido en la legislación
de régimen local y en su legislación específica. El Cabildo Insular de Tenerife es una Entidad
Local, conforme a la Constitución; la Ley 7/1985, de 2 de abril, Reguladora de las Bases del
Régimen Local, establece en su artículo 41, apartado 1, que los Cabildos Insulares, como
órganos de gobierno, administración y representación de cada isla, se rigen por las normas
contenidas en la disposición adicional decimocuarta de dicha ley y, supletoriamente, por
las normas que regulan la organización y funcionamiento de las Diputaciones, asumiendo
las competencias de estas, sin perjuicio de lo dispuesto en el Estatuto de Autonomía de
Canarias. La legislación específica viene constituida, fundamentalmente por la Ley 8/2015,
de 1 de abril, de cabildos insulares.
Tercero.- En base a la Ley 14/2011, de 1 de junio, de la Ciencia, la Tecnología y la
Innovación, en su artículo 34.1 establece “ Los agentes públicos de financiación o ejecución
del Sistema Español de Ciencia, Tecnología e Innovación, incluidas las Administraciones
Públicas, las universidades públicas, los organismos públicos de investigación de la
Administración General del Estado, los consorcios y fundaciones participadas por las
administraciones públicas, los organismos de investigación de otras administraciones
públicas, y los centros e instituciones del Sistema Nacional de Salud, podrán suscribir
convenios sujetos al derecho administrativo. Podrán celebrar estos convenios los propios
agentes públicos entre sí, o con agentes privados que realicen actividades de investigación
científica y técnica, nacionales, supranacionales o extranjeros, para la realización conjunta
de las siguientes actividades:
a) Proyectos y actuaciones de investigación científica, desarrollo e innovación.
b) Creación o financiación de centros, institutos, consorcios o unidades de investigación,
e infraestructuras científicas.
c) Financiación de proyectos científico-técnicos singulares.
d) Formación de personal científico y técnico.
e) Divulgación científica y tecnológica.
f) Uso compartido de inmuebles, de instalaciones y de medios materiales para el
desarrollo de actividades de investigación científica, desarrollo e innovación”.
Cuarto.- La Resolución de 23 de abril de 2025, de la Presidenta del Instituto Canario de
Investigaciones Agrarias por la que se publica en el Boletín Oficial de Canarias el Protocolo
general de actuación entre el Excmo. Cabildo Insular de Tenerife y el Instituto Canario
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26854 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
de Investigaciones Agrarias para el desarrollo de actividades científico-técnicas en el área
de investigación, extensión y capacitación agraria así como en el ámbito de los recursos
genéticos agrarios, por el que se regulan las actuaciones conjuntas a desarrollar por el ICIA
y el ECIT, las cuales se ejecutarán mediante convenios específicos de colaboración.
Quinto.- La colaboración entre el ICIA y el Cabildo de Tenerife surge en el ámbito
del proyecto de investigación ROTATES, MINOR ROOTS AND TUBERS FOSTERING
AGROBIODIVERSITY AND ECOSYSTEM SERVICES (ROTATES-Raíces y tubérculos
menores que fomentan la agrobiodiversidad y los servicios ecosistémicos) concedido en
el marco de los proyectos europeos HORIZON en la convocatoria HORIZON-CL6-2024-
BIODIV-02-3-two-stage [Promoting minor crops in farming systems] con duración desde
el 1 de julio de 2025 al 30 de junio de 2029.
ROTATES tiene como objetivo mejorar de manera sostenible la agrobiodiversidad y
los servicios ecosistémicos mediante la introducción y promoción de cultivos de raíces y
tubérculos con alto contenido de almidón, que actualmente se consideran cultivos menores y
están infrautilizados en Europa, a pesar del creciente interés por parte de los consumidores.
Las raíces y tubérculos menores ricos en almidón (MRT), como la batata (Ipomoea batatas),
el ñame (Dioscorea spp.), la yuca (Manihot esculenta) y el taro (Colocasia esculenta), se
cultivan tradicionalmente en regiones tropicales.
Este proyecto tiene alto interés para las partes, pues el ICIA está muy interesado en
todos aquellos proyectos que pongan de manifiesto la potencialidad de las variedades
locales de cultivos tradicionales canarios, como son en este caso la batata y el ñame,
permitiéndole este proyecto valorizar esta riqueza a nivel internacional. Para el Cabildo
de Tenerife implica un beneficio directo, ya que le permitirá evaluar parte de su material
en las diferentes áreas de trabajo del proyecto, arrojando una valiosa información para la
sostenibilidad del cultivo en la isla. Con este fin el Cabildo suministrará el material vegetal
necesario procedente del Centro de Conservación de la Biodiversidad Agrícola de Tenerife,
además de aportar su personal para asegurar hacerlo en las mejores condiciones.
Sexto.- Como información complementaria a este Convenio se adjunta memoria del
proyecto de investigación ROTATES. El Acuerdo de Transferencia de Material (ATM) se
hará de acuerdo a la normativa vigente entre el organismo donante y el receptor.
Séptimo.- Se consideran criterios adecuados para suscribir el presente Convenio
Específico el interés científico previsible derivado de la posible colaboración y cualquier
otro que contribuya a aportar valor a la actividad científica dentro del sector agrario en
Canarias.
Octavo.- No se consideran adecuadas otras posibles alternativas por cuanto que el
material vegetal necesario para desarrollar el proyecto se encuentra custodiado por el
Cabildo de Tenerife (a través del Centro de Conservación de la Biodiversidad Agrícola
de Tenerife, CCBAT), firmante del Convenio. El convenio es un instrumento que permite
llevar a cabo estas actividades de una forma ágil, en condiciones de igualdad entre las
partes y respetando los principios de transparencia y accesibilidad.
El Convenio que se pretende firmar y la actividad amparada por el mismo no tiene
naturaleza contractual por cuanto que se persigue la consecución de un fin común de
interés público y no existe el elemento de contraprestación económica. El mismo se ajusta
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26855 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
a las previsiones establecidas en la Ley 40/2015, de 1 de octubre, de Régimen Jurídico
del Sector Público, así como a las especialidades contenidas en la legislación autonómica
de Canarias, contenidas en el Decreto 11/2019, de 11 de febrero, por el que se regula la
actividad convencional y se crean y regulan el Registro General Electrónico de Convenios
del Sector Público de la Comunidad Autónoma y el Registro Electrónico de Órganos de
Cooperación de la Administración Pública de la Comunidad Autónoma de Canarias.
Noveno.- Por parte de la Comisión Científica del ICIA se ha informado de forma
favorable la tramitación del Convenio de Cooperación entre el ICIA y el Cabildo de
Tenerife, a la vista del interés científico valorado.
Por su parte, el Cabildo de Tenerife con fecha 26 de marzo de 2025 aprobó en Consejo
de Gobierno Insular un protocolo general de actuación entre el Cabildo Insular de Tenerife y
el Instituto Canario de Investigaciones Agrarias para el desarrollo de actividades científico-
técnicas en el área de investigación, extensión y capacitación agrarias, así como en el
ámbito de los recursos fitogenéticos agrarios. En este protocolo se establece un marco que
regula las actuaciones conjuntas a desarrollar por el ICIA y el ECIT, las cuales se ejecutarán
mediante convenios específicos de colaboración.
Por todo ello, las partes firmantes manifiestan su voluntad de formalizar el presente
Convenio Específico de Cooperación con arreglo a las siguientes,
CLÁUSULAS
Primera.- Objeto y objetivos del Convenio.
En términos generales, el presente Convenio tiene por objeto regular la cooperación y
colaboración entre el ICIA y el Cabildo de Tenerife, con el fin de establecer un marco de
actuación conjunta en el proyecto de investigación “ROTATES” (101181532), financiado
por el programa HORIZON de la Comisión Europea, en el que el ICIA participa como
entidad socia y donde mediará para la distribución y correcta utilización del material vegetal
suministrado de las colecciones de la entidad para ser evaluado durante la realización del
proyecto.
Más concretamente, la participación del ICIA consiste en la intermediación entre los
Bancos canarios y el resto de socios de forma que puedan ser vinculados formalmente al
proyecto ROTATES. Sus funciones serán principalmente la de recibir el material vegetal por
parte de los Bancos y tramitar su llegada a los socios que participan en el paquete de trabajo
WP3, WP4, WP5 del proyecto.
Las actividades que se realizarán en el proyecto se engloban en diferentes paquetes de
trabajo (Ver Anexo 1), pero en resumen las acciones más importantes se llevaran a cabo en:
a) Paquete de trabajo 3 (WP3): estudiar la diversidad del germoplasma y las estrategias
de saneamiento para facilitar el acceso a MRT, y fomentar iniciativas de mejora genética
innovadoras.
• Identificar nuevos materiales MRT y caracteres valiosos para los programas de mejora
genética, así como aumentar la adaptación del cultivo a las condiciones agroecológicas, las
limitaciones climáticas y la calidad de la producción.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26856 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
• Optimizar la selección de híbridos MRT mediante la identificación y combinación de
alelos favorable, mejorando así la eficiencia y precisión del proceso de mejora genética
• Diseñar enfoques integrados de sistema para eliminar y controlar patógenos
transmitidos por semilla.
b) Paquete de trabajo 4 (WP4): Co-construcción de nuevas prácticas de manejo
agroecológico basadas en cultivos MRT.
• Estudio de los nuevos manejos basados en cultivos MRT frente a diferentes factores
externos (sequía, biocontrol, deforestación).
• Monitoreo y evaluación de los servicios ecosistémicos respaldados por la in-tegración
de cultivos MRT en los sistemas agrícolas.
c) Paquete de trabajo 5 (WP5): Aprovechar el potencial de los cultivos MRT como
alimento humano y animal.
• Explotar el potencial de los cultivos MRT para alimentación humana.
• Explotar el potencial de los cultivos MRT como forraje.
Segunda.- Actuaciones necesarias.
El efectivo cumplimiento del Convenio queda reflejado en el siguiente documento
anexo al mismo:
- Memoria del proyecto de investigación - Anexo I. En este anexo se recoge todo el
protocolo a desarrollar por el consorcio en el proyecto de investigación, y en especial lo
referido a las Tareas:
3.1: Recolección y caracterización de germoplasma para la conservación de cultivos
MRT raros y de élite
3.2: Implementación de estudios avanzados de fenotipado y genética para la mejora
vegetal.
5.3: Procesamiento para la alimentación animal y evaluación de la calidad de los
productos ganaderos derivados
Tercera.- Obligaciones de las partes.
a) Para la ejecución del presente Convenio, el ICIA queda obligado a:
1.- Determinar a partir de las consultas con el Banco las variedades de batata y taro
(denominado como ñame en Canarias) que se utilizarán en el proyecto, para su elección de
mutuo acuerdo.
2.- Establecer el tipo de material vegetal (estacas) y la cantidad de cada una que se
enviarán para cada especie.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26857 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
3.- Gestionar administrativamente el envío del material vegetal en coordinación con el
Servicio de Sanidad Vegetal de la Comunidad Autónoma de Canarias.
4.- El punto 3 implica cumplir con los requisitos fitosanitarios establecidos por el país
de destino (Portugal) en cuanto a la certificación de ausencia de plagas y enfermedades y,
en su caso, llevar a cabo los análisis oportunos para descartarlas.
5.- Ejecutar el envío del material vegetal en tiempo y forma para garantizar en la medida
de lo posible su viabilidad al llegar a destino.
6.- Cultivar las variedades de batata previamente seleccionadas, evaluar su procesamiento
como alimento animal y estudiar su inclusión en dietas ganaderas y su efecto en la calidad
de las producciones del ganado aviar y caprino.
7.- Mantener puntualmente informado al Banco de todo el proceso y de los resultados
obtenidos en las distintas actividades a través de los interlocutores designados.
b) Por su parte, el Cabildo Insular de Tenerife, queda obligado a:
1.- Entregar al ICIA el material vegetal en el momento, la cantidad y forma acordado
previamente. El Cabildo Insular de Tenerife entregará el material vegetal en la medida de lo
posible, asegurándose en primer lugar poder garantizar la conservación en el Banco, para lo
que mantendrá en todo momento una cantidad suficiente en sus colecciones.
2.- Facilitar la información disponible de cada variedad de batata y taro (ñame en
Canarias) que pueda ser relevante para el proyecto.
3.- En la medida de lo posible, facilitar nuevo material en el caso de que una parte de él
no llegue en condiciones a destino.
4.- Cumplimentar el acuerdo de transferencia de material (ATM) entre los Bancos de
Germoplasma.
Cuarta.- Plazo de vigencia.
El Convenio surtirá efectos desde la fecha de la firma del mismo y tendrá una vigencia
de cuatro años, pudiendo ser prorrogada, si se solicita por una o ambas partes con un mes
de antelación a la finalización de la vigencia de la misma.
Quinta.- Aspectos económicos.
No existen gastos ni aportaciones económicas de las partes para la ejecución del
proyecto. Los fondos necesarios para la realización de las tareas de coordinación, gestión y
desarrollo del proyecto provienen del programa HORIZON de la Comisión Europea, en el
que el ICIA participa como entidad socia.
Por lo tanto, la financiación de los gastos para la ejecución del presente Convenio no
tendrá repercusión económica para el Cabildo de Tenerife.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26858 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Sexta.- Modificación del Convenio.
Para la modificación del Convenio en cualquiera de sus condiciones, se requerirá
propuesta razonada de la Comisión de Seguimiento, de oficio o bien a petición de cualquiera
de las partes firmantes, siendo necesario el acuerdo unánime de ambas. Las modificaciones
particulares al presente Convenio se reflejarán en la correspondiente adenda al mismo.
Séptima.- Mecanismos de seguimiento, vigilancia y control de la ejecución del
Convenio. la Comisión de Seguimiento: composición.
Para el seguimiento, planificación y control de las acciones derivadas del presente
Convenio, así como resolver las dudas que puedan plantearse en la interpretación del
mismo, se crea una Comisión de Seguimiento paritaria compuesta por al menos dos
miembros designados por cada una de las partes.
A dicha Comisión podrán incorporarse otros miembros que sean designados por
acuerdo de las partes, así como otras personas con funciones de carácter consultivo, estas
últimas con voz, pero sin voto.
El nombramiento de esta Comisión se realizará en el mes siguiente a la firma del
convenio y se reunirá al menos dos veces al año y cuantas veces sean necesarias en función
del buen desarrollo de este convenio. Las reuniones se convocarán con antelación mínima
de una semana, por escrito, por cualquiera de las partes.
Esta Comisión estará encargada de resolver por consenso las incidencias de
interpretación y ejecución que pudieran plantearse con ocasión del cumplimiento del
convenio y desarrollará las actuaciones que se contienen en el mismo. En concreto, serán
funciones de la Comisión de Seguimiento las Siguientes:
- Vigilancia y control del cumplimiento de las actuaciones previstas
- Dictar las instrucciones que sean precisas para asegurar su realización
- Informar a las partes de las incidencias acaecidas durante la ejecución del Convenio.
- Emisión de informe anual para evaluar la conveniencia de continuar con la relación
pactada, en atención a los siguientes aspectos:
• Valoración de los resultados obtenidos de acuerdo con el cronograma del trabajo
establecido y documentación aportada por los participantes. Será preciso haber alcanzado,
al menos un 80% de los resultados previstos, salvo que se establezca otro porcentaje por las
partes firmante al comienzo de la vigencia del Convenio o se den causas de fuerza mayor
aceptadas por la propia Comisión.
Para la emisión del informe anual y el informe final, la Comisión de Seguimiento
se apoyará en los documentos presentados por las entidades y el personal investigador
directamente adscrito al proyecto, que consistirán básicamente en:
- Planificación del trabajo inicial.
- Informes de seguimiento con periodicidad semestral.
- Informe final, con el resultado y conclusiones definitivas del proyecto.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26859 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Con el objetivo de que la Comisión pueda ejercer sus labores de seguimiento, deberá
facilitarse a la misma por las partes, cuando así lo requiera, la documentación necesaria
para tal fin.
Octava.- Confidencialidad de la información.
A los efectos del presente Convenio, se entenderá por Información Confidencial,
toda aquella información y toda aquella documentación de naturaleza técnica o de
cualquier otra naturaleza que a continuación se relaciona, y que incluye, -sin que esta
lista signifique limitación alguna- la siguiente: “know how”, patentes, marcas, diseños,
fórmulas, procesos, resultados de investigaciones, planos, fotografías, informes, listados de
clientes, de proveedores, de fabricantes, datos sobre precios, ideas, invenciones o estudios,
hardware, componentes, aplicaciones informáticas, que se encuentre claramente clasificada
como confidencial y que sea transmitida por cualquier soporte tanto escrito, informático o
electrónico como oral.
Con la finalidad de identificar la información como confidencial, las partes acuerdan
marcar el conocimiento secreto con la palabra “confidencial”.
En los supuestos en los que la información haya sido divulgada de forma oral o visual,
será considerada confidencial siempre que sea identificada como tal por el propietario
cuando se revela y posteriormente se proceda a su trascripción en soporte legible siendo
marcada con el sello de “confidencial” en el plazo de treinta (30) días de su transmisión
oral o visual.
A efectos de este Convenio no se considerará información confidencial aquella que:
a) Sea o se convierta en dominio público por alguna causa que no sea producida por
vulneración de las estipulaciones contenidas en el presente Convenio.
b) Sea conocida por la contraparte como consecuencia de la transmisión de esa
información por un tercero ajeno al presente Convenio, con legitimación suficiente para
su transmisión libre y sin estar sujeto a limitaciones derivadas de previos acuerdos de
confidencialidad.
c) La Receptora poseyera o conociera antes de recibirla de la parte Transmisora sin
obligación alguna de mantener su confidencialidad, siempre que notifique este hecho a la
otra parte con carácter previo.
Las partes garantizan ser titulares de la información confidencial a intercambiar
ostentando la plena disposición sobre la misma.
Respecto aquella información confidencial a la que tengan acceso, las partes se obligan
mutuamente a:
a) No utilizar la información confidencial para otro propósito distinto que el establecido
en este Convenio, no pudiendo ser utilizada, directa o indirectamente para beneficio propio
ni de terceros.
b) No revelar la información confidencial a terceros o a sus empleados, colaboradores
o subcontratistas, con excepción de aquellos empleados o colaboradores que necesiten
conocer la información para desarrollar el objeto de este Convenio.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26860 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
c) Garantizar y responder en todo caso del cumplimiento efectivo por parte del personal y
colaboradores de la Receptora de las obligaciones que se derivan del presente Convenio y
de los daños causados de forma directa o indirecta por la vulneración del secreto por parte
de aquel a quien la Receptora o las personas por las que este responde hayan revelado la
información en contra de lo previsto en este Convenio.
d) Adoptar las medidas de seguridad de tipo organizativo, personal o técnico necesarias
para salvaguardar la integridad y confidencialidad de la información facilitada por la Transmisora,
así como para evitar accesos no autorizados a la misma, garantizando el mismo grado de
diligencia que utilizan en el manejo de su propia documentación confidencial.
e) Cualquier uso de la información diferente de las expresamente fijadas en las
estipulaciones contenidas en el presente Convenio, deberá previamente notificarse
expresamente y por escrito a la parte Transmisora para su aceptación, sin que en ningún
caso la falta de comunicación pueda ser considerada como aceptación.
f) No disponer ni hacer uso de la información confidencial después de la extinción o
resolución anticipada de este Convenio, procediendo a su devolución inmediata ante el
requerimiento de la parte Transmisora y en su caso a la destrucción de todo aquello que no
pueda ser devuelto, sin dejar ningún soporte sea cual sea el mismo con toda o parte de la
citada información confidencial.
Novena.- Derechos de los resultados, propiedad intelectual e industrial.
Los derechos de propiedad intelectual o industrial (DPI) preexistentes a la firma del
Convenio pertenecerán a la parte que los aporte para la realización de actividades conjuntas.
Se considerarán resultados del proyecto de I+D+i aquella información que haya sido
identificada como resultado de la actividad objeto de este acuerdo. Cada parte seguirá
siendo propietaria de los conocimientos previos aportados. No se entienden cedidos a la
otra parte, en virtud del presente acuerdo, ninguno de los conocimientos previos.
La memoria del proyecto en su punto 2.2.2 “Key results-protecion and exploitation,
en el apartado KER2. New MRT genetic resources in genebanks, dispone que “El material
genético permanecerá bajo la propiedad del país donde se ha colectado”
En concreto, el material vegetal cedido por el Cabildo de Tenerife, seguirá siendo
propiedad del mismo, no pudiendo registrarse ninguna de estas variedades como resultado
de la ejecución del proyecto de I+D+i.
La información generada a lo largo de este Convenio es propiedad de ambas partes
y será de plena disponibilidad de ambas organizaciones. Su utilización por ambas partes
precisará de comunicación previa entre ellas, comprometiéndose a solicitar por escrito
cualquier uso que se vaya a hacer de la misma ante la Comisión de Seguimiento, que deberá
obtener respuesta en el plazo máximo de treinta días. Transcurrido dicho plazo sin obtener
respuesta, se entenderá que el silencio es la tácita autorización para su difusión.
Cuando las partes deseen utilizar los resultados parciales o finales, en parte o en su
totalidad, deberán reconocer y hacer constar la participación del personal que ha intervenido
en este Convenio, así como entidad u Organismo de pertenencia. Se deberá informar del
resultado de esta divulgación.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26861 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
En caso de que alguna de las partes modifique los resultados, finales o parciales,
o pretenda utilizarlos para un fin diferente al previsto se comunicará a la otra parte
interviniente, quien se guarda la potestad de solicitar que se excluya su nombre de esa
publicación, registro, etc.
Dado el carácter de entidad pública del Instituto Canario de investigación Agraria
(ICIA) y de acuerdo al artículo 37 de la Ley 14/2011, de 1 de junio, de la Ciencia, la
Tecnología y la Innovación, al menos una parte general de los ensayos ha de divulgarse,
procurando que estas publicaciones científicas o técnicas resultantes de los trabajos, total
o parcialmente estén disponible en acceso abierto. Siempre se mencionará el nombre de
el/la o los investigadores o técnicos participantes y las entidades a las que pertenecen. El
contenido de estas será aprobado por la Comisión de Seguimiento.
Décima.- Incumplimientos: consecuencias y criterios para determinar indemnización.
10.1. Régimen de Incumplimiento.
El incumplimiento de las obligaciones y compromisos asumidos por cada una de
las partes en virtud de este Convenio, recogidos principalmente en sus cláusulas tercera
(Obligaciones), octava (Confidencialidad) y novena (Propiedad Intelectual e Industrial),
podrá dar lugar a la resolución del mismo, de conformidad con lo establecido en el artículo
51.2.c) de la Ley 40/2015, de 1 de octubre, de Régimen Jurídico del Sector Público (LRJSP),
y dará lugar, en su caso, a la indemnización por los daños y perjuicios causados.
10.2. Incumplimientos leves.
1. Se considerará incumplimiento leve el cumplimiento defectuoso o extemporáneo de
aquellas obligaciones que no impidan la consecución del objeto del Convenio y puedan
ser subsanadas, tales como el retraso no reiterado e inferior a quince (15) días hábiles
en el cumplimiento de las obligaciones de información, o la omisión de formalidades
administrativas fácilmente subsanables.
2. En caso de incumplimiento leve, la Comisión de Seguimiento (cláusula séptima), a
instancia de la parte cumplidora, requerirá formalmente a la parte incumplidora para que
subsane su obligación en un plazo máximo de quince (15) días hábiles.
3. La reiteración de tres (3) incumplimientos leves, habiendo mediado requerimiento de
subsanación, será considerada un incumplimiento grave a todos los efectos.
10.3. Incumplimientos graves.
1. Se considerará incumplimiento grave, que facultará a la parte cumplidora para instar
la resolución del Convenio, cualquiera de las siguientes causas:
a) El incumplimiento de las obligaciones que, por su carácter esencial, impidan o
dificulten gravemente la consecución del objeto del Convenio, definido en la cláusula
primera.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26862 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
b) Específicamente, se considerarán incumplimientos graves:
I. Por parte del Cabildo Insular de Tenerife: la negativa injustificada, el retraso reiterado
o el incumplimiento manifiesto de su obligación principal de entregar el material vegetal en
las condiciones pactadas (cláusula tercera), así como la no cumplimentación del Acuerdo
de Transferencia de Material (ATM) si esto impide la ejecución del proyecto.
II. Por parte del ICIA: el incumplimiento de las obligaciones de gestión fitosanitaria
y envío que, por negligencia acreditada, resulte en la pérdida de viabilidad, destrucción
o imposibilidad legal de utilizar el material (cláusula tercera); el uso del material vegetal
para fines distintos a los previstos en este Convenio (cláusula primera); o la vulneración de
los derechos de propiedad del Cabildo sobre dicho material, en los términos de la cláusula
novena.
c) La vulneración sustancial de las obligaciones de confidencialidad (cláusula octava)
o de propiedad intelectual e industrial (cláusula novena) que irrogue un perjuicio grave y
demostrable a la otra parte.
d) La reiteración de incumplimientos leves, conforme al apartado 10.2.3
e) La negativa injustificada a cumplir con las instrucciones y acuerdos válidamente
adoptados por la Comisión de Seguimiento en el ejercicio de sus funciones.
f) La concurrencia de causas de fuerza mayor, definidas en el apartado 10.5, que se
prolonguen por un tiempo superior a seis (6) meses e impidan de forma irreversible la
ejecución del proyecto.
10.4. Consecuencias del incumplimiento grave y criterios de indemnización.
1. El incumplimiento grave de las obligaciones y compromisos por una de las partes
facultará a la parte cumplidora para instar la resolución del Convenio.
2. La resolución del Convenio por incumplimiento culpable de una de las partes
conllevará la obligación de esta de indemnizar a la otra parte por los daños y perjuicios
fehacientemente acreditados que dicho incumplimiento haya ocasionado.
3. Los criterios para determinar la indemnización, en cumplimiento del artículo 49.e) de
la LRJSP, se basarán en los principios de responsabilidad patrimonial del sector público,
debiendo cubrir tanto el daño emergente como el lucro cesante. A estos efectos, se
considerarán:
a) El daño emergente: los costes directos, reales y acreditados en que la parte cumplidora
haya incurrido como consecuencia directa del incumplimiento (ej. costes de reposición del
material vegetal, gastos de gestión administrativa o de transporte que devengan inútiles).
b) El lucro cesante: específicamente, los fondos provenientes del proyecto HORIZON
(referidos en la cláusula quinta) que la parte cumplidora se vea obligada a reintegrar a la
Comisión Europea, o que deje de percibir, como consecuencia directa y demostrable del
incumplimiento esencial de la otra parte.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26863 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
4. La determinación de la existencia del incumplimiento y, en su caso, de la cuantía
de la indemnización correspondiente se acordará, en primera instancia, en el seno de la
Comisión de Seguimiento, como parte del proceso de liquidación del convenio previsto en
el artículo 52 de la LRJSP. En caso de desacuerdo, las partes se someterán a la Jurisdicción
Contencioso-administrativa, conforme a la cláusula décimo quinta.
5. Adicionalmente, se podrá determinar por la parte perjudicada la prohibición a la
parte incumplidora de suscribir nuevos convenios con aquella durante un plazo de hasta
dos (2) años.
10.5. Fuerza mayor.
1. Las causas de fuerza mayor eximirán de responsabilidad por el incumplimiento, pero
no de la obligación de comunicar la causa a la otra parte interesada, a través de la Comisión
de Seguimiento, a la mayor brevedad posible.
2. Se entiende como causa de fuerza mayor incendios, robos o destrozo del ensayo,
situaciones fitosanitarias ajenas a los participantes, causas físicas y meteorológicas adversas
o situaciones epidemiológicas declaradas por la Administración según sus competencias,
así como otros de similar gravedad.
3. Si la causa de fuerza mayor impidiese el cumplimiento del objeto del convenio de
forma definitiva o por un plazo superior a seis (6) meses, cualquiera de las partes podrá
proponer a la Comisión de Seguimiento la extinción del convenio por imposibilidad
sobrevenida de cumplimiento (artículo 51.2.b) de la LRJSP), procediéndose a la liquidación
de las actuaciones realizadas hasta la fecha sin que proceda indemnización por esta causa.
Decimoprimera.- Causas de extinción.
El Convenio se extinguirá por el cumplimiento del plazo de vigencia y sus eventuales
prórrogas. Igualmente podrá resolverse por cualquiera de las causas establecidas en el
artículo 51 de la Ley 40/2015 de 1 de octubre, de Régimen Jurídico del Sector Público.
Las partes se comprometen a resolver de manera amistosa en el seno de la Comisión
de Seguimiento cualquier desacuerdo que pudiera surgir en el desarrollo del presente
Convenio, bien entendiendo que con anterioridad se aplicarán los criterios de buena fe y
voluntad de llegar a acuerdos.
Los efectos de la extinción serán los previstos en el artículo 52 de la Ley 40/2015, de
1 de octubre, de Régimen Jurídico del Sector Público.
Decimosegunda.- Protección de datos de carácter personal.
Será de aplicación lo establecido en el Reglamento (UE) 2016/679 del Parlamento
Europeo y del Consejo, de 27 de abril de 2016, relativo a la protección de las personas
físicas en lo que respecta al tratamiento de datos personales y a la libre circulación de estos
datos (Reglamento General de Protección de Datos) y la Ley Orgánica 3/2018, de 5 de
diciembre, de Protección de Datos Personales y garantía de los derechos digitales. Las
partes firmantes del presente Convenio se comprometen a tratar de manera confidencial
los datos personales de los participantes, que le sean facilitados en el marco de la relación
mantenida, a tratarlos de acuerdo con la normativa de protección de datos personales y a
utilizarlos, exclusivamente, con las anteriores finalidades.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26864 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Asimismo, el deber de secreto y las limitaciones en su uso marcadas por la normativa
de aplicación serán aplicables a cualquier información a la que se tenga acceso en la
realización de actividades objeto de este Convenio, salvo aquella información que deba ser
pública según lo establecido en la Ley 19/2013, de 9 de diciembre, de transparencia, acceso
a la información pública y buen gobierno.
En el caso de cesión de datos personales, deberá firmarse un contrato entre el responsable y
el encargado del tratamiento.
Decimotercera.- Publicación e inscripción registral del Convenio.
De conformidad con lo dispuesto en el artículo 29.2 de la Ley 12/2014, de 26 de
diciembre, de transparencia y de acceso a la información pública, y en el artículo 20 del
Decreto 11/2019, los convenios que se celebren por los órganos de la Administración
Pública de la Comunidad Autónoma de Canarias y de los organismos y entidades vinculadas
o dependientes de la misma, con otras administraciones públicas y otros sujetos, públicos o
privados, así como las modificaciones, prórrogas y anexos o adendas a los mismos, deberán
publicarse, en el Boletín Oficial de Canarias, dentro de los veinte días siguientes a su firma.
Asimismo, se deberá proceder a su inscripción registral en los términos establecidos en el
apartado 2 del citado artículo 20.
Decimocuarta.- Cláusula de exclusividad.
Los aspectos referentes a la exclusividad se atendrán a lo que mencione la memoria del
Proyecto ROTATES.
Decimoquinta.- Régimen jurídico y jurisdicción competente.
El presente Convenio tiene naturaleza administrativa, rigiéndose en su desarrollo,
efectos y para su interpretación por el ordenamiento jurídico administrativo, en concreto
por lo establecido en la Ley 40/2015, de 1 de octubre, de Régimen Jurídico del Sector
Público. Además, se estará a lo dispuesto en el Decreto 11/2019, de 11 de febrero, por
el que se regula la actividad convencional y se crean y regulan el Registro Electrónico
de Convenios del Sector Público de la Comunidad Autónoma y el Registro Electrónico
de Órganos de Cooperación de la Administración Pública de la Comunidad Autónoma de
Canarias y, en general, a lo dispuesto en las normas administrativas vigentes de desarrollo.
Por la especialidad de la materia, será de aplicación igualmente la Ley 14/2011, de 1 de
junio, de la Ciencia, la Tecnología y la Innovación.
Está excluido del ámbito de aplicación de la Ley 9/2017, de 8 de noviembre, de
Contratos del Sector Público, si bien se aplicarán los principios de esta ley para resolver
dudas y lagunas que pudieran plantearse.
Las cuestiones litigiosas que se pudieran suscitar durante la vigencia del mismo y
que no pudieran ser resueltas por la Comisión de Vigilancia y Control, serán sometidas
a la Jurisdicción Contencioso-administrativa, siendo el órgano competente la Sala de lo
Contencioso-administrativo del Tribunal Superior de Justicia de Canarias, de conformidad
con su Ley reguladora 29/1998, de 13 de julio.
Y, en prueba de conformidad y aceptación, firman el presente Convenio, a 26 de noviembre
de 2025.- Por el Instituto Canario de Investigaciones Agrarias, Janira Gutiérrez Peraza.- Por
el Cabildo Insular de Tenerife, la Presidenta, Rosa Elena Dávila Mamely.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26865 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
ANEXO
[HORIZON-CL6-2024-BIODIV-02-3-two-stage]-[Promoting minor crops in farming systems]
Proposal template Part B: technical description
ROTATES: MINOR ROOTS AND TUBERS FOSTERING AGROBIODIVERSITY AND ECOSYSTEM
SERVICES
#@APP-FORM-HERIAIA@#
Listof participants
Participant No. Short
Participantorganisationname Country
name
CIRAD France (including
1 Centre de Coopération Internationale en Recherche
Guadeloupe)
(Coordinator) AgronomiquepourleDéveloppement-C.I.R.A.D.Epic
InstitutNationaldeRecherchepourl'Agriculture, l'Alimen-INRAE
2 France
tation et l'Environnement
3 TechnologikoPanepistimioKyprou CUT Cyprus
4 UniversitédeLiège UL Belgium
UMa Portugal (Ma-
5 UniversidadedaMadeira
deira)
UAc Portugal (Azores
6 UniversidadedosAcores
Islands)
7 InstitutoNacionaldeInvestigaçaoAgrariaeVeterinaria INIAV Portugal
ConsiglioperlaRicercainAgricolturael'analisi dell'eco- CREA
8 Italy
nomia agraria
9 CentredeRecherchedel'institutLyfe ILRIC France
ICIA Spain
10 InstitutoCanariodeInvestigacionesAgrarias
(CanaryIslands)
11 Scotland’sRuralCollege SRUC UnitedKingdom
12 AssociaçãodaCostaOeste ACOESTE Portugal
13 EuropeanNetworkOfLivingLabsIvzw ENoLL Belgium
14 InovacijskoTehnoloskiGrozdMurskaSobota ITC Slovenia
15 ThomasPlants TP France
16 GeoponikoPanepistimionAthinon AUA Greece
PNKH France
17 AssociationPanakuh
(FrenchGuiana)
UMNG Republicofthe
18 UniversitéMarienNgouabi
Congo
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26866 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
1. EXCELLENCE #@REL-EVA-RE@#
1.1 Objectivesandambition#@PRJ-OBJ-PO@#
1.1.1 Projectcontextandrationale
ROTATES aims to sustainably enhance agrobiodiversity and ecosystem services by introducing and promoting
starchyrootandtubercrops,currentlyconsideredasminorcropsandunderutilisedinEuropedespiteincreasing
consumerdemand.Minorstarchyrootsandtubers(MRT),namelysweetpotato(Ipomoeabatatas),yam(Dioscorea
spp.), cassava (Manihot esculenta) and taro (Colocasia esculenta) are traditionally grown in tropical regions1, yet many
varietieshavestrongpotentialfortemperateclimates2.Theyarealreadycultivatedonasmallscaleincountries like
Spain, Portugal, France, Italy, and Hungary. Locally,they are known as"ancestralcrops" or"grandparents' crops".
Previously more prominent, they have been overshadowed by major crops like potato and wheat3,4. Classified as un-
derutilised or orphan crops, they are the subject of limited research and receive little funding in Europe, while tradi-
tional processing methods constrain their further development5,6. Our overall objective is to enhance the resilience of
European agrosystems to climate change, reduce the impacts of agriculture on the environment, and meet the
rising demand for healthy foods, by investigating the potential of the targeted crops, sweet potato, yam, cassava,
and taro.
MRTcropsaretraditionallygrowninEuropeanoutermostterritories,wheretheyformpartoflocaldiets,because of
the multi-cultural origins of the populations and favourable climates. Some EU regions, like French Guiana, are diver-
sity hotspots,particularly for American yam (Dioscorea trifida) and cassava7,8. Despite their cultural importance, local
production and consumption are declining due to rising costs, technical lock-ins, and underdeveloped value chains9.
Recent R&D has focused on cassava and sweet potato, but mainly in tropical zones located outsidethe EU10,11.12,13.
With advances in genomics, reference genomes andmolecular marker resources are now available for many MRT
crops, and breeding methods are evolving. Traditional phenotypic selection is increasingly beingsupplementedby
molecular and genomics-assistedtechniques14. The use of modern phenotyping technologies, such as near-infrared
spectroscopy (NIRS), drones, and robotics, allows for large-scale and precise characterizationofMRTgermplasm15.
Worthnoting,ayambreedingprogram,andatarophenotypingplatform,are emerging in Europe.
MRTcropshaverecentlygainedimportanceinEurope,asthereisagrowingdemandforthesecrops,includingas
food,non-foodproducts(suchasstarch),andforanimalfeed16.Thepercapitatotaldemandhastripledinthelast
decade to reach 1.1 Kg/capita/year and is mostly met by imports (FAOSTAT). In the last decade, on average, domestic
production17hascoveredabout24%oftheEuropeandemand,althoughthepercentagefluctuateswith thecrop,
withimportsincreasingfrom245,000tonnesin2010to820,000tonnesin2022.Europeanproductionrelies on intensive
monoculture systems using so-called elite varieties, which has led to serious outbreaks of viruses and diseases, for
example in sweet potato18, while at the same time eroding the sustainability of the agrosystems. This growing demand
represents a significant opportunity to diversify EU agriculture, and the ideal momentum to introduce and disseminate
agroecological practices as alternatives to current monoculture systems. This trend also opensuppossibilitiestoexpand
thedemandfor MRTcropsandtofurther diversifyEUdietswithhealthyproducts. Moreover,aspartofEuropean
cultural heritage, MRT crops have a significant advantage over exotic or unfamiliar crops; due to the ancestral
knowledge that can be harnessed through innovative research and modern technology.
MRT crops have proven to be efficient in both crop associations and in crop rotationsin many parts of the world19,20.
They require few or no pesticides and herbicides and are more resilient to climate change21,22, meaning they are well
placed to restore biodiversity to European agricultural systems, increase farmers' incomes, and offer alternatives to
cereals for special diets. MRT crops will likely have positive impacts on ecosystem service provision: i-, their long
growth cycle, large foliage, and reduced reliance on pesticides provide habitats for many species (includingnatural
enemiesofpests),ii-whileprotein/nitrogen-richgrainistheharvestedproductinthecase of most crops (e.g., cereals),
in MRT crops, carbon-rich roots are the harvested product, while the protein/nitrogen richfoliage is a by-product that
has potential as animal feed or for soil amendment, iii-the extrafloral nectaries and exudatesofMRTcropscouldbe
analternativesourceoffoodforbeneficialarthropods,andiv-thewaterdemandof
1 Lebot.CABI2019 10 Xueetal.NewPhytol2022 https://ec.europa.eu/eurostat/comext/newxtw
2 Eppingetal.Planta2020 11 Perez-Fonsetal.PlantPhysiology2023 eb/
3 Kiemoetal.PlantPathology2022 12 Xueetal.NewPhytol2022 18Fiallo-OliveMicroorganisms2022
4 5 6 G C K h r a i m a m p e a m n ld y a i n a e e e t t t a a a l l l . . . P N T L h e o e w S or P O h A n y p e t p o 2 l l 0 o G 1 g e 8 is n t e 2 t 0 2 2 0 2 21 1 1 3 4 P Fr e i r e e d z m -F a o n n e s t e a t l a . l A . g P r l i a c n u t lt P u h r y e s 2 io 0 l 1 o 8 gy2023 1 2 9 0W Ka a n n d g o e & ta B l. i J ta E n n e v , . IJ M S a A n 2 a 0 g 2 . 3 2024
7 Olsen&SchaalPNAS1999 15Gouveiaetal.Appl.Sci.2020 21PushpalathaNaturalResourcesForum 2023
8 Bousalemetal.Genome2010 16https://www.fao.org/faostat/en/ 22VanZonneveldetal.PNAS2023
9 Colombetet al.EurJNutr2021 17
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26867 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
MRT cropsis high during spring(leaf production), when more water is available,compared to cereals whose water
demand peaks in summer (grain filling) when water availability is reduced. However, the net impact of these crops on
soilstructureremainstobedetermined,withthepotentiallypositiveimpactofmassiverootsonsoildecompaction po-
tentially offset by soil disturbance during harvest.
MRT crops are rich in starch and are gluten free, plus many varieties have a low glycaemic index (GI), and are rich
in health-promoting compounds (anthocyanins and carotenoids)23. They can have dual purpose, producing edible
rootsandfodderleavesinthecaseofcassavaorsweetpotato,andcanservemultiplemarketsegments:markets forfresh
produceaswellasindustrialapplicationsormultipleprocessingorconsumermarketsegments,forexample pasta and
bread24. They have a high potential for food processing25. In the other hand, starchy MRT crops are primarily a source
of energy due totheir high carbohydrate content (70-85% starch), which accounts for 80-90% of their dry weight.
These MRT crops can largely replace cereals in feed destined for three classes of livestock (small ruminants, cattle,
and poultry) provided they are supplemented with a nitrogen source. Moreover, MRT by-product foliage has variable
but generally high protein content, usually in the 15-30% DM range. Therefore, MRT by-products offer an excellent
opportunity to enhance livestock feed resources by providing high-quality protein and energy, thus helping to bridge
the gap between feed supply and demand. Producing MRT feed locally can significantlyreducefeedingcosts,and
consequentlybenefitlivestockfarmerswhooftenrelyonexpensiveimported products that in addition, have a substan-
tial environmental footprint.
The inclusion of MRT crops in this call will adequately complement the cohort of minor crops, minor cereals, leg-
umes, traditional fruit trees, introduced into European agrosystems by the four sister projects (CROPDIVA, RADI-
ANT, DIVINFOOD, BIOVALUE) funded by H2020. Additionally, this inclusion will extend the promotion of ne-
glected and underutilized crops to Europe's outermost regions, thereby broadening the geographical scope beyond
the areas covered by the sister projects.
Figure1:ROTATESoverallconcept
1.1.2. Projectobjectivesandambition
ROTATESwilllaythefoundationsfortheadoptionandsustainableproductionofMRTcropsbythedifferentactors of
thevaluechainsbeyondthetimelineoftheprojectitself.TheoverallobjectiveistointegrateMRTcropsasalever for
crop diversification in five European continental countries (France, Portugal, Cyprus, Italy, Greece), including
fiveoutermostregions(Madeira,CanaryIslands,AzoresIslands,GuadeloupeandFrenchGuiana), andonenon-
EUcountry(RepublicoftheCongo), whereslashandburnpracticesdominatetheproductionofMRT cropslikein
FrenchGuiana),and,insodoing,tohaveapositiveimpactonresilience,biodiversityandadaptationto climate change.
We will use an interdisciplinary and multi-actor approach (MAA), to develop agroecological practices based on MRT
crops in both conventional and organic agrosystems in 6 pilot Living Labs (LLs) and establish four MRT Breeding
Hubs,one for each crop for genetic innovation. ROTATES aims to generate innovativefoodprocessingandintro-
duceMRT-basedfeedsinlivestockdietstoenhancefoodsystemdiversitythat
23Ferraroetal.Crit.Rev.FoodSc.Nut.2016 events/news/are-dual-purpose-crops-a- 25Lebotetal.J.FoodComp.Anal.2023
24https://www.cgiar.org/news- breeding-priority-the-case-of-cassava/
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26868 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
willbenefitfarmers,consumersandprivatecompanies.ROTATESwillcontributetoreducingEurope'sdependence
on imports by facilitating local production, giving added value to products, and will guide the proposal of a policy
framework for phytosanitary certification of an MRT seed system. We will produce guidelines to foster the devel-
opment of MRT crops at value chain level aimed at entrepreneurs, policy makers and other stakeholders (Figure 1).
SO.1. Identify levers along the value chain to increase MRT crop adoption by assessing opportunities and
constraints, thus enhancing their use in farming systems and the feed and food industry. (WP1 & 2)
Currently, the challenges of expanding MRT crop value chains are highlighted through different perspectives: the
food system lock-in concept (where established crops are prioritised, leading to less research and less economic via-
bility for minor crops, making them less attractive to farmers26); transition theory (which emphasises resistance to
systemic change which hinders the adoption of alternative crops27), and transaction cost theory28(where higher costs
associated with minor crops due to their scale make them less competitive than mainstream crops).
ROTATESwilldeveloptoolstobeusedintheproject(e.g.,focusgroups,surveys,semi-structureinterviews)which
willhelptoidentifythefactorswhichaffecttheadoptionofMRTsatdifferentstagesofthechain,aswellasidentify
opportunities for their expansion.
Measurable through six business case studies for MRT value chains for food and feed. Guidelines on value-chain
opportunitiesandstrategies.Theconstraintsandopportunitiesaswellastheleverswillbemeasurableandverifiable
becausetheywillbeidentifiedtogetherwiththehelpofthedifferentactorsthatcomprisethevaluechainsconcerned.
Achievable thanks to the tools applied and interaction with participating value chain actors to highlight the possibil-
itiesfortheuptakeandfurtherdevelopmentofMRTs.Therefore,theidentificationofleversfortheuptakeof MRTs is
achievable within the timeline of the project.
SO.2. Co-design and co-develop novel agroecological management practices that incorporate the most suitable
MRT varieties, and evaluate their impacts on agrobiodiversity and on farmers income diversification. (WP3,4,6)
Currently, agriculture is one of the main drivers of environmental degradation and biodiversity loss. Industrial agri-
culturewithdominantmonocultureshasledtounsustainableagriculturalsystemscharacterisedbyhighexternal energy
inputs and high vulnerability to environmental and political shocks29. European production of MRT crops relies on
intensive monoculture systems using a few so-called elite varieties, which is threatening the sustainability of theag-
rosystems.Someproductionsystemsusecroprotation(withe.g.,cereals,legumesor vegetables),butthese are uncom-
mon and their performance (including their provision of ecosystem services) poorly documented. In tropicalforests,
MRTcopsareoftenproducedinrichcropassociations,butthesecouldbeoptimizedtoimprovetheir productivity and
their sustainability (in particular reduce their impact on deforestation).
ROTATESwilldevelopbasketsofoptionsintegratingMRTcrops(inbothcroprotationsandcropassociations),in
order to cater for the diversity of agroecologies considered as well as for the diversity of farms, with the aim of in-
creasingtotalproductivityandmaximisingthedeliveryofecosystemservices.Theresultingcroppingsystemswill com-
bine MRT crops with cereals, legumes, cucurbits, vegetables and/or fruit trees in Europe, while the integration of cover
crops and agroforestry shrubs will be privileged in the tropical forest sites. These options will be co-developed with
farmers and other actors of the valuechains represented in the 6 pilot Living Labs (LL) withinthe consortium,and
will be tested in a participatory manner. ROTATES will establish a breeding hub for each crop and develop breeding
strategies to provide varieties adapted to these new agronomic practices.
Measurable through the methods proposed (on-station trials, on-farm adaptation and evaluation, modelling, etc)
which will allow a robust comparison of the performance of alternative cropping systems based onMRT crops and
usualfarmer practicesandtheirimpact on biodiversityand soilhealth. On-farmadaptation willbe conducted in at
least 60 conventional system and 30 organic farms in the 6 pilot LLs. Indicators of ecosystem services will be monitored
andevaluated. Thebreedinghubswiththeirrelatedgenebanksandphytosanitaryapproacheswhichwill provide ge-
netic resources adapted to the agronomic practices developed in response to the different constraints.
Achievable thanks to the methods proposed, which are realistic even within the lifespan of the project, given that two
ormoreseasonsofagronomydatawillbecollectedinthepilotLLs.Thebreedinghubswillbefullyoperational, lever-
aging the extensive European and international genetic resources available. Furthermore, the project will benefit from
the partners’ significant capacity and long experience in breeding MRT crops, and deep phenotyping for a wide range
of biological traits. Additionally, the availability of sophisticated equipment and advanced technologies will further
enhance our ability to achieve the project’s objectives efficiently.
26Meynardetal.,AgronomyforSustainable 28Williamson,HandbookofIndustrial Conservation2022.
Development2018 Organization1989
27Harich,SystemDynamicsReview2010 29Agnoletti&Santoro.Biodiversityand
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26869 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
SO.3. Unlock the potential of MRT crops, by co-identifying with value chain actors of uses of fresh and processed
MRTs for feed and food markets adapted to European consumers (WP5 and 2)
Currently,inthecontextofamarketthatisincreasinglyattentivetothenutritionalpotentialoffoods,industriesare
increasingly looking for new raw materials to produce functional products. Furthermore, the gluten-free market is also
increasinglyexpanding,soindustriesandconsumersarelookingfornewformulationsofbakedproductscoming from
floursandstarchesoforiginsotherthancereals,perhapsmixedwithgluten-freecerealsand/orlegumes.Onthe other
hand, the feed industry is also very interested in new sources of high-energy raw materials to end their dependenceon
cerealsandininexpensivesourcesofproteintoreplacesoya,currentlyanindispensableingredientin balanced animal
diets.
ROTATES will developknowledge of the physico-chemical and technological properties and the production of dif-
ferent MRT food prototypes and animal feed. It will produce indications for the best industrial uses with high nutri-
tional and sensorial quality products Recipes will be developed using fresh and processed MRT, and the consumers
acceptance will be assessed through surveys.
Measurablethroughthreefoodproducts(pasta,breadandicecream),useinfeed(sheep,goats,cattleandpoultry)
and livestock products (meat, milk, cheese, eggs), A booklet and a video of recipes will be produced.
Achievable thanks to the capacity and long experience of the partners to process different kind of crops and the
availability of a broad diversity of MRT crops and varieties within the consortium which will facilitate the identification
of the most appropriate genotypes for transformation.
SO.4. Capacity building and dissemination to promote environmental, health and economic benefits of MRT crops
to the diversity of value-chain actors involved in the project and to a wider audience through a network of living labs
on minor crops. (WP4, WP6 &WP7)
Currently,the integration of minor crops in diverse agricultural systems is hindered by a lack of comprehensive train-
inganddisseminationmechanisms.Whilethereisagrowinginterestintheenvironmental,health,andeconomic benefits
ofMRTcrops,theknowledgeandpracticesrequiredforeffectiveimplementationareoftenfragmentedand underuti-
lised across the different regions.
ROTATESwilldeveloparobustcapacity-buildingframeworkthatleveragespilotLLsandthemultiactorapproach
(MAA) to bridge these gaps. Using a train-the-trainer approach, the project will deliver a structured training programme
topartnersforthedeployment oftailoredlocaltrainingsessionstoensurethat pilot LLsareequippedto replicate and
adapt these solutions effectively.
Measurablethroughnumber of trainingsessions providedtotrainers and theincreaseinpartners' familiarity with
MAA, LL methodologies, and stakeholder engagement practices. Three face-to-face training workshops on the inno-
vative agroecological practices in each pilot LL, involving at least 25 participants including farmers, agricultural
advisors andrepresentatives of farmers associations.Co-learningthroughreciprocalvisitsofthe pilot LLs between
PNKH in French Guiana and UMNG in Republic of the Congo. Co-learning through meetings with Sister projects.
Achievable thanks to the structured approach of involving a wide range of stakeholders across different sectors. This
approach ensures a comprehensive understanding of local needs and fosters a collaborative environment that supports
the effective dissemination and adoption of MRT crop solutions.
1.1.3. ProjectR&Imaturity
Currentlyavailable/inuseonthemarket ROTATESachievements
Scarce knowledge of the MRT genetic resources EU genebanks will be enriched with MRT genetic resources
available in Europe. [TRL 2] basedonagapanalysisand,whereappropriate,theintroduction
of new MRT resources from international genebanks. [TRL6]
No standard sanitation protocol is available for Sanitation services for accessions of two target crops (sweet po-
stakeholders in the areas where these crops are cur- tato and yam) will be established in the framework of seed sys-
rently grown (although protocols have been tem implementation with suitable phytosanitary
published).[TRL3] recommendations.[TRL6]
There are practically no MRT breeding programmes Four breeding hubs, one for each target crop, will be imple-
in Europe, except for one on yam in Guadeloupe mentedinEuropeancountriesandoutermostregions.They will
and a taro phenotyping platform in beequippedforphenotyping,andresearcherswillbetrained
Madeira. inappropriatebreedingmethodsandstrategiesforthesecrops.
Current production of MRT crops is far below Development of MRT based agroecological management
Europeanmarketdemand.Only24%ofthedemand practices maximising yield, tolerance to biotic and abiotic
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26870 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
iscoveredbyMRTcropsgrowninEurope. stresses and the ecosystem services provided by these crops.
[TRL 2] [TRL 6-7]
MRT food products are available as raw materials Processing and enhancement of popular European foods—
or exotic foods. Processing methods exist in differ- bread, pasta, and ice cream—by adding biofunctional com-
ent tropical countries but are generally not pounds,loweringGI,andmakingthemlactose-free,aligned
suitablefortheEuropeanmarket.[TLR3] withconsumertastes.[TLR5-6]
Practically no MRT crops are used feed for live- Enhanced knowledge and recommendations for the use of raw
stock feed, except for peels used for animals in Gua- roots and tubers, leaves, peel and ensilage for ruminants and
deloupeandFrenchGuiana,butwithnostudies poultryandforthequalityofby-products(meat,milk,cheese,
ofanti-nutritionalandbio-functionalcomponents. eggs).
A small number of Living Labs already focus on mi- Pilot LLs will receive training on stakeholder engagement, MAA
nor crops in Europe. In ROTATES, pilot LLs ex- principles, and LL setup. Through ENoLL30, certification pro-
pressed moderate familiarity with MAA and LL cess, they will be evaluated against criteria to support their
concepts (55.6% and 40%, respectively). Neverthe- growth and certification as stable LLs. [SRL 7]
less,thereissignificantgrowthpotential,
as many are in early stages of co-creation and ex-
panding engagement. [SRL 2-3]
There is currently no network that incorporates the Through ROTATES, which involves different actors of the value
different value chain actors, farmers, seed compa- chain located in both continental Europe and in the outermost
nies, processors and researchers, concerned with regions, as well as outside Europe, a network will be createdto
MRT crops in Europe that could share knowledge, shareknowledgeandstrengthencapacityconcerning
experience and resources. thesecropsatEuropeanlevel.Disseminationandalignmentwith
the different missions to extend the MRT network.
#§PRJ-OBJ-PO§#
1.2 Methodology#@CON-MET-CM@# #@COM-PLE-CP@#
1.2.1Overallmethodology
ROTATES will conduct comprehensive, i-multi-disciplinary DIAGNOSES of current MRT uses, agronomic prac-
tices, varieties and value chain. The diagnoses will guide the activities for ii-DEPLOYMENT of novel MRT-based
agroecologicalpracticesandthegeneticimprovementoflocallyadaptedvarietiestoenhancecropproductivity and qual-
ity of both (food and feed). Then, the knowledge, toolsand products delivered will enableiii-ADOPTION of MRT
through the creation of marketing avenues and capacity-building initiatives (Figure 2).
Figure2:ROTATESmethodology
30VervoortProceedingsoftheXXXVIISPIM InnovationConference2024
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26871 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
 PilotLLs,BreedingHubs,Casestudies,cropsandcountriestargetedfordiagnoses,deploymentand
added value activities
The diagnoses will target the 10 countries and outermost regions involved in the ROTATES consortium: Azores Isl.,
CanaryIsl.,Cyprus,France,FrenchGuiana,Greece,Guadeloupe,Madeira,PortugalandRepublicoftheCongo (Figure
3).
Pilot Living Labs The development of
management practices, and evaluation
of their agronomic performance and their
impacton ecosystemservices will be im-
plemented in six pilot LLs, three in con-
tinental Europe (pLL1-Cyprus, pLL2-
France, pLL3-Portugal), two in over-
seas Europe (pLL4-French Guiana,
pLL5-Madeira), and one in the Republic
of the Congo a non-European country in
the Global South endowed with forests
and biodiversity of global significance
(pLL6-Congo). Pilot LLs are user-cen-
tred, open innovation ecosystems based
on systematic user co-creation ap-
proach, integrating research and inno-
vation processes in real life communities
and settings (using the Living Lab meth-
Area of minor Root and Tuber crops (ha/100 km²)
odology detailed below). These
pilot LLs were selected based on (i) the Figure3:ROTATESimplementation
diversity of contexts (agroecological conditions, and constraints and opportunities in the value chains, from production
to consumption), (ii) the availability of genetic materialto speed up the introduction and evaluation of thematerial,
(iii)localcapacitiesandlogisticalconditionsforresearchandinnovation,and(iv)thepresenceofboth conventional
andorganicsystems(SO2&SO4).ForeachMRTcrop,weselectedatleasttwogeographicalregions with different
constraints.Our choice was also influenced by the capacity of the partners and the opportunity to see the pilot LLs
evolving into stable and long-term co-creation ecosystems and, possibly, into certified Living Labs.
BreedingHubsROTATESwillsetupfourbreedinghubs,i.e.sitesthatworkinclosecollaborationwithgenebanks
wheregeneticresources,aphenotypingplatformandtheskillsrequiredforbreedingareavailable.YAMHUB:This
breedinghubwillbeestablishedinGuadeloupewhereaCIRADyambreedingprogrammeisalreadyunderwayand a
worldwide yam collection atthe CRB-PT genebank has already beengenotyped31,32meaning budget savingswill be
availablefortheotherMRTcrops.TheTAROHUBwillbesetupatUMainMadeira,whichhoststheISOPlexis gene-
bank, thanks to the taro diversity built by a former EU project (INEA28), which is worth complementing. The SWEET
POTATOHUBwillbesetupatINIAVinPortugal.PortugalandtheMacaronesianislandshaveregulation facilities to
exchange genetic material, thus providing the foundation for taro and sweet potato collections destined for European
countries. A CASSAVA HUB will be set up at PNKH in French Guiana, chosen because it already hosts among the
most important cassava genetic diversity33.
Case Studies Since the direct use and processing of these MRT is not well known in Europe, the selection of the
countries and outermost regions for food and feed activities was mainly based on the consortium partners’ experience
and their preliminary discovery work on the processing of MRT crops and on their post research collaboration with
the food and feed industries to promote these products. Thus, processing MRT for pasta will be conducted by CREA
in Italy, processing for bread by CIRAD in Guadeloupe, and processingfor ice cream by UMainMadeira.Their
useasfeedforgoatsandpoultrywillberesearchedbyICIAintheCanaryIsles,forcattle byUAcintheAzores.and
forsheepbyAUAinGreece.Hence,investigationofthevaluechainwillbeconducted insixofthecasestudies(CS),
therebyensuringtheagrosystemswhereMRTwillbegrownandprocessedintofood or feed are representative.
31 Arnauetal.PlosOne2027 32Sharifetal.AnnalsofBotany2020 33 Eliasetal.EconomicBotany2004
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26872 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Engagement with stakeholders and end-users:
multi-actor approach (MAA) and Living Lab methodology
Toensurestructuredandlong-termengagementofkeystakeholdersandendusersatthelocallevel,ROTATESwill im-
plementtheMultiActorApproach(MAA)andLivingLab(LL)methodologiesasfoundationalmethods(WP1,
WP7). MAA, which is essential for agricultural innovation and crop diversification, integrates di-
verse perspectives to create sustainable solutions 34. ROTATES goes beyond MAA by adopting
the LL approach, establishing real life environments for co-creation among key actors in the
Quintuple Helix (5H) Model: Citizens, Government, Industry, Academia, and
theEnvironment35. This will help regions identify and leverage their economic niches and
competitive advantages36. A baseline survey conducted by ENoLL and ITC revealed that
pilot LLs are stillin the early stages of adopting MAA and LL methodologies, with limited
co-creationactivitiesandafocusoncollaborationwithindustry(32%)andacademia(30%)
ratherthanwithcitizensandcivilsociety(15%).Toaddressthesegaps,wewillprovidetailored capacity
buildingactions usingatrain-the-trainerapproach(WP7)to enhancethe Pilot LLs’
ability to engage key stakeholders, including researchers, farmers, farmer’s groups and associations, advisors, food and
feed processors, citizens and consumers, local rural communities, NGOs and government entities.
ROTATES will use an integrated methodological approach to develop, implement, and monitor the MAA and LL
framework throughout the lifespan of the project, ensuring active stakeholder engagement, structured co-creation, and
asustainableopeninnovationecosystem,withcontinuousevaluationandrefinementbasedonreal-timefeedback and
performance metrics. The MAA will be implemented in 3 stages: 1: Framework development and Methodological
Structuring (T1.1); 2: Action Plans and Implementation (T1.2). 3: Continuous Monitoring, Evaluation, and Iteration
(T1.3) Active engagement throughout the project will support key policies and actions (CAP, EIP-AGRI, Green
Deal/F2F, AgData, etc.), boosting the project’s overall success (SO1 to SO4).
Holistic diagnoses of value chains
Because MRT are minor crops, data on MRT crops are scarce in Europe, and need to be complemented. To this
end,wewillleverageconsistent knowledgeonthesecropsavailableinthemainproducingareasinAfrica,Asia
and SouthAmerica,two of theseareas (French Guiana andthe Republicofthe Congo)areincludedinthe project.
For efficient adoption and sustainable production of MRT crops in Europe, we will conduct comprehensive diagnoses,
combining desk studies and multi-stakeholder surveys and interviews, of the MRT genetic resources, of the perfor-
mance of currentcropping systems, and of the economic, social andculturalconstraints and opportunities fortheuptake
ofMRTcropsalongthevaluechain.Basedontheresultsofourdiagnosis,deploymentandmarketing strategies will be
implemented aimed at the adoption and sustainable production of MRT crops (SO1). The aims of the desk study of
available secondary information (scientific literature and extension documents, databases, regulations in force, etc.)
will be to (i) understand the context in which the food and feed value chains operate or are recommended to operate37,
(ii)document existing agronomic practices, from planting to harvest, including a preliminary farm typology analysis,
(iii)review the provisioning, regulating, and supporting ecosystem services associated with MRT-based agrosys-
tems, and (iv) evaluate the potential of MRT for food and feed production. A recommendation domain analysis38
will be performed to better understand the diversity of sites and the representativeness of selected sites to inform future
scaling strategies (Figure 4A).
Primarydatawillbeproducedbysurveysandinterviewstocomplementthedeskstudy.Oneobjectiveofthesurveys
will be to inform a farm typology analysis39to understand the diversity of farms, and a yield gap analysis40to identify
the constraints and opportunities specific to each farm type in pilot LLs where MRT crops are already produced(Figure
4A).ThesecondobjectiveofthesurveyswillbetoassessthegeneticMRTmaterialavailablein farmers’ fields in
each partner country and to compare it to the global MRT diversity available in genebanks that hold these crops in
trust. The third objective of the surveys will be to assess disease pressure. The fourth objective of the surveys will be
to understandthe current use of MRT cropsin food processing andthe use of MRTcrop by-products as animal
feed.
34Leclèreetal.Sustain.Dev2023 Distance-spanningTechnology.2012 39 Hassall,etal.ComputersandElectronics in
35https://enoll.org/about-us/what-are-living- 37 Rattalinoetal.AgriculturalandForest Agriculture 2023
labs/ Meteorology2017 40Silva,etal.EuropeanJournalof
36Ståhlbröst & Holst The Living Lab Method- 38 Muthonietal.LandUsePolicy2017 Agronomy.2017.
ologyHandbook.Sweden,Centrefor
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26873 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Field deployment of starchy MRT crops
 PhenotypingofMRTdiversitypanelsfortraitstargetedbyROTATES(WP3)
Within the breeding hubs, each MRT crop diversity panel will be phenotypically evaluated in different environments,
to capture the Genotype by Environment effect (GXE), for the traits which will be considered in management practices
related to adaptation to agroecological conditions (i) tolerance to drought and/or scarcity of water for irrigation, (ii)
pest resistance, (iii) nutrient use efficiency linked to zero deforestation and (iv) weed resistance through plant ar-
chitecture and growth dynamics. Field phenotyping will consist of: (i) infrared gas analysers to measure photosynthe-
sisand stomatal conductance to evaluate plant health; (ii) remote sensing by drones41(NDVI,NDRE,GLI) toevaluate
thehealthindexandvegetationdensity,phenology,leaf temperature,leaf moisture content, and to predict productivity,
(iii)morpho-agronomic traits (biomass, shoot length; size, shape and colour of the roots, etc); (iv) drought avoidance
and phenotypic flexibility42; (v) leaf relative water content and leaf area to apply Grime’s CSR43 model; (vi) water use
efficiency measured as water productivity, i.e. the relationship betweencropproductivityandwateruse,orcalculated
usingevapotranspirationdata.Laboratoryphenotypingwill take place afterharvesting and will include the (i) root-
to-shoot signalling44(ABA, proline, the antioxidant enzyme ascorbateperoxidase)usingspectrophotometry,and(ii)
theaptitudefornutrientabsorptionandusetoincreaseyields (nitrogen efficiency ratio, nitrogen use efficiency, nitrogen
harvest index45). The nutritional quality of shoots and roots/tubers (total minerals, protein, starch), using near infrared
spectrometry (NIRS)46, will be assessed both in the field and in the laboratory after harvesting. The detailed phenotyp-
ing data will make it possible to investigate the architecture of valuable traits (SO2 to SO4).
 DecipheringcrucialgenesandallelesforthetraitstargetedbyROTATES(WP3)
MRT genetic resources will be enriched by introducing new varieties from neighbouring countries or international
genebanks, thanks to the ongoing collaboration with international and CGIAR genebanks (CePaCT , CIP, Alliance
BioversityInternational-CIAT, IITA) afterconductinga gapanalysis.Tocapturetheentire genetic diversity,which
can later be used in breeding programmes, the newly collected and introduced accessions will be sequenced, at 50x
coverage depth, using the Illumina NovaSeq 6000 System. The reads obtained from the sequencing will then be inte-
gratedinthepangenome oftheirrespective species: Colocasia esculenta,Manihotesculenta,Dioscorea sp. and Ipomea
batatas) using the giraffe tool in the vg software 47. The pangenomes will make it possible to capture both Single
Nucleotide Polymorphisms and Structural Variants, including Copy Number and Presence-Absence of Variations. This
strategy will enable us to fullygrasp the molecular basis of phenotypic traits of interests. Ultimately, this strategy
will facilitate the selection of accessions which harbour genomic/genetic variations underlying a trait of interest for
breeding programs. Genotyping data will be coupled with large-scale phenotyping data for genome-wide association
studies and genomic prediction. Trait heritability will be assessed, and genetic markerslinkedtothosetraitswillbe
deciphered.Fortraitswithastrongquantitativecomponent,weplantodevelop advanced phenomic and genomic pre-
diction models, using both standard statistical methods and cutting-edge machine learning techniques, as appropriate
(SO2 to SO4).
 Safeseeds:preventingdiseaseoutbreaksthroughanappropriatesanitaryframework(WP3)
BecausestarchyminorRTcropsarepropagatedvegetatively,theyarepronetoaccumulatediseasesovergenerations,
leadingtosignificantlossesinbothqualityandyield.Anintegratedseedhealthstrategyisthusindispensabletobuild up
sustainable seed systems for stakeholders and to ensure high yields and the development of value chain. In a vegeta-
tively propagated crop, the term ‘seed’ actually refers to the tuber or the root. The potato seed system is the most
widely studied seed system, which, in EU countries, is implemented using clear policies that are reviewed bythe
stakeholdersinvolved.Ascientificandcontext-basedframeworkextendingfromthegenebanktothefarmer’s field,will
bedesignedforthedevelopmentofacleanseedsystemasasupportforthesustainableproductionof MRT crops
by farmers. The presence of tuber-borne pathogens on collected MRT accessions will be evaluated using cutting edge
(high throughput sequencing technologies) diagnoses. Combined with a cross-check of the availability of preferred
germplasms in genebanks, the results will trigger a sanitation process, based on the combinationofmeristemculture
andthermotherapy,targetingrareandelitegermplasmstoensuretheavailability
41Macedoetal.Agriculture2023 44Gouveiaetal.PhysiologiaPlantarum 46Gouveiaetal.AppliedSciences2020
42Gouveiaetal.Emir.J.FoodAgric.2020 2020 47JouniSirénetal.Science2021
43www.ecologycenter.us 45Gouveiaetal.Emir.J.FoodAgric.2020
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26874 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
of a diverse panel of clean seeds for further dissemination to farmers and for the exchange of material between coun-
tries. In addition, a thorough review of the literature related to the risk of pests, plus analyses, and the seed systems
proposed in the Global South for the targeted crops and for clonal crops in the EU will be combined with stakeholder
consultations to guide the proposal of a policy framework for phytosanitary certification of seed systems adapted
to EU context and the requirements of IPPC international standards (such as ISPM48) for at least one MRT crop (SO2
& SO4).
 Co-constructionofnovelagroecologicalmanagementpracticesbasedonMRTcrops(WP4)
Empirical agronomic research will be conducted in all 6 pilot LLs, which are characterised by different challenges:
climate change and water scarcity in pLL1-Cyprus, pLL2-France, and pLL5-Madeira, pests and weeds in pLL2-France
and pLL3-Portugal, and deforestation in pLL4-French Guiana and pLL6-Congo. The systems to be investigated will
be crop rotations and crop associations (i.e., intercropping) that include MRT crops, but the performance of the system
as a whole will be evaluated, not only the performance of MRT crops. We will use a system agronomy approachby
adaptingthe DescribeExplain Explore Design (DEED) approach in whichwe will diagnosecurrentfarmingsystems,
designandtestalternativeMRT-basedcroppingsystemson-station,adaptthem on farm, evaluate them in a holistic
and participatory way, and scale most promising ones (Figure 4B). Pilot LLs will be at the centre of this approach
based on co-construction (strong link with WP1).
A B
Figure4:diagrammaticrepresentationofthethreestepsoftheagronomicdiagnosis(A),anddiagrammaticrepresentationofthe
iterative and participatory approach used for the co-construction of novel agroecologicalmanagementpracticesbased on MRT
crops (B). Connections between WP4 and other WPs (WP1, WP2, WP3, WP5)
The results of the agronomic diagnoses (desk study, recommendation domains, farm typologies and yield gap analysis,
seeabove)willinformtheco-constructionprocesswithinthepilotLLs,basedonthemulti-actorapproach (WP1),
leading tothe design of novel agroecological management practices based on MRT crops. These practices will then be
tested on station and adapted on farm. The purpose of on station research will be to make detailed measurementsina
controlled environment inorder tobetter understand the underlyingmechanisms governing the performance of
novel cropping systems based on MRT crops. The purpose of on-farm research will be to assess how innovative
cropping systemsfit in diverse farm contexts, organic and conventional,and in particular the trade-offs their adoption
may impose (for instance, in terms of labour). The purpose will also be to understand what adaptations and actions are
necessary for their wide adoption. The performance of the most promising management practiceswillthenbeevaluated
inthevarious pilot LivingLabs49,50.This evaluationwillbeinformed byatrade-off analysis of multiple criteria
(productivity, labour, provision of ecosystem services, etc., for the different types of farms and geographic domains
identified51. Simulations by mechanistic models calibrated with the detailed measurement taken on-station will also be
used, most likely using STICS, oneof the rare models that can simulate crop associations52,53(SO2 & SO4).
48 50Mottetetal.FrontiersinSustainableFood Development2023
https://www.ippc.int/fr/coreactivities/standar Systems2020
ds-setting/ispms/ 51 Klapwijk et al. Current opinion in
49 González-Esquivel et al. Journal of Environmental sustainability. 2014
Agricultural Sustainability 2020 52 Vezy et al.Agronomy for Sustainable
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26875 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
 Monitoring and evaluation of ecosystem services supported by the integration of MRT crops in farming
systems (WP4,6)
The identification of the provisioning and regulating ecosystem services supported by the incorporation of MRT crops,
will be addressed by key measurements across the different agrosystem components in the six pilot LLs compared with
current local practices(SO2 & SO4).Provisioning services will be assessed based on yield. A key regulating service,
biological pest control, will be assessed by monitoring pests, including nematodes, weeds and pathogens,compared
withincontrols,incollaborationwithWP3.Beneficialorganismssuchasnaturalenemiesof arthropods,soilmicro-
fauna,beesandwildbeesaspollinationindicatorswillbesampled,sortedandtaxonomically identifiedthroughfield
surveysandDNAmetabarcodinganalysis.Deepmetagenomicanalysiswillbeusedtoassess thepotentialfunctional
behaviourofthesoilmicrobiotaintaroinpLL1-CyprusandinsweetpotatoinpLL2-France. The diversity and activity
patterns of vertebrates will be investigated using camera trapping in the 6 pilot LLs. Soil structurewillbeanalysedto
assesswaterregulation(WP4).Pesticideusewillbeevaluatedbasedonfarmcalendars. Soil health will be monitored
using the BioFuncTool®, which rapidly and efficiently assesses the impact of agriculturalpracticesonsoilhealthin
thefieldusingsimple,low-cost,yetrobustmethodologies.Byexploitingthese datasets, advanced modelling and GIS
will enable the development of context-specific recommendations for irrigation, fertilisation, and pest management
that maximise yield and minimise environmental impacts (SO2).
 FosteringthedevelopmentofMRTvaluechains(WP1,2)
The potential role of MRTs in terms of food security, securing livelihoods and adapting to local environmental condi-
tionshaslongbeenidentified 54;however,onlybyfosteringtheirvaluechainswillitbepossibletoensurethat MRTs
do have an impact55. The information collected will be qualitative and quantitative and will facilitate the creation of
value chains -or the enhancement of existing ones -for specific MRT food and feed products. In-depth case studies
will be conducted based on the initial diagnoses, on the economic, social, and cultural drivers and barriers to the
uptake of MRTs (SO1). It will also allow the preliminary mapping of value chains where possible (i.e., where a supply
chain already exists) in order to identify potential constraints (e.g., financial constraints) and opportunities (e.g.,
economies of scale, satisfying consumers’ interest in products with particular attributes). Deliberative choice experi-
ments will be conducted with farmers to understand their preferences with respect to the characteristics of MRT crops
identified in the other ROTATES WPs (1 focus group for each of 6 case studies including a deliberative choice exper-
iment with farmers organised on site, i.e., 40 to 50 farmers each focus group, for foodandfeed).Semi-structured
interviewswillbeconductedwithprocessorstoassesstheirwillingnesstobe involvedinMRTvaluechains(aspects
toconsiderwillbe,for example, theirviews onthemarket,the existence of transaction costs or any technological
barriers that could hamper uptake of the MRT crops) ((3-5 semi-structured interviews with processors for each of the
6 case studies, i.e., food and feed). Work with consumers will combine focusgroups(1focusgroupforeachofthe4
casestudies,i.e.,Portugal,Cyprus,Guadeloupe,Italywith20consumers each to prepare consumer choice experiments)
andchoice experiments in four food case studies (4 surveys with consumers i.e., 350 consumers in Portugal, 100 in
Cyprus, 50 in Guadeloupe and 1800 in Italy). The information collectedwillbecompiled,analysedandreportedinsix
businesscasestudies.Thisworkwillhighlightthepotential for success of different value chains (e.g., combining
the collected qualitative and quantitative information to simulatetheprofitabilityofdifferentpartsofthevaluechains
aswell ashighlightingbarriersandopportunities)and discuss themost appropriate strategies (e.g., assess the cost
effectiveness of introducing these types of feed in livestock diets) (SO2 & SO4).
 ReleasingthepotentialofMRTcropsasfood(WP5)
The added-value of MRT crops will be explored through three traditional processed food products: pasta, bread (also
in blends with gluten-free or with low gluten index cereals) and plant-based ice cream. To meet European standards
includingtaste,nutrition, and method of production,the characteristicsof MRT cropsand of the varieties selected in
terms of raw material processability, sensorial and nutritional quality of products, and proposed new recipes will be
investigated. Flours will beproduced,withtheaim of use as apartial substitute for cereal flour or as is. Novel pasta
formulations will be produced at laboratory scale and characterised in terms of their nutritional, technological/rheolog-
ical and sensorial quality through biochemical analyses and non-destructive measurements (NIRS). Different types of
bread will be produced using suitable composite flours and their sensory quality characterised. MRT-based milk
alternatives will be produced to make ice cream56,57and evaluate it. Sensory
54McMullinetal.GlobalFoodSecurity 55Revoredo-Gihaetal.Agriculturaland 57Kilinçetal.J.FoodProcess.Preserv.
2022
2020. Food Economics 2021
56Ferdausetal.Nutrients2023
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26876 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
evaluation will be conducted with a panel of trained expert assessors (5 to 10) and untrained consumers (50 to 100
dependingontheproduct).Collaboration withindustrywill beensured bythe partners.Newrecipeswill be created
usingrawandprocessedMRTcropsandwill beevaluatedbyprofessional cooksandconsumersinanexperimental
restaurant. The most promising recipes will be published in culinary booklets/guides (SO3 & SO4).
 ReleasingthepotentialofMRTcropsasfeed(WP5)
TheuseofMRTcropby-productsasfeed(vegetativeparts,rootsandtubers)willbeevaluatedinonecontinental
country (Greece) and in two outermost regions (the Canary Islands and the Azores). The assessment will involve
differentspecies,includingcattle,goats,sheep,andpoultry.Thefoodproductsderivedfromlivestockthat consumed
MRTfeeds(milk,cheese,eggs, andmeat) will becharacterisedtodeterminetheir nutritional andsensory quality
(WP2). WewillalsodevelopmethodstoconserveMRTby-products(fresh,dried,ensiled)anddetermine their suit-
ability for inclusion in livestock feed. In collaboration with WP1, to ensure the integration of MAA, untrained con-
sumers (80 -100 participants in each country) will perform a sensory evaluation of the different livestockproducts
(meat,egg,cheese)basedonappearance,aroma,flavour,overallpalatabilityona9-pointhedonic scale(ISO11136,
2020).Atrained10-12-member sensorypanel will performadescriptiveanalysis,texture,odour, flavour and taste
attributesdependingoftheproduct,followingtheISO8589(2007) instructions.Wewill studythe yield,production,
andqualityoflivestockproducts.Finally,wewillidentifylivestockfarmersandfeedindustries interestedinmaking
useoftheexperimentalresultsobtainedthroughoutthelifespanoftheproject,usingtheMAA methodology (WP1 &
2)(SO3 & 4). Collaboration with industry will be ensured by the partners’ connections.
Adoption of starchy MRT crops
 Marketingavenues(WP1to8)
To support marketing avenues, co-construction processes in pilot LLs (WP1) will involve local stakeholders across the
value chain, ensuring their standpoints are included in assessments of the value chain (WP2), of food and feed formu-
lation(WP5),andinproductacceptanceandevaluation(WP2,WP5).Thiswillensurethatproductsdeveloped bythe
projectmeetstakeholderdemand,andhencefacilitatemarketentry.Giventhegrowingdemandforinnovative pro-
cessing methods and new recipes, product development and differentiation will be essential. Processing MRT crops
into value-added products (e.g., low-gluten, low GI, lactose-free) and emphasizing their unique advantages, such as
nutritional benefits andsustainability, will help position these crops in the market (WP5). The partners involved in
WP5 already work closely with food companies, such as Barilla, and feed companies such as Graneros deTenerife
(see§3.2),thusensuringcloselinkswiththemarket.Additionally,targetedmarketingcampaigns,social media,and
farm-to-tableeventswilleducateconsumersaboutthebenefitsandusesofMRTcrops(WP5,WP7).We willcreatea
frameworkandproduceguidelinesforacleanseedsystemtoensureaconsistentsupplyofhigh-quality products (WP3),
thereby strengthening the supply chain. Finally, ROTATES will provide guidelines, policy frameworks,andrecom-
mendations to policymakers on how to create a supportive environment for the integration of minor crops (WP2,
3,4,5,6). These activities will identify strategies and create opportunities for the creation or expansion of existing
MRT-based value chains and increase possible marketing avenues for farmers across Europe (SO2 & SO3).
 Capacitybuilding(WP1,3,4,5,6,7)
The project prioritizes mutual learning and capacity building, especially for farmers and breeders, to promote the in-
clusionofminorcropsinagrosystems.Atailored,agilecapacity-buildingprogram(T7.1)willbeco-designedwith pro-
ject partners, and implemented in alignment to the established methodological framework (T1.1), based on detailed
needsassessments,toequipthemandlocalstakeholderswiththenecessaryskillstoengageinvaluechains. The pro-
gramme will adapt to evolving needs and project developments. This capacity-building initiative will use a three-fold
approach: i) Harmonized Approach: Training will ensure consistent methods across all pilot sites and partners. This
includes foundational lessons on how to create Living Labs (LLs), stakeholder engagement, and co-creation, aligned
with the Methodological Framework. Participants will adapt these core concepts to their local contexts through practi-
cal applications. ii) Train-the-Trainers (WP7): This will prepare project partners who run thepilotLLs,topromote
MRTcropadoptionwithintheirecosystems,focusingfacilitationandpedagogicalskills.
iii)Knowledge Sharing and Co-Learning (WP4): Field demonstrations in each pilot LL, workshops and collabora-
tive learning sessions will cover agroecological practices, food safety, policy support, and business case studies. These
sessions, including scenario-based exercises, will be tailored tolocal needs and supported by expert presentations and
hands-on demonstrations (SO4). They will be preferably co-organised during existing farmer events to encourage the
participation of stakeholders. ROTATES will use a mixed-method approach, including
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26877 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
workshops, mentoring, webinars, and field visits, to bridge theory and practice. The exact actions will be decided based
on the results of the needs assessment (WP1). Using tools like serious games will help apply concepts in controlled
environments.Acontinuousfeedbackmechanismwillensuretheprogramme'sadaptability,aligningwith the Moni-
toring Evaluation and Learning approach, to enable the effective implementation of minor crop cultivation and
distribution practices across diverse regions.
1.2.2 RelationswithROTATEScontext/environment
ROTATES partners are currently involved or have been involved in EU-funded projects or other international, and
national researchprojectsandinitiativeslinkedtotheprojectobjectives.Thetablebelowsummarisessomeof these
projects and explains how ROTATES intends to seek complementarities and synergies with them.
Name(year) Description LinkwithROTATES
IntercropValuES IntercropValueES is developing a scientific re- ROTATES will collaborate closely with
(2022-2026) search action for better understanding and IntercropValueES, which is coordinated
HORIZON modelling of intercrop functioning and a by CIRAD, to benefit from the approaches
detailed analysis of lock-ins and levers at the and methods developed.
value chain level.
RADIANT(2021- RADIANT aims to promote crop diversifica- Experience in the AURORA Farms will
2025) tion, environmental and agrobiodiversity be used to better tailor approaches to be
Horizon2020 preservation, and fair used in Pilot LLs and other environments.
economic development through the valorisa-
tion of Underutilised Crops.
CROPDIVA(2021- CROPDIVA aims to conduct in-depth study The final decision support system for
2025) and promote six underutilised arable crops, stakeholders developed by CROPDIVA
Horizon2020 create new value chains for the development could be tested by ROTATES.
offoodandnon-foodproductsandassessthe
socio-economic impacts of the ecosystem
servicesdelivered.
DIVINFOOD(2022- DIVINFOOD projectaimsto co-develop new ROTATES will ensure the exchange of
2027) marketing strategies and plant-based products knowledge and experience between LLs
Horizon2020 from underutilised crops, benchmark agroeco- in the two projects.
logical farming techniques, to breed
locally adapted cultivars, and to demonstrate
business models for farmers.
BIOVALUE(2021- The project aims to develop a modular simula- The simulation tool developed in
2025) tion tool to analyse the link between biodiver- BIOVALUE could be useful for RO-
Horizon2020 sity, the agri-food value chain, and TATES (WP5, 6).
consumerhealth.
AGROSUS(2023- The AGROSUS project aims to establish Through UMa, ROTATES will
2027)Horizon2020 agroecological practices, with a focus on collaborate with AGROSUS on tools
technology transfer and training for weed and agroecological strategies for weed
mitigation and management control. prevention and control (WP4).
RTBBreeding(2023- The RTB Breeding project, with CIRAD as ROTATESwillusethemostappropriate
2024)extendedfor partner, aims to implement modernised ap- breeding methods developed and adapt
four years. proachesforthebreedingofRoots,Tubers themtotheEuropeancontextincluding
BMGFoundation andBananasin Africa. challenges(WP3).
KOPEKOBAproject The KOPEKOBA project implemented in the ROTATES will allow research on cassava
(2025-2029) Republic of the Congo, with CIRAD as partner, from KOPEKOBA to be deepened. KO-
CAFI-AFD aims at zero-deforestation farming PEKOBA will also scale
and the sustainable use of biodiverse and car- results from ROTATES in the Republic of
bon-rich ecosystems. the Congo.
SOILL (Support Struc- TheSOILLframeworkpartnership,supported ROTATES will align with SOILL to ena-
ture for Soil Living by ENoLL, sets up and runs a support structure ble knowledge sharing and benchmarking
Labs)2024- andservicesforthe100LivingLabs and light- of results. Collaboration
2030 housesoftheMission“ASoilDeal is also envisaged ²with Mission LLs
H2020 forEurope”. within the agricultural sector.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26878 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
1.2.3 ROTATESinterdisciplinaryapproach
The implementation of ROTATES requires knowledges and methodologies from different disciplines gathered by the
18 partners representing complementary fields and disciplines (detailed in §3.2) that are interwoven within the
project activities and will be brought together and integrated in pursuit of its objectives, co-developing innovationsin
differentfields.ThediagnosisanddevelopmentofagroecologicalcroppingsystemsthatincludeMRT cropsandmax-
imisetheirbenefitswillbringtogetheragronomists,modelers,ecologists,entomologists,breedersand ecophysiologists,
as well as data scientists, social scientists and economists. The implementation of clean seed systems will involve
phytopathologists, geneticists and biologists. The development of new feed and food products and of the value chains
will engage food and feed scientists, socio-economists, breeders and agronomists.
Thankstotheuseof theLivingLabmethodologynotonlyat pilotscalebut alsoat projectlevel,ROTATESwill go
beyond interdisciplinarity, to achieve trans-disciplinarity and a holistic approach.
1.2.4 Socialscienceandhumanitiesconsiderations
ThecoreoftheROTATESapproachistoaddresschallengesthroughco-creation,throughtheactiveinvolvementof
the stakeholders in a process of situated experimentation and collective learning for which it is essential to foster a
culture of collective sense-making along the process.In line with thetransdisciplinary approach, insights from key
social and behavioural sciences (SSH), education sciences, humanities, as well as economics and business experts will
be incorporated in the overall methodology and approach used by ROTATES to enable the understanding and address-
ing of the diverse needs and behaviours of community members.
In the framework of the MAA and LL methodology and as part of its trans-disciplinary approach, ROTATES will
include SSH considerations both horizontally at project level and vertically (in Pilot LLs and value chain). Such an
approach, led by social scientists and SSH partners, will play a critical rolein datacollection, analysis, engagement
and validation throughout the lifespan of the project, from co-design to scaling up.
1.2.5. GenderdimensionofROTATES
Genderdynamicsinagricultureinvolveavarietyofroles,responsibilities,andaccesstoresourcesthatdifferwidely
among individuals, extending beyond the binary. For instance, non-binary and gender-diverse individuals may face
uniquechallengesthatareoftenoverlooked.Experiencescanvarysignificantlybasedonintersectingfactorssuchas
socioeconomic status, ethnicity, and rural versus urban settings. Recognising and addressing these diverse gender ex-
periences is essential to developing inclusive and effective agricultural innovations.
Eventhoughtheintegrationofgenderdimensionisnotmandatoryforthiscall,ROTATESwilladdressgenderfrom
multiple angles—needs, acceptability, and replicability—to ensure that outcomes are inclusive, relevant, and effective
for all genders. The ROTATES methodological framework, developed in WP1, will establish –alongside themulti-
actorapproachandlivinglabmethodology-afoundationforagender-responsiveapproachthroughoutthe project’s
lifecycle.Thisincludesincorporatinggender-sensitiveguidelines,practices,andtoolstopromoteequitable participa-
tionandoutcomes.ROTATESwillimplementkeyactionssuchasdesigningandapplyinggender-sensitive methods
of data collection and analysis. When planning a strong participatory approach across different work packages, partic-
ular attention will be paid to fair and balanced participation in planned activities at project or pilot level. Data collection
and analysis will be designed to account for gender differences and provide gender-disaggregated diagnostic outputs,
thereby facilitating the production of recommendations and analyses that are sensitive to gender differences (if any).
This will ensure that the co-created innovations are responsive to the needs of all genders.
1.2.6 Openscienceapproach
Following the guidelines of Horizon projects, ROTATES underlines the importance of open access to scientific publi-
cations and research data. ROTATES will integrate open science practices to improve the quality, efficiency andre-
sponsivenessofitsresearchresults,asfollows.(i)Earlyandopensharingofresearch:Scientificpublications resulting
from ROTATES, will be published in open access journals with an embargo period of 3-6 months. In addition,pre-
printsmaybeavailableonplatform(aspre-prints,HAL).,Experimentalsocialandeconomicsprotocols willberegis-
teredontheAsPredictedrepositoryasrecommendedbyHEguidelines.Datasetswillbesharedasearly and openly as
possible using trustworthy thematic repositories (e.g., the European Nucleotide Archive (ENA) for sequencingdata)
orinstitutionalwarehouses(e.g.,Dataverse).(ii)Researchoutputmanagement:Afirstversionof the Data Manage-
ment Plan (DMP) addressing each ROTATES dataset will be released within six months after the beginning of the
project and will be regularly updated in order to provide a clear and detailed description of the management ofall
researchoutputs.Thedataproducedandconsideredopenforre-usewillbedepositedinatrusted repository(e.g.,ENA,
Dataverse) in line with the FAIR principles Standardised metadata frameworks will be added to datasets (e.g. the
MIAPPE standard -Minimum Information About a Plant Phenotyping Experiment-, the MIxS
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26879 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
standard -Minimum Information about any Sequence-, AACC standard, ICC standard or ISO, UNE norms). (iii)
Measuresto ensure reproducibility and reuse of research outputs:ROTATES will provide access to data or other
results needed to validate our findings. Datasets will be archived (with persistent identifiers) on trusted thematic re-
positoriesorwarehouserecognisedbythecommunity.Themethodologiesusedduringtheprojectwillbeopenand
available to the public for the purpose of reproducibility. Workflows and software produced during the project will be
made available on openaccess forges and saved inthe Software Heritage archive. Appropriate licensing options will
be attached to each shared output to support reuse. (iv) Providing open access to research outputs: All public deliv-
erables and open research outputs, including scientific papers and datasets, will be made accessible on trustworthy
thematicrepositories(e.g.,Zenodo,ENA,Dataverse)andaccessiblethroughAPIontheprojectwebsite. Particular at-
tentionwillbepaidtoavoidduplicationofidentifiersforappropriateidentification,citation,andre-use.
(v) Participation in open peer review: In the case of scientific articles, the peer review process will be as open as
possible, including practices such as open identities, open reports, and open participation. (vi) collaboration with the
stakeholdersandthemulti-actorapproachisakeyaspectofROTATES’soverallmethodology. Allrelevant stake-
holderswillbeengagedinco-creationincludingcitizens,customersandotherend-users.Thiswillbeachieved, for
example, through the work of pilot LLs, and product development food and feed companies.
1.2.7 Researchdatamanagement:
The following table summarises project compliance with FAIR principles. Accessibility will be ensured by open access
upon publication for all types of data. Re-usability is ensured with open licences –CC-BY-4.0 in all cases except for
analytical workflows where GPLv3 will be applied.
Data Findability Interoperability Curation
Genomic(Metabarcoding,Functional EuropeanNucleotide formats:fasta,fastq, CIRAD,CUT,UL
Genomics); type: text Archive (ENA) BED/GEF/GTF WP3, & 6
Phenotypic;type:observational, im- InstitutionalDataverse, formats:txt,csv, UMa
ages, text BreedBase jpeg, tiff, png WP3
Spatialprediction;type:numerical (ras-InstitutionalDataverse formats:tiff CIRAD
ter) WP4
Analyticalworkflows;type:text Forges(GitLab),saved formats:R,Python CIRAD
on Software Heritage scripts WP3,4
BiochemicalDataandRheological pa- InstitutionalDataverse formats:txt,csv, CREA
rameters; type: numerical MSD WP5
Livestockproducts InstitutionalDataverse, formats: txt, csv, ex- ICIA
type:images,text,numerical Zenodo cel,tiff,png,jpeg WP5
Communityandpopulationdata; InstitutionalDataverse formats:txt,csv CUT,CIRAD
type: numerical, images WP6
Soilanalyses(BioFuncTool®data) InstitutionalDataverse formats:csv INRAE
type: numerical WP6
Social,economicstudiesandsurveys InstitutionalDataverse, formats:txt,csv ITC,INRAE,CIRAD,
Pilot LLs needs and evaluation data; Zenodo, ENoLL
type: txt AsPredicted WP1,2, 4&7
ProcessinganduseofMRTresidues; InstitutionalDataverse, formats:txt,doc,csv, ICIA
type: images, text, numerical Zenodo excel, tiff, png, jpeg WP5
1.2.8Compliancewithethicalprinciplesandrelevantlegislation:
Members of the ROTATES consortium will ensure that the work undertaken within the framework of the project
complies withEU ethical standardsfor researchandinnovation.MRTcrops arefood resourceslistedinAnnex 1 of
the ITPGRFA. The regulations and legislation that apply in each country will be carefully examined along with the
management of personal data from social and economic studiesand surveys to comply with ITPGRFA and Nagoya
protocol. Researchinvolving animalswillbecarriedoutin accordance withthe EUapplicable rules andlegislation,
including Directive2010/63/EUontheprotection ofanimals usedfor scientificpurposes.Ethicalself-assessmentis
provided in ROTATES PART A, detailing ethical issues, the ethical dimension of the objectives, methodology and
impact and measures which will be taken to ensure compliance with ethical principles and relevant legislations.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26880 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
1.2.9DoNoSignificantHarm:
ROTATESwillcontributetotheenvironmentalobjective“protectionandrestorationofbiodiversityandecosystems” of
Regulation (EU) No 2020/852 (EU Taxonomy Regulation). The results of an initial assessment indicate that the project
does not include activities which could cause significant harm to any of the other five environmental objectives of the
Regulation as described in article 17,and the assessment will continue throughout the lifespan of the project. More
details are given in Ethical self-assessment in ROTATES PART A.
#§CON-MET-CM§# #§COM-PLE-CP§# #§REL-EVA-RE§#
2. IMPACT#@IMP-ACT-IA@#
2.1 Project’spathwaystowardsimpact
2.1.1 UniquenessofROTATEStowardsexpectedoutcomes
ROTATESwillproduceevidenceforallrelevantstakeholdersonthebenefits–andsite-specificactionstomaximise
these benefits –of MRT crops, which include positive environmental and socio-economic impacts as well as commer-
cial opportunities. The figure 1 showing the ROTATES overall concept in section 1.1 introduces the key resultsand
outcomesandidentifiesthedirectbeneficiaries.ThefollowingtablesshowhowROTATESwilldirectly contribute to
the six expectedoutcomes, namely: Increased evidence of the environmental benefits of minor crops (EO1);Farmers
make use of a wider rangeofcrops, and combinationofcrops (EO2);Minorcrops areintegratedin farming systems
promoting their environmental benefits (EO3); Increased resilience and climate adaptation of farmingsystemsvis-a-
visbioticandabioticstresses(EO4); Feedandfoodindustrymakeuseofminorcrops(EO5); Creation of new avenues
for farmers and value chains through a wider range of products (EO6).
Basketofalternativeanddiversifiedcroppingsystems,integratingMRT EO1;EO2;EO3;EO4
AsetofrecommendedagroecologicalcroppingsystemsthatintegrateMRTcropswithspecificguidelinesfor
farm management practices and optimisation of their benefits will support the effective incorporation of MRT
cropsinfarmingsystems.Thiswill produceevidencefor increasedresilienceandadaptationtoclimatechangeas
wellastobioticandabioticstresses(EO1).TheinclusionofMRTcropsinfarmingsystemsthroughintercropping or
crop rotations will enable the use of a wider range of crops and combination of crops (EO2). The ecosystem ser-
vicesprovidedwillbemonitoredandevaluated,enablingtailoredmanagementpracticesthatimproveyield, re-
silience, and sustainability (EO3). ROTATES will build farmers’ and agricultural professionals’ knowledge of the
role playedbyminor crops inthe provisionofecosystem services. Specific interventions will besuggested to farm-
erstoovercometheconstraintsandchallengesassociatedwiththeadoptionofMRTcrops(EO4).Toensure suc-
cessful development of alternative and diversified cropping systems, ROTATES will identify new plant material
andvaluabletraitsandproducestructureddata.Thiswillenhancebreedingoutcomesandresultin
geneticimprovementsinresponsetoenvironmentalandclimaticchallengesandensureaccesstomarkets.
KPIs: 20+ agroecological cropping systems tested, 10+ agroecological cropping systems recommended, 4
breeding hubs, scripts and workflows, guidelines identifying strategies for MRT value chains.
Direct beneficiaries: The scientific community; Crop and livestock farmers; Farming associations; MRT
breeders;Seedproducers;Otherprojectsandinitiatives;Localdecision-makers;Extensionservices(AKIS).
New food/feed products incorporating MRT crops; Cost-effective animal feed in-EO5;EO6
corporating MRT crops; Up-cycling of MRT wastes
ROTATESwillshowcasefoodproducedatthelaboratoryscale(glutenfreepasta,pastaandbreadwithlowgluten
content and plant-based ice-cream -TRL3 to TRL5-6-and feed products -ensiled, fresh, and dried -ready to be
scaledupfor themarket inthenear future,tofoodandfeedindustrystakeholders,pavingthewayfor their usein
otherprocessedfoodslikebiscuitsandjuices(EO5).Itwillproduceknowledgeonthenutritionalandnutraceutical
quality of MRT crops for use as livestock feed and on the nutritional, bio-functional and organoleptic quality of
derivedlivestockproducts(milk,cheese,meat,eggs)(EO5).ROTATESwillintroducenewmethodsforefficient
up-cycling of MRT waste that support the circular economy andtest and present effectivemethods for the useof
MRTcropsasfeedforcattle,smallruminantsandpoultry(EO6).Towidentherangeofproducts,ROTATESwill
create new recipes using raw and processed MRT. The most promising recipes will be published in culinary
booklets / guidelines and short videos in at least three languages. In all, ROTATES will create new avenues for
farmers and for value chains through a wider range of products (EO6).
KPIs:3newfoodproductsandsourcesoffeedfor4livestockcategoriesandby-productsthatcanbeincorporated in
the food and feed industry. Recipe booklets and videos will be produced.
Directbeneficiaries:Farmers,andbreeders;Foodandfeedprocessors;Agrifoodindustry;Farmingassociations;
Agricultural advisors, European citizens (consumers); NGOs; CSOs.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26881 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
New business case studies on raw and processed MRT crops produced in EO2;EO3;EO5;EO6
conventional and organic farming systems
ROTATES will enhance knowledge on research and innovation that will be delivered in the form of six business
case studies and guidelines and that will: (i) allow understand barriers to the adoption and development of MRT
crops at farm level and identification of key levers for their wider use by farmers (EO2 and EO3); (ii) identify and
characterise the barriers that hamper crop diversification at supply chain level in Europe and that have to be over-
come (EO3 and EO5) and (iii) identify effective strategies for the development of MRT value chains in Europeto
removebarrierstotheirincorporationatfarmandsupplychainlevel(EO2andEO3),increasedemand for food and
feed products (EO5) and identify business opportunities at all levels of the supply chain (EO6).
KPIs:6businesscasestudieswithcompletediagnosesofthechallengesandopportunitiesforMRTdevelopment;
and guidelines for the implementation of strategic policy interventions
Direct beneficiaries: Crop and livestock farmers; Farming associations; Consumers; Food and feed producers;
Foodandfeedprocessors;Seedproducers;Genebanks;Policymakers;Localdecision-makers;Extensionservices
(AKIS);Otherprojectsandinitiatives.
Structured open access data, scientific findings and new tools to unlock the full EO1;EO3;EO4;EO5
potential of MRT crops+ increasing MRT genetic resources in genebanks for
farmers and breeders
ROTATES will deliver open access databases on the performance of agroecological practices based on MRT crops
in conventional and organic agriculture and leverage dashboards which support data collection and/or data
packaging and monitoring in the 10 countries and the five outermost regions involved in the project. These data will
provide evidence of the effect of incorporating MRT crops on increased resilience and adaptation of farmingsystems
tobioticandabioticstresses(EO4).Modelsincludingdataonbiodiversity,soilhealth,andwater regulationforthe
effectivemanagement ofMRTs which allowanincreaseintheenvironmental benefits ofMRT crops will be deliv-
ered (EO1). Models and tools will be developed to predict (i) the suitability for processing of raw materials and
flours derived from the MRT crops tested in the project, and (ii) the nutritional, technological andsensorialquality
oftheresultingproducts(EO5).Scientificfindings,dataandworkflowswillbepublishedas peerreviewedpapers
inopen-accessjournalsandwarehousestosharetheknowledgeandreachawiderreadership (EO1, 4, 5). MRT
geneticresourceswill beenhancedand conservedin sevengenebanks that areaccessible to farmers and breed-
ers-assessed, enrichedand sanitised -, as evidence for the contribution of MRT crops to a wider range of crop
genetic resources and for the promotion of agrobiodiversity in production systems (EO3). Passportdataincluding
theperformanceofdifferentvarietieswillbeincludedinthegenebankdatabasesthereby
facilitatingaccesstowell-documentedgeneticresources(EO1).
KPIs: Datasets deposited in public repositories accessible under FAIR principles (cf. §1.2.7); 6 open access
databases on the performance of agroecologicalpractices based on MRT in conventional and organic systems.
MRTin7EUgenebanks;20+peer-reviewedscientificarticles;10+papersatinternationalscientificconferences.
Direct beneficiaries: The scientific community, Farmers and breeders, Agricultural advisors, Genebanks, The
agrifood industry, Seed producers, Living labs, other EU projects and initiatives
PolicyframeworkforphytosanitarycertificationofseedsystemsforMRTcrops; EO2; EO3; EO4; EO5;
Policy Recommendations for MRT along the value chain; Guidelines for MRT EO6
development, added value and adoption
ROTATES will provide phytosanitary recommendations for seed systems. The recommendations will increase
farmers’ knowledge about the propagation and distribution of safe genetic materials. In addition, the availability of
pathogen-tested material for farmers, seed suppliers and breeders will be improved. Safe material will lead to the
use of a wider range of crops by farmers (EO2). ROTATES will create a policy framework for a system of phy-
tosanitarycertificationfor MRTcropseeds showinghowthematerial canbe safelysharedbetweencountries, as
well as policy recommendations on supporting measures for MRT crop adoption both locally and in Europe, which
will provide policymakers with evidence for the environmental benefits of incorporating MRT crops in agrosystems
(EO3).ROTATESwillprovideinformationandrecommendationstofarmersandlivestockproducers ontheuseand
ontheprocessingoffeedmadefromMRTcrops(EO5).Thisisintendedtoincreaseknowledgeon crop develop-
ment, management and conservation of MRT crop by-products in the form of technical and
information guidelines and brochures (EO6). In this way, they will also become familiar with the nutritional and
sensory characteristics of the livestock products obtained.
KPIs: One policy framework, 4 Policy briefs, Guidelines for MRT use as food and MRT processing; a
Phytosanitary certification system for the seeds of at least two MRT crops.
Direct beneficiaries: Policymakers; Local decision-makers; Farming associations; Chambers of commerce;
(Agrifood) Industrial decision-makers.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26882 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
MethodologicalguidelinesforMAAandMRT-focusedLLs;Recommendationsfor EO2;EO3;EO6
MAA and MRT-focused LLs
ROTATES will establish a European multidisciplinary network of LLs on MRT crops involving all the actors of
thevaluechaintoenablethesharingofknowledge,dataandmaterialatinternationalscale.Forthefirsttime,it will
have brought together actors from continental countries and outermost regions, involving them in promoting
MRT crops (EO2, 3, 6). Knowledge exchange will be enabled through workshops and other events gathering all
the members of the network and sister projects, to create a sustainable structure and improved understanding among
MRT value chain stakeholders for better feedback to policy makers and better interconnection between EU conti-
nental and outermost regions. Stakeholder involvement will result in higher societal acceptance of the solutions
identified during the project. For an impact within the lifetime of the project and beyond, ROTATES will implement
new co-creation approaches under the umbrella of MAA methodology, horizontally and verticallyat local level, for
the pilot LLs. Guidelines and a MAA strategic framework for the
creationandrunningofLLswillbedisseminatedacrossEurope,supportedbyspecificevents(EO2,6).
KPIs: 100+ living labs on new management practices; one network on living labs on MRT crops; A total of 250
stakeholders engaged, ensuring balanced representation with at least 50 from each helix from quintuple helix
model.AtleasthalfthepilotLLswillevolveintopermanent,stable,andpotentiallycertifiedLLs.
Direct beneficiaries: Farmers and breeders; the Agri-food industry, Agricultural advisors, the Scientific
community, Policymakers, Extension services (AKIS), Civil society, LLs, Other EU projects and initiatives.
2.1.2 UniquenessofROTATEStowardswiderimpacts
Practicesinagricultureandforestrywillbedevelopedandimprovedtosupportandmakesustainabletheuseof
biodiversity and a wide range of ecosystems services.
ROTATESwilldevelopandpromoteagroecologicalpracticesinbothorganicandconventionalsystems,by
providingabasketofalternativeanddiversifiedcroppingsystems,integratingMRTcropsinEuropeanmainland
and outermost regions. Our activities will lead to crop diversification that encourage the use of diverse MRT
varieties, intercropping and crop rotation to improve climate resilience, reduce pest outbreaks, and improve soil
health.WewillpromoteagroforestrysystemsinpLL4-FrancethatincorporatetreesandMRTcropsinagricultural
landscapestoenhanceagrobiodiversity.Throughtheactivities whichwillbeimplementedinthetwoemblematic
rainforests, The Amazon (French Guiana) and the Congo (Republic of the Congo), we will contribute to Sustainable
Forest Management (SFM). We will produce evidence of actions that increase agrosystem biodiversity and oper-
ationalize European ambition to only import deforestation-free products from the two countries (withlessonsthat
can be applied to other forested countriesthat tradewith Europe). We will contribute
toincreasingagro-foodbiodiversityandtotheobjectivesoftheGreenDealandtheFarmtoForkstrategies.
Biodiversity,ecosystemservicesandnaturalcapitalwillbemainstreamedinthesocietyandeconomy:e.g.they
will be integrated into public and business decision-making; approaches for enabling transformative changes to
tackle societal challenges will be built including by deploying nature-based solutions (NBS).
ROTATESwillinvestinCapacityBuilding,byprovidingtrainingprogrammesforfarmers,foodandfeedactors
andthedifferentstakeholdersofthevaluechain,onsustainablepractices,agrobiodiversitymanagement,foodand
feed processing and on monitoring ecosystem services. Planned dissemination actions will play a pivotal role in
sharing knowledge, data,and innovations. It will ensure Multi-Stakeholder Collaboration so that actors have a
voice in decision-making processes and benefit from the sustainable management practices, provisioning and regu-
lating services. Consumers will be included in the different stages of the project as actors of the value chain. Policy
framework for phytosanitary certification of seed systems for MRT crops; Policy Recommendations for MRT along
the value chain; Guidelines for MRT development, added value and adoption will be delivered by ROTATES.
Duringtrainingsessions,messageswillbedeliveredontheimportanceofincludingagrobiodiversity indecision-
makingprocesses.WewilldeliversixbusinesscasestudiesonrawandprocessedMRTforfoodand feedproduced
inconventionalandorganicsystemsandinthisway,improvetheunderstandingoftheeconomic value of MRTs.
Mainstreaming of agrobiodiversity through the integration of MRT crops and the ecosystem servicesprovidedwill
alsobeconductedthroughinternationalcooperationandpartnerships.Wewillcreatea
networkonMRTcropsconnectingdifferentEuropeancountries.ThispartnershipwillincludecontinentalEurope
and outermost EU regions where activities will be conducted in a balanced manner.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26883 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
2.1.3 Scaleandsignificance
Agricultureoccupies morethan 38% of the world’sterrestrial surface 58and is themain driver of an estimated30% of
biodiversity loss worldwide59. MRT crops have the potential to reduce biodiversity loss by 2035, to preserve agrosys-
tems, and to enhance conservation and restoration actions.
ROTATESwillreachoutto40,000+farmers(80%conventionaland20%organicfarmers).Morethan200farmers
will be involved in testing and capacity building actions. We expect that 50%+ of the farmers who are directly involved
intheprojectwillgrowMRTcropsandadoptnewfarmmanagement practicesaftertheendoftheproject. ROTATES
will increase the adoption ofMRT cropsin European agriculturalsystems and support organic farming. Specifically,
we will:
 Quintuple the use of MRT crops produced in Europe in agrosystems and in food and feed value chains by
2035.
 Tripleper capita consumption of MRT-based food in Europe compared with current levels by 2035, with
benefits for public health.
 DoubletheproportionofproductioninorganicfarmingforMRTcropswhichwillreducetheuseofchemical
pesticides and fertilisers, reduce nutrient losses, and increase water use efficiency by 15% by 2035.
2.1.4 Identifiedrequirementsandpotentialbarriers
Environmentalbarriers:Extremeweatherconditionsorunforeseenagriculturaleffectsofclimatechange.Mitigation can
be achieved through collaboration with other sites and farms as well as extension of the duration of the project. Politi-
calbarriers:Insomecountriesthereisagenerallowlevelofagriculturalinnovationandgovernmentsubsidies that do
not support agroecology. Discussions with policymakers should lead to different subsidy measures.
Legalobstacles:Newregulationsorrestrictionsonthedistributionofgeneticmaterialmaybeintroducedduringthe
lifespan of the project. If adaptations are needed, they will be implemented.
Economicobstacles:(i) The currenthigher costofcultivationof MRTcropsthanof othercrops andtheintegration of
these new species into culinary and food habits could be problematic. However, the aim of agronomicresearch will be
both to increasecrop yields and reduce production costs. The LLs will highlight the healthiness of theMRT products
and how they can be incorporated in dietary habits. (ii) competition for the land between agriculture and urbanisation,
(iii)push for cash crops and limited public and private support for MRT crops, (iv) MRT crop shelf-life, which is very
important for market access and raw material availability, could be a problem. The consortium will network with
ongoing European and international projects on this topic to implement the latest innovations.
Cultural barriers:The cultivation of certain MRT crops may be completely unknown to farmers. The implementation
of the MAA approach, showcasing of the benefits of MRT crops and their promotion should help avoid this issue.
Additionally, the fact that some of the pilot LLs will be located in regions where the minor crops were grown in the
past will also facilitate the re-emergence of these crops.
2.2 Measures to maximise impact -Dissemination, exploitation and communication #@COM-DIS-VIS-CDV@#
To support the pathway to impact, ROTATES will develop a comprehensive and innovative strategy for the
dissemination, exploitation, and communication (DEC) of the project outcomes. This strategy will be carefully
crafted to engage a wide range of stakeholders, including farmers, industry partners, policymakers, and the
consumers. To this end, five levels of DEC actions have been identified and are summarised in the Graph below.
2.2.1 Targetgroupandstakeholders
Apreliminarystakeholderanalysishasalreadybeenconductedtoassesstheprimarytargetgroupstogetinvolvedto
achieveeffective communication,useanddissemination ofthe projectresults,and thesestakeholders weregrouped in
thefivecategoriesofthe5Hmodel:academia,industry,government,civilsociety,andenvironment.Thisanalysis is
summarised the following table, specifying the key actors, the proposed value, and the relevant Key Exploitable
58Ramankutty et al. Global Biogeochemical 59 Sala et al. Science 2000
Cycles 2008
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26884 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Results(KER)detailedin§2.2.2,foreachHelix.
5H KeyActors KERs
Publicsector National/regional agricultural ministries; Environmental protection KER6,7, 8,9, 10
agencies;Localgovernments;Researchfundingbodies;Regulatorybodies;
Policymakers,PublicAgriculturaladvisors.
Industry Agricultural businesses; Private agricultural advisors, Food/Feed KER3,4,5,8,9,
(processing) companies; Seed producers; Genebanks; Innovation hubs; 10
Exporters and importers.
Academia Research institutions: Agricultural and Environment universities; Socio-eco- KER8,9,10
nomic departments, Food science, Feed science, Agricultural colleges; Agri-
food vocational educational institutes.
Civil society Farmers andbreeders;Citizensandconsumers;Agricultural cooperatives KER1,2, 8,9, 10
and users and farmer associations; Consumer advocacy groups; NGOs; Community
Groups; local rural communities.
Environment Environmental Organisations; Sustainability experts; Climate Research In-KER2,6,7,8,10,
stitutions. 11
2.2.2 Keyresults–protectionandexploitation
ROTATES outcomes and impacts will be achieved via the delivery of KERs that represent the starting point of the
various pathways to impact through their DEC. The table below presents a preliminary analysis of the expected results
with high exploitation potential and that contribute directly to the impact of ROTATES. For each KER, the table
identifies: (i) the most relevant target groups, (ii)the partner(s) with ownership, and interestedin further KER exploi-
tation (Expl); (iii) the applicable protection measure and an exploitation route; (iv) the relevant WP.
KER1. Description of cropping systems (10+), Scientific publications CIRAD, INIAV, UMa, INRAE,
with open data, analytical workflows CUT, PNKH, UMNG, ENoLL
C:Farmersandbreeders;A:Academia WP3,4, 6
Protec/Expl:Copyright,CC-BY-4.0,workflows:GPLv3
FurtherresearchandMRTpromotionwillbedonebyresearchersandfarmers’associations,agriculturaladvisers.
The farmers will be using the description of the cropping systems to be implemented.
Scientific data will be transformedand translated into improved training, practical demonstrations and guidelines
for farmers to support adoption. Protocols, datasets and scientific papers on social, economic, and cultural infor-
mation for MRT adoption will be used throughout the value chain. The experimental economic surveys and protocols
will be available via open access to the scientific community/academia for replication and improvement of the
scientific methodology. Information on social, economic and cultural barriers and enablers of the
developmentofMRTswillbefreelyusablebyacademia.
KER2.NewMRTgeneticresourcesingenebanks(20+percrop) CIRAD,PNKH,UMa,INIAV
I:Farmersandbreeders;A:Academia WP3
Protec/Expl:Thegeneticmaterialwillremainundertheownershipofthecountrywhereitiscollected.
Thegeneticmaterialandthepassportdatawillbeprovidedtothegenebanks.Thedatawillalsobedepositedinthe
genebanks’ data repository. Genebanks will supply the genetic material to research organisations, farmers and breed-
ers free of charge. If replication is needed, costs will be charged with the cost of shipment. Further research and
testingwillbedonebyresearchers,andfurthertesting,andincorporationoftheMRTwillbedonebyfarmers
andbreeders.
KER3.NewfoodproductsincorporatingMRTcrops CREA,UMa,CIRAD
I: Agrifood industry; Pasta-bread-ice-cream companies, A: Academia, I: WP5
Farmers and breeders
Protec/Expl: New food products will reach the lab experimental stage and the validation stage in pilot plants belong-
ing to the project partners. Patent or other IP protection such as utility model will be considered (probably after the
project ends).
Research publications will be produced for open access with an open CC license. Knowledge will be used for further
research by the Research &Innovation departments of companies. After scientific publications, public manifestation
ofinterestforthecommercialexploitationoftheresultswillbeopenedfortheindustry.Thirdparties can also express
their interest in exploiting the food formulations(pasta, bread and ice-cream companies will be
contacted–suchcollaborationisalreadyunderway,withforexample,Barilla,Fornovecchino,VerdiTerre,Eocene,
Pirro, FRIIC –Gelados de Fruta da Madeira.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26885 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
KER4.FeedprocessesofMRTby-products ICIA,UAc,AUA
I:Agrifoodindustry,A:Academia,I:Farmersandbreeders WP5
Protec/Expl: Patents or other IP protection such as utilitymodelswill be considered (probablyafterproject ends).
Researchpublicationswillbeproducedforopenaccess.Knowledgewillbeusedforfurtherresearchbyresearchers
on MRT processing. Afterscientific publications, public manifestation ofinterestforthe commercial exploitation of
theresultswillbeopenedfortheindustry.Feedcompaniescanthendotheirowntestingandputtheproducts
onthemarket.FarmersandbreederswillbeintegratingMRTintheirlivestockfeedingpractices.
KER5.Trainingmaterial,web-basedcontent AllandENoLL,ITC
A: Academia, I: Agrifood industry, E: Environment, I: Farmers, G: WP1,2,4,5,6,7
Government, C: Civil society & Users
Protec/Expl:Copyright(diagramsetc),CC-BY-NC-SA4.0
Knowledgewillbeusedinfurthertrainingcoursesandeducationalprogrammes(vocational,adulteducationand
master classes). Farmers will be using the description of cropping systems to be implemented for their own
purposes. The training material will remain available on the project’s website and Horizon Results Platform.
KER6. Policy framework and recommendations for phytosanitary UL,INRAE,INIAV,UAc,CUT
certification of seed systems for MRT crops
G:Policymakers;relevantauthorities WP3
Protec/Expl:Copyright,CC-BY-4.0
Evidence-based policymaking - where local government and relevant national authorities will be applying the
framework. KER2 will serve as evidence.
KER7.Policyrecommendations/briefsforMRTalongthevaluechain Allpartners
G: Policymakers; local decision-makers; farming associations, I: Industry, C: WP2
Civil society –customer groups
Protec/Expl:Copyright,CC-BY-4.0
Evidence-based policymaking –where value chain members, e.g. industry and farmers’ associations will be applying
thefindings.Thepolicyrecommendationsfortheimplementationofstrategicinterventionsandconcrete solutions
(e.g: labels, incentives, types of investment, market targets, types of partnerships) to foster the
developmentofMRTswillbeusedforimplementation.
KER 8. Business case studies and guidelines for MRT development, CIRAD,ICIA,UAc,AUA,ENoLL
added value and adoption andITC
Alltargets,G,I,A,C,E RelevantWP
Protec/Expl:Copyright,CC-BY-4.0
Business case studies will be made available and presented to the farmers and intermediaries in LLs and other inno-
vation hubs and clusters. The case studies will include a complete diagnosis of the challenges to and opportunities
for the development of MRTs in their area.Guidelines for the implementation of strategic policy actionsandconcrete
solutions(e.g.labels,incentives,typesofinvestment,markettargets,typesofpartnerships)to
foster the development of MRTs will be identified for implementation by governments (G), industry (I) and civil
society (C) and environmental organisations (E).
KER9.MethodologicalguidelinesforMAAandMRT-focusedLLsand ENoLL,ITC
Recommendations for MAA and MRT-focused LLs
Alltargets,G,I,A,C,E WP1,WP7
Protec/Expl:Copyright,CC-BY-NC-SA4.0
Knowledge will be used in other living labs and other agri-food projects implementing MAA; Results will be incor-
porated ininternal service portfolios of ENoLL and used in futuretraining programmes by ENoLL andITC. The
guidelines will be available on the project website and Horizon Results Platform.
Evidence-baseddecision-makinganduseofrecommendationsinotherLivingLabsandotheragri-foodprojects
that implement MAA; Support the positioning of LLs in the EU agenda to promote co-creation, evidence-based open
innovation and growth of initiatives at European level adopting the MAA and LL approach.
2.2.3 Dissemination&communication(D&C)
The D&C strategy in the DEC plan will be designed in line with the 5W+1H approach to effectively reach out to target
groups and stakeholders, thereby prolonging theimpact beyond the end of the project,making project results known
to those who could benefit from them or who could support further development and deployment, thus increasing
sectoralcoverageanduseoftheproposedsolutions(“Why”).Theplanwillfurtherdefinethekeyresults and outputs
of the project (“What”), map the target groups in more detail (“Who”), identify the most appropriate channels
(“Where”), and define the specific activities to undertake (“How”) and their time plan (“When”).
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26886 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Dissemination will actively support and promote the future successful exploitation of the project results, whose uptake
andusewillbemeasuredduringandaftertheendoftheproject.Theplanisbasedonamultichannelstrategy, combining
offline and online communication, with specific and ambitious targets and metrics/KPIs, and a detailed plan included
in the DEC plan (D7.2) to be submitted at the first semester of the project.
Dissemination Goals,targetindicators
ROTATESevents Final ROTATES conferences [1] and hands-on workshops [1+] on project results will
be organised alongside a major EU-level event (see below), to promote awareness and
create opportunities for collaboration at European level
MAAevents Theco-creationofeventswillengagemembersfromallhelixesinthepilotregions
Capacity-buildingevents Trainingmaterialswillbeopenlyavailablepotentiallyinmorelanguagesdepending
on the final capacity-building programme in WP4, 7
EU/International-level events Participation in EU-level events with poster, stands, and/or presentations for
promotion of project and results and for networking [10+].
Forum for the Future of Agriculture (ForumforAg), European Biodiversity confer-
ence, European Mission Soil Week, Open Living Lab Days, ISPIM Conference, EU
Agri Research conference, etc.
Scientificpublications Theresultsoftheprojectwillbedisseminatedtothescientificcommunitybymeans
of publications in open access and high impact journals [20+], presentations at con-
ference and in conference proceedings [10+], as well as in open and FAIR
datasets[5+].
Indicative conferences: International Triennial Symposium of the International Soci-
ety for Tropical Root Crops (ISTRC); Plant & Animal Genome conference (PAG);
The European Federation of Food Science and Technology (EFFoST); European
Federation of Animal Science (EAAP), European Association of Agricultural Econo-
mists (EAAE), AI4SoilHealth.
Indicativejournals:NatureFood(IF23),MolecularPlant(IF17.1),NaturePlants
(IF15.793),ScienceAdvances(IF11.7),LWT(IF6),FieldCropsResearch(IF6.1),
Foodpolicy(IF6.8),AgriculturalEconomics(IF4)
Industry meetings and The results of ROTATES will also be disseminated to the industrial community
presentations throughpresentations,articles,andinformationtobedisseminatedbyallROTATES
partners involved in industrial networks as well as at keyrelevant events.
Indicative industry meetings: Paris International Agricultural show, The Interna-
tional Pastaria festival, Food Technology and Processing, International Production
& Processing Expo (IPPE)
Policyeventsandmeetings At EU level, the public sector will be addressed through policy recommendations and
replicable guidelines to stimulate adoption of the results of the project and effective
uptake across Europe. Joint statements with other Soil Mission and
Agrifoodprojectswillhelpdisseminatetherecommendationsandtheguidelines.
Publicsectoratlocallevel Specificationsfordisseminationactivitiesfortheprivatesectoratlocallevelwillbe
defined by the individual pilot LL/value chains in alignment with the DEC plan. Other
European LLs and farming associations will support the spread of MAA
methods,bestpracticesandtrainingmaterials.
Localcommunity Each partner will undertake local dissemination actions, the specifications about these
actions will be defined in the individual action plans of the pilot LL/value chains
e.g. AISTEC_ Associazione Italiana Scienza e Tecnologia Dei Cereali_ Meeting
(heldevery two years –all countries will identify.
ECTools Horizon Results Platform, Zenodo and EU Academy platforms will be used for wider
disseminationofthekeyreports,recommendationsandtrainingmaterials.The Horizon
Results Booster services may further support the dissemination and
exploitationofthe6businesscasestudies.
Jointdisseminationactions Allprojectsfundedunderthetopicwilljoinforcesandimplementclusteringactions
with clustering projects (joint campaigns, attendance or organisation of events, joint statements etc)
SOILL and PREPSOIL (Mission Soil), FARCLIMATE (Mission Climate),
CLIMAGEN (NEB), BlueMissionMed (Mission Ocean), Agroecology partnership
Dedicatedresourcesandtasks(T7.4)areenvisagedforcrossprojectcooperation.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26887 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
TheDECactionswillincludethefoursisterprojectsfundedunderH2020,andthesisterprojectwhichwillbefunded by
the same call (HORIZON-CL6-2024-BIODIV-02-3-two-stage), several European initiatives funded under Horizon
Europe,PRIMA,etc.,aswellaswithotherprojectsimplementedintheoutermostEUregionsandinAfrica.
Communication.AsidefromdisseminationactionstoboostexploitationandimpactsofROTATES,theprojectand its
results will be presented to a wider European and international audience. See a short overview below:
Comm.tool Targetcommunities Performanceindicators
Publicwebsite General public, investment groups, end- +2000visitsbytheendoftheproject
users
Socialmedia LinkedIn, X, Instagram and YouTube 2000+ followers on social media
relevant stakeholders investmentgroups, end-users, public
sector, related initiative, and other EU
funded projects
Informationmaterial Allexternalstakeholders Printed:atleast15eventswheretheroll-up
is displayed, and 500 flyers distributed.
Press releases and General public, investment groups, end- Biannual press-releases and quarterly
newsletter users newsletters
Partners’ websites and Existingnetworks At least 30 links/articles by the end of the
newsletters project
Newspapers, magazines, Allexternalstakeholders 5+articlesconcerningtheprojectpublished
e-media in non-specialised publications
Videosandinterviews Allexternalstakeholders 5+videosand3specificvideosonthenew
recipes based on MRT crops, and
interviewsonthewebsiteandinthemedia
2.2.4 IPmanagement
TheknowledgegeneratedintheprojectwillbemanagedaccordingtotherulesoftheDESCAConsortiumAgreement
(CA), which will besignedat the beginning of theproject (WP8). The CA will address background andforeground
knowledge, ownership, proprietary third-party components, protection, use and dissemination of results and access
rights.InlinewiththeCA,ROTATESbackgroundandforegroundIPwillbemanagedunderTask7.3"Exploitation,
replicability,recommendationsandpolicycontribution".Themostappropriateprotectionstrategyandmeasureswill be
selected duringthe project, but ROTATES partnerswant to pursue open science solutions. Preliminary plans for result
protection are included in Key results –protection and exploitation. The choice will depend on the nature and spe-
cific characteristics of the results under consideration and the objectives of the IP owner(s) at the time. The Data
Management Plan will explain how research data will be managed in accordance with the FAIR principles. ROTATES
supports open access to scientific publications, models, tools and data. In this way, the results willbe made available
for further research. The background information and knowledge contributed to the project by each participant will be
listed in the CA. Background information will be made freely available to other participants for the implementation of
the project tasks. Foreground knowledge is the property of the partner who created it. Each partner is responsible for
ensuring that its obligations under the CA in relation to results are met by planning with any third parties whomay
claim rights tothem. Results producedjointly bytwo or more participants will beshared betweentheparticipantswho
carriedoutthework.Thetermsofjointownership,protectionandsharingofownership, and the costs of any protection,
will be agreed in writing in a joint ownership agreement. Each participant is responsibleforinvestigatingthepossibil-
itiesofprotectingresultsthatcanbecommerciallyorindustriallyexploited. In deciding on protection, the participant
must take into account its own legitimate interests and the interests of the other participants.
#§COM-DIS-VIS-CDV§#
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26888 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566
yrammuS
3.2
NOITCESTCAPMIEHTFOTNEMELEYEK
SERUSAEMC&E
&D
STLUSERDETCEPXE
SDEENCIFICEPS
doof
dna deef
fo
noitatiolpxe
laicremmoC
:noitatiolpxE
gnipporc
deifisrevid
dna
evitanretla
fo
teksaB
•
detroppus,smetsysgnipporcTRMrofdeeN•
no
smetsysorga
ni
sporc
TRM
fo
noitaroprocnI
;stcudorp
-dulcni
,secivres
metsysoce
esimixam
taht
smetsys
-orp
tfihs
ot ,seiteirav
,sloot
,egdelwonk
,atad
yb
-irgarehtoni
egdelwonkgnicnavdA;eporuEni
smrafrehto
-igoloceorga
rof
snoitadnemmocer
+01
htiw
TRM
gni
etamilc
dna
lacigoloceorga
sdrawot
noitcud
-dA
;ytinummoc
cifitneics
eht
ni
dna
sbuh
noitavonni
doof
smetsys
gnipporc
lac
esu
edicitsep
gnicuder
ybereht
,smetsys
trams
-otyhp
no gnikamycilop
desab-ecnedive
dna
seicilop
gnicnav
,sgnidnif
cifitneics
,atad
ssecca
nepo
derutcurtS
•
.sessol
tneirtun
dna
rofdna
sporc
TRM
rof
smetsys
dees
fo
noitacifitrec
yratinas
lluf
eht
reviled
ot sloot
wen
dna
sledom
noitciderp
-ni
yb
emocni
’sremraf
yfisrevid
ot deeN•
otC&D
.TRMfonoitpodadnaeulavdedda,tnempolevedeht
sporc
TRM
fo
laitnetop
-ed
eht
gnisaercni
yb TRM
fo
eulav
eht
gnisaerc
-ca
niahc-eulavtnereffiddnayrtsudnidoof-irga,sremraf
deef
dna
)doof
yhtlaeh
fo
seirogetac
3( doof
weN•
dna
,niahc
eulav
eht
tuohguorht
meht
rof dnam
bal
gnivil
;sriaf
lairtsudni
dna
larutlucirga
,spohskrow
:srot
-ogetac
kcotsevil
4
rof
gnissecorp
TRM(
stcudorp
.esu
rieht
repmah
taht srotcaf
eht
gnitagitim
yb
-orp
gnidliub-yticapac
,stneve
dna
swen
SETATOR
,stneve
-oprocni
deef
lamina
;sporc
TRM
gnitaroprocni
)seir
-fid
rof
snoitadnemmocer
deroliat
rof
deeN
•
.seinapmoc
deef/doof
reggib
htiw
sgniteeM
.emmarg
setsawTRMfognilcyc-pU;sporcTRMgnitar
no
)srekamycilopgnidulcni(sredlohekatstneref
-atneserp
;selcitra
cifitneics
:ytinummoc
cifitneics
ot
C&D
poleved
ot
woh
gniwohs
seiduts
esac
ssenisuB
6
•
-niam
no
,lairetam
TRM
fo
egnahcxe
efas
eht
-hsad
,SIG ,stesatad
;stneve
cifitneics
ta
sretsop
dna
snoit
dnadoofdessecorpdnawar_sniahceulavdesab-TRM
-poleved
no ,secitcarp
lacigoloceorga
gnimaerts
krow
puorgyrosivdadnaspuorggnikrow,swolfkrow,sdraob
-sysorga
lanoitnevnoc
ni
dna
cinagro
ni
decudorp
deef
fo
gnissecorp
levon
no
dna
sniahc
eulav
gni
.ecnerefnoc
lanif
,stcejorp
ni
smet
.TRM
fo
noitomorp
,ytilibacilper
:srekamycilop
sdrawot
C&D
fonoitacifitrecyratinasotyhprofkrowemarfyciloP•
-ac
TRM
naeporuE
nehtgnerts
ot
deeN
•
trepxe
dna spuorg
gnikrow
,sgniteem
dna
stneve
ta
senilediug
TRM
rof
snoitadnemmoceR
yciloP
;smetsys
dees
ni
dna
gnimraf
,gnideerb
ni
gnidliub
yticap
selbatdnuor
,spuorg
rof
senilediuG
,sfeirb
yciloP
;niahc
eulav
eht
gnola
.tnempoleved
deef
dna
doof
,aidem
laicos
,etisbew
:yteicossdrawotnoitacinummoC
.niahc-eulav
TRM
ehtfo
tnempoleved
TRM
rof
krowten
detanidrooc
a rof
deeN
•
,lairetam
oidua/oediv/txet
fo
noitomorp
,senizagam
,sserp
-TRMdnaAAMrofsenilediuglacigolodohteM•
tcennocsid
tnerruc
eht
sa ,eporuE
ni sporc
.srettelswen
rentrap
dna
AAM
rof
snoitadnemmoceR
;sLL
desucof
,sremraf
,srossecorp
,seinapmoc
dees
gnoma
sLL
desucof-TRM
-onni
dna
ssergorp
gnirednih
si
srehcraeser
dna
.noitav

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26889 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566
STCAPMI
SEMOCTUO
SPUORGTEGRAT
otsthgisnidnaatadwenfonoitcudorP:stcapmicifitneicS
rof
snoitulos
dna
srevird
yek
fo
gnidnatsrednu
denepeeD
•,srecudorp
dees
,sredeerb
,sremraF
•
secnavda
evirD
.secitcarp
gnimraf
TRM
evitavonni
poleved
-id
porc
dna
sporc
TRM
gnitpoda
ot
sreirrab
gnimocrevo
srosivda
larutlucirgA
,sknabeneG
,ecnatsiser
deewdna
tsep
,ecneiliser
etamilc
rof
gnideerb
ni
.noitacifisrev
,snoitasinagro
hcraeser
larutlucirgA
•
TRM gnilacs
rof
seigetarts
erutuf
mrofnI
.ssecca
tekram
dna
decnavda
dna
,seigetarts
noitator
,ytisrevid
porc
dednapxE
•
seitisrevinu
dna
segelloc
.smetsysorga
naeporuE
ni
noitargetni
.smetsysorga
ni
secitcarp
tnemeganam
lacigoloceorga
.yrtsudni)gnissecorp(deefdnadooF
•
5REK;4REK;3REK;2REK;1REK
-negohtap
htiw
sknabenegni
ytisrevid
citeneg
desaercnI
•doofirgA
;spuorg
ycacovda
remusnoC
•
-id dna
nehtgnertS
:stcapmi
lacigolonhceT
dna
cimonocE
,sreilppusdees,sremrafotelbisseccaylidaerslairetameerf
larur
lacol
;spuorG
ytinummoC
;sOGN
-oce evird
,stcudorp
deef
dna
doof
rof sniahc
eulav
yfisrev
.sredeerb
dna
seitinummoc
-inutroppo
tekram
ehcin
kcolnu
dna noitacifisrevid
cimon
dnasremrafgnoma
esitrepxedna
ssenerawa
decnahnE
•:seidob
gnikamycilop
dna
yrotalugeR
•
-me yb
ytivitcudorp
dna
ecneiliser
larutlucirga
ecnahnE
.seit
dna
noitator
porc
evitceffe
,sporc
TRM
gnisu
ni
sredeerb
-ne
;seidob
gnidnuf
hcraeser
,srekamycilop
yb detroppus
oiloftrop
porc
redaorb
a htiw
sremraf
gnirewop
.lairetam
citeneg
efas
fo
noitubirtsid
dna
,gnipporcretni
seicnega
doof-irga
dna
latnemnoriv
dna htworg
cimonoce
etareleccA
.metsys
dees
TRM
tsubor
a
dna
noisulcni
eht
hguorht
sniahc
eulav
lacol
denehtgnertS
•
snezitic,sresu-dnE
•
stnemtsevni
lacigolonhcet
desaercni
hguorht
ytilibaniatsus
.sporc
TRM
fo
gnissecorp
.noitavonni
dna hcraeserporcTRMni
-orp
sLL
tolip
htiw
,sbal
gnivil
fo
noitingocer
retaerG
•
,8REK;4REK;3REK
.airetircLLoNEhtiwecnailpmoc
llufsdrawotgnisserg
-aniatsus
dna
ytisrevid
yrateid
ecnahnE
:stcapmi
lateicoS
-ceffe eroM
.gnieb-llew
dna
htlaeh
namuh
evorpmi
ot
,ytilib
ni TRM
fo
noisulcni
eht
enilmaerts
ot seicilop
demrofni
evit
-iretam
TRM
fo
egnahcxe
eht
dna
smetsys
gnimraf
gnitsixe
.sla
9REK,7REK;6REK;1REK
yb detroppus
snoitanibmoc
porC
:stcapmi
latnemnorivnE
-oib foesuelbaniatsusotgnidaelmetsysdeesTRMnaelca -sysoce
fo
egnar
ediw
a
fo yreviled
evitceffe
dna
ytisrevid
tnemeganam
eerf-noitatserofed
rof seigetarts
;secivres
met
.secitcarp
6REK;2REK;1REK
#§AI-TCA-PMI§#

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26890 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
3.QUALITYANDEFFICIENCYOFTHEIMPLEMENTATION#@QUA-LIT-QL@# #@WRK-PLA-WP@#
3.1 Workplanandresources
3.1.1 OverallstructureoftheROTATESworkplan
ROTATES’s workplan is structuredinWPsthat givethe actors(WP1) and the valuechain(WP2) acentral roleto
ensuretheinvolvementofthestakeholdersandusersinco-creation,co-innovationandco-validationalongthevalue
chains, in WPs dedicated to the deployment of starchy MRT in the European agrosystems to ensure their benefits
(WP3,4and5)andaWP7dedicatedtocapacitybuilding,dissemination,exploitationandcommunicationtoensure
theadoptionofMRTcropsbeyondthelifespanoftheproject.Toensureefficientmanagementoftheprojectandthat
EU requirements are met, WP8 will be dedicated to project management and coordination.
3.1.2 ROTATESplanning
Table3.1a: Listofworkpackages
No WorkPackageTitle
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566
daeL.oN .picitraP
daeLemaN
.picitraP
-nosreP shtnoM
tratS
htnoM
htnomdnE
1 MultiActorApproachimplementationformulti-actor engage- 15 ITC 69.5 1 48
ment
2 Valuechaindevelopmentforadoptionandnewmarket 12 SRUC 55.6 1 48
opportunities
3 GermplasmdiversityandSanitationStrategiestoFacilitate 6 UMa 170.5 1 48
MRT Access and Innovative Breeding initiatives
4 Agroecologicalintensificationofstarchyminorrootand tuber 1 CIRAD 93.5 1 48
crop-based systems
5 AdvancementofstarchyMinorRootandTubercropsfor 9 CREA 112.5 1 48
Food and Feed Processing
6 DeliveryofEcosystemServicesbyMRTcropsandcrop man- 4 CUT 78.5 1 48
agement practices
7 DECandCapacitybuilding 14 ENoLL 52 1 48
8 CoordinationandManagement 1 CIRAD 51.5 1 48
TOTAL 686

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26891 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566
trahcttnaGSETATOR3.1.3
4raeY
3raeY
2raeY
1raeY
gninnalP
21
11
01
9
8
7
6
5
4
3
2
1
21
11
01
9
8
7
6
5
4
3
2
1
21
11
01
9
8
7
6
5
4
3
2
1
21
11
01
9
8
7
6
5
4
3
2
1
dnEM
tratSM
redaeL
sksaT/segakcapkroW
84
1
CTI
tnemegagnerotca-itlumrofnoitatnemelpmihcaorppArotcAitluM1
1.1D
21
1
LLoNE
hcaorppalacigolodohtemLL&AAM1.1
84
01
CTI
noitatnemelpmi
dnasnalp
noitcA2.1
2.1D
84
31
CTI
noitaulavE&gnirotinoM3.1
84
1
CURS
seitinutroppotekramwendna
noitpodaroftnempoleved
niahceulaV2
1.2D
9
1
CURS
stxetnoclanoitareposniahceulavTRMfocitsongaiD1.2
52
01
EARNI
sniahceulavTRMevitatneserper6nohcraeserhtped-nI2.2
2.2D
24
42
EARNI
sniahceulavsTRM6ehtrofsnoitadnemmocercigetartsfotnempoleveD3.2
3.2D
84
24
CURS
tnempolevedniahceulav’sTRMrofsenilediugfonoitcudorP4.2
84
1
aMU
gnideerB
evitavonnIdnasseccATRMrofseigetartSnoitatinaS,ytisrevidmsalpmreG3
2.3D
1.3D
63
1
dariC
TRMfonoitavreserpytisrevidoibdnanoitcellocmsalpmreG
1.3
4.3D
3.3D
84
6
aMU
seidutsciteneg
dnasdohtemgnipytonehp
decnavdafotnemyolpeD
2.3
6.3D
5.3D
84
3
egeiLU
noitcudorpelbaniatsus
rofmetsys
deesnaelC
3.3
84
1
dariC
smetsysdesab-porcrebut
dna
toorronimyhcratsfonoitacifisnetnilacigoloceorgA
4
1.4D
21
1
dariC
smetsys
noitcudorpTRMtnerrucfocitsongaidcimonorgA
1.4
4.4D3.4D2.4D
4.4D3.4D2.4D
4.4D3.4D2.4D
84
5
TUC
retawgnisaercnismetsysgnipporcdesab-TRMevitanretlafognitsetnoitats-nodnangiseD
2.4
84
5
VAINI
ehtgnitomorpsmetsysgnipporcdesab-TRMevitanretlafognitsetnoitats-nodnangiseD
3.4
84
5
GNMU
-orezgnitomorpsmetsysgnipporcdesab-TRMevitanretlafognitsetnoitats-nodnangiseD
4.4
5.4D
84
31
DARIC
sbaLgniviLhguorhtsmetsysgnipporcdesab-TRMfognilacsdnanoitatpadamraf-nO
5.4
6.4D
6.4D
6.4D
84
31
aMU
detadilav
dna
detaerc-ocsmetsysgnipporcevitavonnieht
nosremrafgniniarT
6.4
84
1
AERC
gnissecorPdeeFdnadooFsporcrebuTdnatooRroniM
yhcratsfotnemecnavdA
5
1.5D
42
1
EARNI
TRMfonoitaziretcarahcslacimehcotyhpdnalacisyhP
1.5
2.5D
63
42
AERC
sdoofniTRMfognissecorP
2.5
4.5D
3.5D
04
1
AICI
stcudorp-ybfotnemssessaytilauqdnagnissecorpdeeF
3.5
5.5D
84
42
CIRLI
slamina
def-TRM
fostcudorp
kcotsevil
dnasdoofdesab-TRM
foecnatpeccasremusnoC
4.5
84
1
TUC
secitcarptnemeganamporcdnasporcTRMybsecivreS
metsysocEfoyrevileD
6
1.6D
4
1
TUC
tnemssessAenilesaBdnagniniarTseigolodohteM
1.6
54
5
DARIC
tnemssessAytisrevidoiB
2.6
3.6D2.6D
54
1
EARNI
htlaehlioS
3.6
84
31
TUC
gnilledoMdnanoitargetnI
4.6
4.6D
84
1
LLoNE
gnidliub-yticapaC&noitatiolpxE,noitanimessiD
7
1.7D
84
1
LLoNE
gnidliuByticapaCeligA
1.7
2.7D
84
1
LLoNE
noitacinummocdna
noitanimessiD
2.7
3.7D
84
4
LLoNE
ycilopotnoitubirtnocdna,snoitadnemmocer,ytilibacilper,noitatiolpxE
3.7
84
1
LLoNE
evitaitinidetalerhtiwnoitaroballocdnaseigrenyS
4.7
84
1
dariC
tnemeganaM&noitanidrooC
8
1.8D
1.8D
1.8D
1.8D
84
1
dariC
lortnocytilauqdnassergorpgnirotinoM
1.8
84
1
dariC
noitanidrooclaicnanifdnaevitartsinimdA
2.8
84
1
dariC
nalpecnarussaytilauqdnatnemeganamtcejorP
3.8
2.8D
2.8D
2.8D
84
1
dariC
tnemeganamatadhcraeseR
4.8
84
1
dariC
sgniteemmuitrosnocfonoitasinagrodna
noitanidrooC
5.8
84
1
dariC
noitanidrooc
scihtE
6.8

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26892 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Table3.1b:Workpackagedescription
Workpackagenumber 1
Workpackagetitle MultiActorApproachimplementationformulti-actorengagement
Objectives
 DevelopaframeworktoimplementtheMAA
 ImplementtheMAA,especiallyinpilotLLsandmonitortheirprogress
 EstablishadynamicworkflowforcontinuouscommunicationbetweenthisWPandotherstoensurethe
MAA at all levels.
Descriptionofwork
Task1.1:ROTATESMAA&LLmethodologicalapproach(M1-M12;Leader:ENoLL(6PM),contributors:
all Partners)
CreateacomprehensiveandstructuredROTATESmethodologicalframework(D1.1)toeffectivelyguidetheMAA
andLLapproachthroughoutprojectimplementationaimednotonlyatsupportingtheinvolvementofmultipleactors in
the co-creation process (MAA) but also structuring this approach in the context of a long-term and stable open inno-
vationecosystem(LL).Thisframeworkwilldetailtheprinciples,methods,andtoolsrequiredtoimplementthe MAA
within the project, with particular emphasis on pilot levels. In parallel, the framework will define the ROTATES
monitoringframework,withdetailedKPIsandstructurestomonitorthelevelofalignmenttobothMAA and LL meth-
odologies, as well as the impact of these in the specific pilot/context. The creation of the framework will follow these
steps: desk research and analysis of the literature, state of the art and tools; co-creation with WP and Pilot partners,
including mapping stakeholders; validation of the approach and tools through workshops to increase acceptance; and
preparation of iterative guidelines.
Task 1.2: ROTATES MAA & LL Action Plans and Implementation (M10-M48; Leader: ITC (12PM), con-
tributors: all Partners)
Developmentofadynamicandflexibleworkflowthatfostersongoingcommunicationandcollaborationwithinthe
project, ensuring the MAA principles are consistently applied at all levels through regular updates, feedback loops
and adaptive management practices to maintain alignment and responsiveness to stakeholder needs and project goals:
DeploytheMAA,especiallyinpilotLLs,withthedefinitionofActionPlans byM14foreachPilotandwith the
definition of key performance indicators (KPIs) against which progress and success will be monitored and measured,
ensuring clear objectives and strategies; alignment of strategies during implementation to maintain coherence and
focus; co-creation workshops in pilot LLs and ecosystems to engage stakeholders and obtain feedback; re-assessment
of Action plans (M30) based on continuous monitoring to enable necessary adjustments and improvements.
Task 1.3: Monitoring of the implementation of ROTATES MAA & LLs (M10-M48; Leader: ITC (14PM),
contributors: all Partners)
ContinuousmonitoringandevaluationofthepilotLLs'implementationoftheMAAwillbeconductedtoassessthe
effectiveness of the MAA, identify challenges, and collect feedback for iterative improvements. This process will
include establishing the baseline to start the pilot LL (M12) with gathering initial data on current conditions, stake-
holders’ perspectives,and existing processes in the pilot areas; conduct an interim evaluation (M28) to assess progress
compared with the established KPIs, identify challenges and barriers; and undertake a final evaluation report and
makerecommendations (M44,D1.2inM46)forscalinguptheMAA,addressingidentifiedchallenges,
andenhancingfutureimplementations.
Workpackagenumber 2
Nameoftheworkpackage Valuechaindevelopmentforadoptionandnewmarketopportunities
Objectives
 ProvideadiagnosisofthecurrentsituationoftheuseofMRTcropsforfoodandfeedin10countries
 Identify levers of the adoption of MRT crops by analysing opportunities and barriers along selected food
andfeed value chains
 ExtractlessonsthatcanbeappliedtothedevelopmentofMRTvaluechains.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26893 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Descriptionofwork
Task2.1–DiagnosisofMRTvaluechaincontexts(M1-M9,Leader:SRUC(3PM),contributors:allPartners)
This will be a desk-based study based on secondary information concerning the economic, social and cultural barriersto
andenablersoftheuptakeofMRTsatvaluechainlevel.Itwillbecomplementedwithinterviewswith5 to 10 key informants
suggested by partners. The WP will provide background information for the 10 countries involvedinthe proposal (the crop
andits useare indicatedin brackets): Portugal (organic sweet potato -food), the Azores (conventional taro –feed), Cyprus
(conventional taro –food), Guadeloupe (conventional yam –food), Canary Islands (conventional cassava –feed), Italy (One
of the MRT grown in conventional system food), France (organic sweet potato – food), Greece (organic sweet potato–
feed), French Guiana (conventional cassava –food) andtheRepublicoftheCongo(conventionalcassava–food).Areport
willpresentthediagnosisconcerningallthe cases (D2.1). These results will be shared with the scientific team and the Pilot
Living Labs (LL).
Task2.2-In-depthresearchon6representativeMRTvaluechains(M10-M25,Co-leaders:INRAE&SRUC (8PM),
contributors INIAV, CUT, UAc, CIRAD, ICIA, CREA)
Detailed information will be collected for the six business case studies: CS1) Organic raw sweet potato for food products in
Portugal; CS2) Conventional taro for feed in the Azores; CS3) Organic raw taro for food in Cyprus. CS4) Bread made from
conventional yams in Guadeloupe; CS5) Conventional cassava for feed in Canary Islands; CS6)Pasta made in Italy from
one of the four MRT crops in a conventional system. The specific information collected will depend on the characteristics
of the case study concerned. The following work will be carried out: Farmers’ activities -Focus groups including a delib-
erative choice experiment with farmers organised on site with 40 to 50 farmers per case study (CS1, CS2, CS3, CS4, CS5).
This activity will coincide with the project activities of the pilot LLs. Activities undertaken by food processors -Semi-
structured interviews with processors and a qualitative analysis for the case studies (CS4, CS5, CS6). Consumer focus
groups - Five focus groups with 20 consumerstopreparetheeconomicchoiceexperimentsandtoperformaqualitative
analysis(CS1,CS3,CS4,CS6). Consumers’ economic experiments -Economic choice experiments with consumers (online
questionnaire, choice experiment, laboratory experiment) and quantitative analysis to establish consumers’ willingness to
pay for MRT food products (CS1, CS3, CS4, CS6). Activities undertaken by feed producers -Semi-structured interviews
with feed producers' customers for two case studies and qualitative analyses (CS2, CS5).
Task 2.3 - Development of strategic recommendations for the 6 MRT value chains (M26-M42, Co-leader INRAE
&SRUC (8PM) in coordination with WP1 and WP7)
Based on the information and on analysis of the information produced in Task 2, a collection of 6 business case studieswill
beprepared(Deliverable2.2).Thesebusinesscasestudies,incoordinationwithpartnerswithWP1and WP7, will be pre-
sented to relevant stakeholders in the pilot Living Labs (LL) to highlight the potential and appropriate strategies to ensure
the success of value chains and to collect feedback on results.
Task2.4-ProductionofguidelinesforthedevelopmentofMRTvaluechains(M43-M48,Co-leaderSRUC& INRAE
(8PM)) The guidelines will identify strategies and opportunities to promote the development of MRTs at the value chain
level. These guidelines will contain key lessons drawn from the case studies and will target entrepreneurs, policy makers
and other stakeholders (D2.3).
Workpackagenumber 3
Workpackagetitle GermplasmdiversityandSanitationStrategiestoFacilitateMRTAccess
and Innovative Breeding Initiatives
Objectives
 Identify new MRT materials and valuable traits for breeding programmes and increase adaptation of
cultivation to agroecological conditions, climatic constraints, and production quality.
 Streamline the selection of MRT hybrids by identifying and combining favourable alleles, thereby
enhancing the efficiency and precision of the breeding process.
 Designintegratedsystemapproachestoeliminateandcontrolseed-bornepathogens
Descriptionofwork
Task3.1:GermplasmcollectionandcharacterisationfortheconservationofrareandeliteMRTcrops(M1-
M36; Co-leaders: CIRAD & UL (25,5PM), contributors: all Partners)
A preliminary diagnosis identified 378 accessions held in genebanks in countries involved in the project. For an ac-
curatediagnosis,astandardisedquestionnairewillbesenttothegenebankineachpartnercountry(CRB-PT60,
60CentredeRessourcesBiologiquesPlantesTropicalesdeGuadeloupe
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26894 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
CRB-PP61, ISOPlexis62, CBA63, BPGV64, ARI65, CCBAT66, GGB67) tocollect information onMRTaccessionsand their
characteristics. Farmers will also be surveyed to gather information on the traits and origin of the accessions, potential
diseases and the conditions required for maintaining MRT accessions in the field. Germplasm will be collectedandmain-
tainedinthefieldorinvitrobypartnersinthe10regionstargetedbythediagnoses.Thecollected MRTcropmaterialswill
bethesubjectof(i)phytosanitaryanalysestodetectthepresenceofseed-bornevirusesby ULusing high-throughput se-
quencing (on at least 100 accessions as individual or pooled samples and on uncharacterised samples from WP4) and stand-
ard targeted tests to evaluate the pressure and spread of diseases. In addition, the literature on sanitation protocols and
pathogen diagnostic tests will be reviewed and included in the proposed system(s); (ii) lean phenotyping by each partner,
focusing on basic morpho-agronomical traits and (iii) wholegenomesequencingbyCIRADtoassessthegeneticdiversity
availableineachcountryandtoidentifyuseful gene pools for crop improvement and for the new management practices.
The data produced will bemerged with the data produced in WP2, 4 and 5 to precisely identify the germplasm that is needed
to fill the gaps that could be obtained from neighbouring countries or international genebanks, while accounting for spatial
distribution, environmental conditions, agronomic performances and uses.
Task 3.2: Deployment of Advanced Phenotyping and Genetic Studies in Plant Breeding (M6-M48; Co-leaders: UMa
& CIRAD (24,5PM), contributor: TP)
The germplasm resources gathered within Task3.1, will be used to establish diversity panels in YAM HUB (Guadeloupe),
in TARO HUB (Madeira), in CASSAVA HUB (French Guiana), and in SWEET POTATO HUB (Portugal).Specific
traitsforabioticchallenges,i.e.thebestMRTplanthealth,qualityofproduction,andwateruse efficiency under extreme
climatic conditions will be investigated in Guadeloupe and Madeira. In French Guiana, thecassavadiversitypanelwillbe
phenotypedfornutrientabsorptionandyield.Inaddition,specifictraitsforbiotic challenges concerning weed resistance will
be assessed across all panels. The sweet potato diversity panel will be phenotypedfor pest resistanceinPortugal.Detailed
phenotypicdatafrom these4diversitypanelswillbecollected and analysed using remote sensing technologies, nondisper-
sive infrared technology, non-destructive chemical analysis technology (near-infrared spectroscopy, NIRS), and laboratory
assessment of whole-plant nutritional qualityandroot-to-shootsignalling,amongothers.Genotypingdataofthe4diversity
panelswillbecombinedwith large-scale phenotyping data for genome-wide association studies and genomic prediction.
Similarly, NIRS data will be used to develop predictive models through phenomic selection. The data produced will be
merged with the dataproducedinWP4,5and6toidentifyvarietieswhosetraitsareadaptedtotheagriculturalmanagement
practices developed, ecosystem resilience, and food and feed quality production.
Task3.3:Developinganintegratedsystemapproachfortheeliminationandcontrolofseed-bornepathogens (M3-
M48; Leader: UL (15PM), contributors: UAc, INRAE, INIAV)
The development of an integrated system approach will rely on desk studies, data generation and stakeholder consultation,
including experts. Task 3.3 will develop a proof-of-concept for sweet potato, the fastest growing ROTATES crop. First, the
desk study will review the abundant literature on seed systems with a double lens: (i) existing seed systemsfor potato in the
EU and(ii) previously proposedseedsystemsat local scale or in theGlobal South. This will define a “playground perimeter”
for stakeholder and expert consultation (relying on national and regional networks of partners) as seed systems must be
adapted and compatible with local conditions and stakeholders.Inaddition,theintegratedapproachwill relyontheepide-
miologicaldatacollectedinTask3.1andin WP4 that will be analysed together with literature on seed-borne pathogens.
Furthermore, at least two sanitation protocols, for sweet potato and yam, will be applied to 10 accessions of each crop to
produce elite clean materials that will be deposited in genebanks and be available to farmers and breeders.
Workpackagenumber 4
Workpackagetitle AgroecologicalintensificationofMRTcrop-basedsystems
ObjectivesTodevelopabasketofnovelmanagementpractices/alternativecroppingsystemsthatincorporatethe best suited
varieties, minimise the use of pesticides while simultaneously maximising ecosystem services.
Descriptionofwork
Task4.1:AgronomicdiagnosticofcurrentMRTproductionsystems(M1-M12;Leader:CIRAD(10PM), contributors
all Partners)
ThisWPwillstartwithadiagnosticofcurrentMRTcrop-basedsystemsinthesixpilotLLs.Thisdiagnostic,which willbe
conducted in parallelto diagnoses inotherWPs, willinformthe design of alternative croppingsystems
61CentredeRessourcesBiologiquesPlantesPérennesdeGuyane 65AgriculturalResearchInstituteofCyprus
62BancodeGermoplasma-UniversidadedaMadeira 66CentrodeConservacióndelaBiodiversidadAgrícoladeTenerife
63BiotechnologyCentreofAzores 67GreekGenebank
64BancoPortuguêsdeGermoplasmaVegetal
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26895 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
(specifications/criteriaforthesesystems),serveasabaselineagainstwhichtheperformanceofalternativecropping systems
willbeevaluated,andwillallowforthedelineationofspatialrecommendationdomainsandfarmtypesfor up-scalingofthe
most promisingalternativecroppingsystemsdevelopedinthisWP.Thefirststepinthediagnostic will be documenting
currentpracticesusingexistingdatacomplementedbyaparticipatorydiagnosticconductedin pilotLLs.Tobetterunderstand
howrepresentativethesixselectedpilotLLsactuallyareandtoinformfuturescaling strategies,wewilldelineatespatial
recommendationdomainsusingopen-accessspatialproductsandempiricaldata where available. Similarly, using survey
data, we will create a farm typology that captures the diversity of farms, and the constraints and opportunities specific to
each type of farm. We will also analyse yield gaps in MRT crops (inthepilotLLswhere ¸thecropconcernedisalready
present)usingsurveydataandcropcutdata,toquantifyyield gaps and to identify the determinant of the gaps.
Task4.2: Designandon-stationtestingof alternativeMRT-basedcroppingsystemstoincreasewateruse effi-
ciency in irrigated systems (M5-M48; Leader: CUT (6PM), contributors: INRAE, UMa)
Informed by the diagnostic stage, crop rotations and crop associations combining MRT crops with legumes, cucurbits, veg-
etables and/or fruit trees will be tested on-station to increase water use efficiency, in Cyprus, France and Madeirawherethis
was identifiedasamajor challenge. Boththeimprovement of systemsthat already include MRT crops (taro in Cyprus and
Madeira, sweet potato in France), and the introduction of MRT crops in systems where they are currently absent (yam in
Madeira) will be considered in this task. The initial selection of crops for rotations and intercropping will be based on the
findings of the diagnostic (Task 4.1). Using an iterative approach, theperformanceoftheentiresystem(allcropsincluded
inrotationsandassociations)willbeevaluatedeachseason and the systems will be refined for the following season. The
main performance indicators will include yield, and apparent water use efficiency (kg of harvested product by mm of rain-
water + irrigated water). Ecosystem services will also be evaluated in these trials (strong linkage with WP6).
Task4.3:Designandon-stationtestingofalternativeMRT-basedcroppingsystemspromotingthe biocon-
trol of pests and weeds (M5-M48; Leader; INIAV (8PM), contributor: INRAE)
In France and Portugal where pests and weeds represent a major challenge to production, MRT crops in rotations and in
associations,will betestedon-station.Thistaskwillfocusonsweetpotatoinbothcountries.AsinTask4.2, croprotations
andcropassociationcombiningMRTcropswithlegumes,cucurbits,vegetablesand/orfruittreeswill bedesignedandtested
on-stationinatleast2-3soiltypesduring3years.AsforTask4.2,aniterativeapproachwill be used. The main performance
indicators will include yield, weed pressure (estimated through remote sensing or androidapps),weedabundanceanddiver-
sity(measuredinquadrats),pestabundanceanddensity(assessedthrough colour traps and net swapping), incidence of
viruses transmitted by insect pests (assessed through PCR and/or ELISA), and incidence of soil borne diseases (assessed
through morphological observations). As in Task 4.2, ecosystem services will also be evaluated in these trials.
Task 4.4: Design and on-station testing of alternative MRT-based cropping systems promoting zero-deforestation
(M5-M48; Leader: UMNG (7,5PM), contributor: PNKH)
Cassava-based cropping systems specifically designed to reduce deforestation will be tested on-station in the Republicof
theCongoandinFrenchGuiana.Croppingsystemsadaptedtobothrecentclearing(e.g.,shortimproved fallow using Cajanus
before planting cassava) and to older fields (e.g., association of perennial crops e.g. Stylosanthes,Sesbania,–and annual
crops e.g. Centrosema,Pueraria) will be developed. The same iterative approach as in Task 4.2 and Task 4.3 will also be
used. The main performance indicators will include yield, weed pressure(estimatedthroughremotesensingorandroidapps),
weedabundanceanddiversity(measuredinquadrats), and soil health (using BioFuncTool®) (linked to WP6). As in Task
4.2 and Task 4.3., ecosystem services will be evaluated in these trials.
Task4.5:On-farmadaptationandscalingofMRT-basedcroppingsystemsthroughpilotLivingLabs (M13-
M48; Leader: CIRAD (9PM), contributors: CUT, PNKH, INRAE, UMNG, UMa, INIAV)
On-farm research will be conducted in parallel to on-station research in the 6 pilot LLs: pLL1-Cyprus, pLL2-France,
pLL3-Portugal,pLL4-French Guiana,pLL5-Madeira, pLL6-Congo. While the purpose of on-station research will be
to collect detailed measurements in controlled environment in order to better understand the underlying mechanisms (e.g.,
water and nutrient dynamic, pests and weeds dynamics), the purpose of on-farm research will be to assess how innovative
cropping systems fit in diverse farm contexts, and to understand what adaptations and interventions will be required for their
wide adoption. In each of the 6 pilot LLs targeted by this WP,on-farmresearchwilltakeplaceinanetworkofatleast10
farms,inorganicandconventionalsystem,selected from thetypologiesdelineatedinTask4.1.,toensuretheirrepresenta-
tivity.Basedonthedatacollected,atrade-off analysisbetweenmultiplecriteria(productivity,labour,provisionofecosystem
services,etc)forthemostpromising alternativeMRT-basedcroppingsystemswillbeconductedforthevariousfarmtypes
andspatialdomainsidentified. Finally, a participatory holistic impact assessment of the most promising alternative MRT-
based cropping systems will be conducted in the 6 pilot LLs.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26896 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Task 4.6 Training of farmers in the use of novel agroecological practices co-created and validated (M13-M48;
Leader: UMa (8PM), Contributors: CUT, PNKH, INRAE, UMNG, INIAV, CIRAD)
Field demonstrations will be organised regularly for farmers and growers in each pilot LL. Three face-to-face training
workshops per pilot LL will be organised with the support of WP1 and WP7 involving at least 25 participants
including farmers, agricultural advisors and representatives of farmer associations. The first demonstration will be
scheduled following the agronomic diagnostic and at the beginning of the process of co- design. A second
demonstration at mid-term will focus on demonstrating the practices under development on-station and on-farm
and collect farmers’ feedback to make any necessary adjustments. The final field demonstration will provide training
on the most promising innovative agroecological practices developed in ROTATES – including on the provision of
ecosysWtemor skeprvaicckesa g(ienn cuomllabbeorration with W5P6).
Workpackagetitle AdvancementofstarchyMinorRootandTubercropsFoodandFeed Pro-
cessing
Objectives
 Assess,valoriseandimplementMRTcropsasfunctionalfoodandfeedfordifferentanimalspecies
 AssesstheaptitudeofMRTcropsfor processinginpilot plants
 EvaluatelivestockproductsobtainedwithdietsbasedonMRTcrops
 AssessconsumeracceptanceofMRT-basedfoods
 Developnovelfoodandfeedproductsforindustry,farmersandthegeneralpublic
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26897 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Descriptionofwork
Task 5.1 –Physical and phytochemical characterisation of MRT. (M1-M24; Leader: INRAE (4PM), Contrib-
utors: CIRAD, UAc, UMa, CREA, ICIA, AUA)
The species and the genotypes most suitable for food and feed will be identified from both diagnoses and consultation.
The diagnoses will involve multiple methodological approaches: (i) consultation and analysis of available and rele-
vant literature and databases on the use of tubers for food and whole plants for feed; (ii) detailed analysis of the
regulationsin force;(iii) search for complementary information ingovernment agricultural services and biodiversity
plant conservation centres; (iv) implementation of field and on-farm visits and surveys of MRT target species (M1-
M12). After which raw materials and flours from different selected genotypes will be characterised in terms of phys-
ical and nutritional parameters (M6-M24). Rheological and technological characterisation (pasting properties
(CIRAD), falling number and farinograph (CREA), non-destructive measurements of native and blended flours
(MRT/low gluten index cereals, i.e., einkorn/ gluten free-cereals, i.e., sorghum and corn), obtained using different
drying pre-treatments (vacuum freeze-drying, hot air, CREA/CIRAD/UMa)andbydifferentpilotplantmillingpro-
cedures(ultra-finegrinding,stonemillers,CREA)will be performed. Nutritional (proteins (CREA), fibres (CREA),
starch (CREA), in vivo glycaemic index on mice (UA)), small sugars-amino acids-organic acids (AU), bio-functional
(phenols and polyphenols (UA), antioxidant activity (CREA), anthocyanins and carotenoids (UA) and antinutri-
tional (trypsin inhibitor activity (AU), calcium oxalate crystals (AU) , cyanogenetic glycosides (AU), acrylamide
(CREA) compounds will be analysed both on tubersandotherfeed-usable parts ofthecropssuchasleavesandstems
and/or onprocessed products(pasta,bread and ice cream, eggs, milk and meat). To complete this general nutritional
analysis, species-specific animal feed nutritive values of different species (small ruminants and poultry) will be
determined (ICIA).
Task5.2.Foodprocessing(M25-M36;Leader:CREA(12PM),Contributors:CIRAD,UMa)
Fresh and dry pasta, different types of bread and flat breads and different ice cream formulations will be produced
from the genotypes selected in task 5.1, and in different blend formulations with cereals with a low or zero gluten
index (einkorn, sorghum and corn). CREA will produce pasta in a pilot plant using different temperature (high
80°C and low 50°C and humidity) conditions. Sensory analyses will be performed by a panel of trained assessors
along withinstrumental assessment of cooking quality (optimal cooking time,firmness, stickiness,water absorption,
cooking loss). The processing suitability of the various composites flours prepared for bread making will be evalu-
ated (by CIRAD) based on the results of sensory analysis of breads, the pasting properties of blends anddoughrhe-
ology.Icecreamformulationswillbeevaluated(UMa)intermsofdifferentcookingtimes,cooking media(water,
milk,vegetabledrink),cookingmodes(freeze-dryingvsovenvsfryingpan),differentpercentagesof incorporation of
the core ingredient (e.g., 10%, 15%, 20%), and use of flour (assess the need for a hot or cold process) (M24-M36).
Task 5.3. Feed processing and quality assessment of by-products (M1-M45; Leader: ICIA (10PM), Contribu-
tors: UAc, AUA)
ResearchwillbeconductedtoassessthepotentialuseofMRTby-productsinanimalfeed(M1-M40).Taroandyam
willbeevaluatedinGreece,sweetpotatoandcassavaintheCanaryIslands,sweetpotatoandtarointheAzores.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26898 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Different uses and methods of conservation (fresh, dried -hayed or pelleted -and ensiled) will be developed and evaluated.
Different drying methods will be evaluated (forced-ventilation oven drying, open-air drying) with and without pelleting.
Subsequently, these results, combined with those obtained for silage suitability and the fermentative quality index of MRT
foliage, roots and tubers, will identify the characteristics of the best potential quality products to be used in the feed evalu-
ation phase. Once the previous step has been completed, the inclusion of the experimental feeds with the best feeding po-
tential in the diet will be tackled. Firstly, palatability and ingestiontestswillbeconductedtodeterminetheoptimumlevel
ofinclusioninthediet.Next,dietswithdifferent degreesofinclusionwillbefedtotargetspecies,ruminants(goats,sheep,
cattle)andmonogastricspecies(poultry) for evaluation. In ruminants, yield indicators, milk production, the physicochemical
and sensory qualityof cheese by bothexpert (trained 10-12-member sensorypanel) and consumer panels(80 -100 partici-
pants) in each country, will be studied. In monogastric species (poultry) results will be obtained for performance parame-
ters, meat and egg production and quality. In addition, their health and sanitary status will be monitored based on biochem-
ical bloodparameters. Thisspecificassessment of thelivestockproductsobtainedisveryimportant asit will add value to
MRT crops as feed and provide a first insight into consumer acceptance.
Task5.4.ConsumeracceptanceofMRT-basedfoodsandlivestockproductsofMRT-fedanimals.(M24-M48; Leader:
ILRIC (7PM), Contributors: CREA, UMa, ICIA, AUA & UAc)
ILRIC will develop four recipes for each MRT crop—two using raw tubers and two using processed forms, e.g. flour.
Creative sessions with chefs and a dietician will be organised to design culinary prototypes that align with ROTATES
requirementsandappealtoconsumersatthesametime.Theseprototypeswillbefurtherrefinedduring culinary sessions
held at the COOKLAB, where detailed technical sheets will be produced, including lists of ingredients, step-by-step prepa-
ration instructions, descriptions of the final prototypes, and photographs of both the preparationprocessandthefinished
dishes.Keyfoodproducts—pasta,icecream,andbread—willbeevaluated by sensory characterisation with gastronomy
experts, including a pastry maker, a bread baker, and culinary chefs. Oversixsessions,theseexpertswillassesstheprocessed
productsinordertoidentifytheirstrengthsandweaknesses, and provide critical feedback for optimisation. The sensory
quality of animal products,such as eggs and milk, derived from MRT-fed animals will also be assessed by comparing
standard products with those from tuber-fed animals, and by evaluating their acceptability by 100 consumers per product in
laboratory-based tests using both rawingredientsandpreparedrecipes,likericepudding.Additionally,ILRICwillconduct
consumertestswith100 participants in a real dining setting at its restaurant, to collect feedback on liking, acceptability,
strengths, and weaknessesoftherecipesusedforalltheproductsevaluated.Finally,aprofessionalphotographerwilldoc-
ument the selected tubers, their culinary transformation, and the final plated dish. Alongside WP5 partners, ILRIC
will produce a guide and three short videos to showcase the innovative use of MRT crops (D5.5)
Workpackagenumber 6
Workpackagetitle DeliveryofEcosystemServicesbyMRTcropsandcropmanagement
practices
Objectives
 Buildingstrongknow-howonecosystemservicesassessment
 EstablishanaccuratebaselineofcurrentbiodiversitystatusinpilotLLs
 Record/mapandanalyseabove-andbelowgroundbiodiversity
 Assess soil health using cutting edge methodologies combined with simple, cheap, not disturbing meth-
odologies
Descriptionofwork
Task 6.1: Diagnosis of baseline ecosystem services (M1-M4; Leader: CUT (11PM), Contributors: UMa, PNKH,
INRAE, UMNG, INIAV, CIRAD)
Acomprehensivebaselineassessmentwillbeundertakentounderstandthecurrentstateofbiodiversity,soilhealth, water
regulation, and carbon sequestration in the study areas (All partners). This task begins with the collection of existing litera-
ture and historical data relevant to the study area and MRT crops from various sources, including academic databases,
relevant agencies, local agricultural records, and the testimonies of farmers and other stakeholders.Itwillbecomplemented
bybaselinefieldsurveystocollectdataonspeciesdiversity,soilhealth,and water quality. Representative sampling sites in
the study areas will be selected randomly, and systematic surveys will be conductedto assessvegetation,soil health, nema-
todeandmicrobial biodiversity,and soil health indicators, using BioFuncTool® to measure carbon dynamics, nutrient cy-
cling, and soil structure maintenance (D6.1). To ensureconsistencyandaccuracyacrosstheproject,trainingworkshopswill
beheldattheproject'skick-offmeeting, whereworkpackage(CUT)andtaskleaders(CUT,CIRAD,INRAE)willprovide
educationalmaterialsandhands-
ontraininginmethodssuchasnematodeisolation,characterisation,andtheuseoftheBioFuncTool®.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26899 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Task 6.2: Impact of MRT crops on biodiversity (M5-M45; Leader: CIRAD (3,5PM), Contributors: UMa,
PNKH, INRAE, UMNG, INIAV, CUT)
Biodiversity will be assessed to understand the impacts of different crop management approaches developed in a
relatedworkpackage(WP4).Biodiversityindicators,bothabove-andbelowground,willbemeasuredandanalysed.
Above-ground biodiversity will be assessed by measuring natural enemy biodiversity and the natural regulation of
pests using non-selective interception traps and selective traps for bioindication. Experimental sites and farmers' fields
will serve as study areas where systems of sentinel prey are established toempirically record pest regulation in the
field. Simultaneously, camera traps will be used to identify vertebrate species that use the plots as habitats andto
determinetheirstatusaspests,beneficial,orneutralagents.Thistaskwillalsoexaminehowthesurrounding land-
scape, climatic variables, and agricultural practices influence the introduction of starchy MRT crops in the agroeco-
system (all pLL partners). Below-ground biodiversity will be assessed by analysing microbial genetic diversity
through metabarcoding using next-generation sequencing technologies (CUT, INRAE, INIAV). Soil samples will be
collected at various depths and locations in the study areas, and nematodes will be identified and counted using
microscopy, with further analysis using DNA barcoding for precise identification (D6.2).
Task6.3:ImpactofMRTcropsonsoilhealth(M1-M45;Leader:INRAE(9PM),Contributors:UMa,PNKH,
UMNG, INIAV, CUT)
To identify the impacts of crop management on soil health services, soil samples will be collected and analysed to
measure organic matter content, nutrient levels, and microbial activity, using BioFuncTool®. Pesticide use will be
surveyed by farmers based on their calendar, compared to the baseline and monitored throughout the project (all pLL
partners).Thefindingswillbecomplementedbyfunctionalmetagenomicanalysis,whichrevealsthediversity and
functions of microbial communities involved in nutrient cycling, organic matter decomposition, and the maintenance
of soil structure (INRAE, CUT, INIAV). This knowledge (D6.3) will be harnessed to manage soil health more effec-
tively, particularly by engineering microbial communities in the rhizosphere for improved plant performance.
Task6.4:Dataintegrationandmodelling(M36-M47;Leader:CUT(10PM))
Data from biodiversity assessments, soil health monitoring, agronomic management (including water use; WP4), and
meteorological stations will be combined. Integration will be achieved through a Geographic Information Systems
(GIS) platform, which will integrate the data spatially. Advanced modelling techniques, including geostatistical
analysis,machine learning (models like Random Forest, Gradient Boosting, or Neural Networks), andcropsimu-
lationmodels,willbeusedtopredictcropresponsestodifferentenvironmentalconditions.Thiswill enable the de-
velopment of tailored management practices that enhance yield, resilience, and sustainability. The
resultingdatawillbevisualisedoninteractivedashboardsthatwilldisplayreal-timeorhistoricalspatially-explicit
data on soil health, crop performance, phenological status, and weather patterns (D6.4)
Workpackagenumber 7
Workpackagetitle Dissemination,Exploitation,Communication&CapacityBuilding
Objectives
 Designandimplementanagilecapacitybuildingprogrammetailoredtotheneedsofpilots,partners,and
stakeholders
 Raiseawarenessandmaximisevisibilityamongthekeytargetgroups;
 Buildandengageacommunityofstakeholdersandestablishsynergieswithotherrelevantinitiatives.
 Assessandmaximisetheexploitationpotential,replicability,impactandaddedvalueofprojectresultsand
outputs.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26900 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Descriptionofwork
T7.1–AgileCapacityBuilding(M1-M48,Leader:ENoLL(10,5PM),Contributors:ITC,CIRAD,UMa,CUT,
PNKH, UMNG, INRAE)
AdynamiccapacitybuildingplanwillbedesignedandimplementedtosupportPartnersandPilotsintheiractivities,
enablingtheagileintegrationofnewknowledgeandtoolsinresponsetoemergingneeds.Theplanwillbedesigned
andregularlyrevisedfollowingsensemakingmethodology,MELandsystemthinkingapproaches,basedonaccurate
and regular needs analysis and first enabling correct understanding of key methods and approaches (MAA/LL, WP1),
and then supporting harmonised pilot implementation to the related open innovation ecosystems. While ENoLL will
mainly lead the definition of the plan and methodology, ITC will be the core supporting partner and will co-design
and implement the training programme in alignment with WP1 activities and results. Key steps: (i) preliminaryalign-
menttraininginMAA/LLprinciplesandmethods(M1);(ii)assessingtheneedsofthepartners
and pilots (M2-M4) and related ecosystems (M4-9); (iii) co-design of agile capacity building programme (D7.1, M9);
(iv)implementationoftrainingactivities(actionplandesigns,monitoringframework,train-the-trainers,etc.);
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26901 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
(v)revisionofcapacityneedsfollowinginterimmonitoring(M24andadaptationoffuturetraining.Mainresults:
Agilecapacitybuildingprogrammeandmethodology,withappropriatetoolsandtrainingmaterial
T7.2–Disseminationandcommunication(M1-M48,Leader:ENoLL(8PM),Contributors:allPartners)
A unified and accurate Dissemination & Communication strategy and targets will be established and implemented to max-
imise the visibility and awareness of project activities and results supporting their exploitation within and beyondthecon-
sortium.Keysteps:(i)DesignofCommunication/Disseminationtoolkit(M1)toensuretheconsistent visual appearance of
the project (ROTATES visual identity [logo, colour guide, templates], website/portal, social media accounts, flyers, banners,
project presentations); (ii) launch of the ROTATES website (M2); (iii) Collective identificationandselectionofcontent/re-
sults/activitiesto be disseminated;(iv)Mappingofstakeholdersandtarget audiencesanddefinition ofthekeymessages;
(v)DefinitionoftheDECplan(D7.2,M6)withdetailedplanningof D&C activities (publications, events, etc.), guidelines
and distribution of responsibilities, and preliminary collaboration plan with key initiatives (T7.4); (vi) Implementation of
D&C activities, regular monitoring and fine-tuning of actions to match the timing of key projects and delivery of the results.
Targeted communication and dissemination actions will inform and engage specific stakeholders and audiences through
several channels e.g., conferences, fairs, workshops, webinars, scientific publications, stakeholder meetings, demonstration
events, the contentsofthe ROTATESwebsite,shortvideos,pressreleases,andafinal ROTATESevent.Mainresults:
Project branding, D&C material, DEC plan.
T7.3 –Exploitation, replicability, recommendations, and contribution to policy (M4-M48, Leader: ENoLL (6PM),
Contributors: all Partners)
Thistaskwill focuson theone hand, onmappingandplanningtheexploitation,sustainability, and maximisationof the
impact of the results of the ROTATES project, and, on the other, on guiding the replicability of the approach and results,
stimulating their adoption and effective uptake across Europe and beyond through impact assessment, recommendations
drawn fromthe monitoring actions and active contributions to policy making. Key steps: (i) analysis of project KERs and
identification of main steps in exploitation to be implemented during & after the project ends); (ii) definition of a preliminary
plan for exploitation to be included in D7.2 (M6); (iii) analysis of interim monitoring of result and drafting preliminary
recommendations for replication and policy making; (iv) regular assessment of results, ownership and exploitation path-
ways; (v) definition of post-exploitation steps; (vi) analysis of final monitoring results, (vii) delivery of replication/transfer-
ability guidebook including the results of replicability analysis, and the provision of a set of ROTATES recommendations
(D7.3). Main results:Long-term sustainability and exploitation plan, Recommendations, Replicability guidebook.
T7.4 –Synergies and collaboration with related initiatives (M1-M48, Leader: CIRAD (2PM), Contributors: all Part-
ners)
T7.4 will align with the dissemination effort to set up and sustain an active community of stakeholders, drawing from part-
ners’ existing networks and collaboration with both ongoing and previous projects, including the sister projects. In parallel,
the consortium will seek systematic and sustainable cooperation with other related projects, initiatives,andclusterstomu-
tuallybenefitfromincreasedvisibilityandresearchalignment.Collaborativeactivities envisaged include regular updates on
achieved results and methods, joint presentations of the projects and their impacts(e.g.,workshops,webinars,symposia,
publicengagements),etc.ThetaskwillbecoordinatedbyCIRADin close collaboration with ENoLL, with all Partners
taking responsibility for good cooperation and dissemination of the project results to linked initiatives. Key steps: (i) map-
ping stakeholders and relevant initiatives, (ii) connecting with such initiatives and reaching agreement on collaboration
pathways (including definition of MoU or similar collaboration agreements) (D7.2), (iii) planning and implementing joint
actions, (iv) regular alignment meetings with relevant sister initiatives for knowledge exchange and joint planning. Main
results:Map of stakeholders to engage in participatory activities and in ensuring long-term sustainability.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26902 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Workpackagenumber 8
Workpackagetitle ProjectCoordinationandManagement
Objectives
TheoverallobjectiveofthisWPisensuringprofessionalcoordinationofscientific,legal,ethical,financialand ad-
ministrative management of ROTATES project.
Descriptionofwork
Task8.1Monitoringprogressandqualitycontrol(M1-M48;Leader;CIRAD(7PM),Contributors:all
Partners)
The Coordinator will establish an internal team to ensure smooth and timely operation of the ROTATES project. This
taskwillensuretheROTATESprojectfunctionsefficientlyandthatinformationexchangebetweenpartnersis ade-
quate. A set of comprehensive work plans will be presented, dealing with each of the WPs. These Work Plans will be
put together by the WP leaders at the start of ROTATES and include precise definitions of the partner’s actions,risks
andtimescalesforeachWP.Thecoordinatorwillassembletheinputsintheproject’soverallDetailed Work Plan.
Finally, the task will include quality assurance, documentation and information provision, which includes setting up
SharePoint areas and GDPR compliance.
Task8.1.1Reporting
This task involves reporting on the technical, scientific and financial aspects of the project. This will see the cooper-
ationofallthePartnersunderCIRADcoordination.ThePartnersshallprovidetheCoordinatorwithadetailed report
ontheirtechnicalandscientificactivities,includedthereleaseofpublications,togetherwiththeotherresults obtained
by the consortium to enhance the visibility and impact of the project.
Task8.2Administrativeandfinancialcoordination(M1-M48;Leader;CIRAD(7PM),Contributors:all
Partners)
The purpose of this task is to ensure efficient day-to-day running of the project through sound and effective adminis-
trativeandfinancialmanagement.Inclosecollaborationwiththefinancialunit,theProjectCoordinatorwill handle
communicationwithpartners’financialunitstomonitorcontracts.Theywillestablishandmaintainfinancial records
and coordinate submission of financial statements by all the Project Partners.
Task 8.3 Research Data Management (M1-M48; Leader; CIRAD (2,5PM), Contributors: all Partners) RO-
TATES' data management policy is to provide open access to most of the research datasets generated by the pro-
ject.ThedatamanagementstrategywillbedefinedwithallthePartners,inordertosharethesameobjectivesin
terms of data sharing and exploitation. A first version of the Data Management Plan (DMP) covering each
ROTATES dataset willbe deliveredinmonth 6.TheDMP willspecifyall data curation,storage, andreporting
proceduresinaccordancewithFAIRprinciples.ThetaskwillalsoprovideaservertohostdatafromallWPsforthe
duration of the project. The DMP will be updated as needed during the project.
Task8.4CoordinationandorganisationofConsortiumMeetings(M1-M48;Leader:CIRAD(7PM), Contrib-
utors: all Partners)
CIRAD will communicate regularly with its partners, respond to technical and other project management related
queries in a timely fashion, and distribute the EU contribution to the partners. An effective communication mechanism
willbesetupincludingregulare-mailexchangebetweenthepartners,thedecision-makersappointedin the General
Assembly (GA) and members of the Advisory Board (AB). Timesaving, environmental-friendly and cost-effective
solutions such as Teams will be used to enable meetings to be held online. In addition to day-to-day communication,
CIRAD will organise regular consortium meetings with the WP Leaders, GA and AB to discuss the progress of the
project and plan the next steps, as well as specific workshops to define the details of specific activities with the
appropriate members of the Work Package concerned.
Task8.5:Ethicscoordination(M1–48,Leader:CIRAD(2PM),Contributors:allPartners)
Allthepartnerswhoundertakefieldsamplingorconductsocialstudiesamonglocalcommunitieswillobtainupfront
approvalfromtheirinstitutionalethicalreviewboards.CIRADwillengageitsinternalorexternalspecialistsinthe
different ethical domains to support ethics management. They will oversee all activities that may be of ethical concern,
alone or in combination with other activities, and will also make sure there is no risk of ethical dumping. Finally, they
will also ensure that ethical standards are respected for the publication of results.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26903 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Table3.1c: Listof Deliverables
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566
rebmuN
Deliverablename Shortdescription
.oNPW -rap
daeL .picit epyT
nimessiD
level
yrevileD
etad
D1.1 MAA&LL Frameworkforimplementation 1 ENoLL R PU M12
methodological andmonitoringoftheMAAand
framework LL approaches
D1.2 ROTATESMAA Detailed evaluation of the perfor- 1 ITC R PU M46
Performance mance of ROTATES’ MAA,
basedonMAAKPIs.
D2.1 Value-chainContext Value-chaindiagnosesforthe 10 2 SRUC R PU M9
diagnoses target regions
D2.2 Sixbusinesscasestudies Business opportunities for the cre-2 INRAE R PU M42
ationofaMRTsupplychain SRUC
D2.3 Guidelines for the develop-Strategies and opportunities to 2 SRUC R PU M48
mentofthe promotethedevelopmentofthe INRAE
MRTvaluechain MRTvaluechain.
D3.1 DistributionofMRT DistributionofMRTdiversity 3 CIRAD R PU M24
diversity inthe10countriesand5 outermost
regions
D3.2 Assessmentofseed- Epidemiologicalsurveyof dis- 3 UL R PU M36
borne pathogens ease epidemics
D3.3 PhenotypesofMRT diver- MRT material with valuable 3 UMa R PU M36
sity panels traitsforbreedingprogrammes
D3.4 Geneticarchitectureof tar- Genetic studies and the develop- 3 CIRAD R PU M48
geted traits mentofpredictive
models
D3.5 Reviewoftheliterature Diagnostictestsand 3 UL R PU M17
on sanitation protocols prevalence/severity of seed-
bornepathogensofMRTcrops
D3.6 Recommendationsfor Use of an integrated system ap- 3 UL DEM PU M48
phytosanitary certifica- proachtoensureahealthy seed
tion system and sustainable
production
D4.1 Agronomicdiagnostic Agronomicdiagnosticofcurrent 4 CIRAD R PU M12
MRT production systems
D4.2 EvaluationofMRTfor wa-Plot-levelperformanceofMRT- 4 CUT R PU M24
ter use efficiency based cropping systems to in- M36
creasewateruseefficiency M48
D4.3 EvaluationofMRTfor Plot-levelperformanceofMRT- 4 INIAV R PU M24
the biocontrol of pests based cropping systems that ad- M36
and weeds vance biocontrol of pests and M48
weeds
D4.4 EvaluationofMRTfor Plot-levelperformanceofMRT- 4 UMNG R PU M24
zero-deforestation basedcroppingsystemsthat pro- M36
mote zero-deforestation M48
D4.5 On-farmadaptationof Farm-levelperformanceofthe 4 CIRAD R PU M24
MRT most promising MRT-based M36
croppingsystems M48
D4.6 Trainingworkshops Finalreportontrainingfarmers 4 UMa R PU M15
intheuseofthenewcropping sys- M28
tems M42

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26904 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
D5.1 Food&feeddiagnoses Diagnoses of physical and phyto- 5 INRAE R PU M15
chemicalscharacteristics
ofMRTcropsforfoodandfeed
D5.2 Nutritional & nutraceuti- Biochemicalcharacterisationof 5 INRAE DATA PU M30
calanalysis MRT
D5.3 Foodquality Technologicalandsensorial 5 CREA R PU M40
qualityofthe3processedfoods
D5.4 Feedquality Characterisationoffeed 5 ICIA R PU M45
processingtechniquesand live-
stock products
D5.5 Bookletandvideosof RecipesusingMRTasingredi- 5 ILRIC DEC PU M46
new recipes ents
D6.1 Diagnosesofcurrent eco- Baselinedatareportandfield sur- 6 CUT R, PU M6
system services vey DATA
D6.2 Biodiversityassessment Monitoring above-and below- 6 CIRAD R PU M24
grounddiversityinthe6 pilot LLs M46
D6.3 Soilhealthassessment Monitoringsoilhealthinthe6pi- 6 INRAE R PU M24
lot LLs M46
D6.4 Dataintegration&model- Actionablerecommendations 6 CUT R PU M47
ling for sustainable crop
managementpractices.
D7.1 ROTATESagile ROTATEScapacity-building 7 ENoLL R PU M9
capacitybuilding methodology,alignedwithaag-
programme ile, iterative approach.
D7.2 DECplan Strategy,goals,activities, tar- 7 ENoLL R SEN M6
gets, guidelines, and
materialsforROTATESWPs
D7.3 Replicabilityguidelines A guide for replicating RO- 7 ENoLL R PU M48
and planning TATESmethodologies
D8.1 Managementand Projectstructures,roles,quality, 8 CIRAD R PU M6
Quality Plan progress monitoring, risk
analysisandactivities
D8.2 DataManagementPlan Data management life cycle of the8 CIRAD DMP PU M6
datageneratedandcollected M36
M48
Table3.1d: Listofmilestones
Mill. Nb. Milestonename Work pack- Due date Meansofverification
age(s)
M1 Collationofsecondarydata WP3,4,5,6 M4 Report,database
M2 Mappingofkeystakeholdersandinitia- WP1,7 M4 Stakeholderdatabase
tives
M3 Biochemicalparametersthatmeetfood WP5 M6 Listofvarietiesofthemost ap-
and feed processing requirements propriate quality for
processing
M4 Identificationofpartners’andpilots’ WP1,2,4,6,7 M8 Reportontrainingneeds
needs for training
M5 ActionPlanandBaselinemonitoring WP1 M10 ActionplanforeachpilotLL
M6 Establishmentofon-stationtrials WP4,6 M18 Report,database
M7 Identificationofanetworkoffarmsfor ad- WP4,6 M18 Report,database
aptation
M8 Diversitypanelsforyam,taro,cassava, WP3 M24 Listofvarietiesofeachcrop in-
and sweet potato in their respective troduced in each breeding
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26905 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
breedinghubs hub
M9 Mid-term evaluation analysis for WP1,2,4,6,7 M24 Evaluationreport
revision of capacity building and
recommendations
M10 Consultations with stakeholders and WP3 M30 Reportonfeedbackprovided by
experts on adapting seed systems to stakeholders and experts
local conditions
M11 Validationofbusinesscasestudies WP1,2 M38 Feedbackfromtheworkshop
Table3.1e: Criticalrisksforimplementation#@RSK-MGT-RM@#
Descriptionofrisk Work Proposedrisk-mitigationmeasures
package(s)
Difficulty in managing a wide and interna- WP8 CIRADstaffhaveextensiveexperienceinEUproject
tionalconsortium[L:Low,S:Low-] management. If the risk occurs, robust risk monitoring
will be set up with detailed guidelines,
regularmeetings,toensurepartnerengagement.
Lackofresponsetosurveysinpilotcountries WP1,2,7 Engagement trainings will be carried out to support
onthebarriersandneedsanalysisconsortium partners and increasedfollow-up will be organised or a
[L: Low, S: Medium] newstrategyadoptedinthecaseoflackofresponses.
Difficulties to engage the different actors in WP1,2,4, Dedicatedvaluepropositionmessageswillbedefined
co-creatingandpilotingactivitiesinpilotLL, 6,7 for each pilot LL to support the building of trust. A ded-
and Value Chains. [L: Low, S: Medium] icated D&C campaign will be designed to elicit
interestamongtheactors.
Delays in receiving genetic resources from in- WP3 Initiate proactive communication with international
ternational genebanks, particularly for taro and genebanksto track geneticresource availabilityand
sweet potato, couldresult in insufficient shipping timelines. Secure alternative sources from
material to establish on time the Breeding Hubs national orregional genebanks andresearchentities
as contingency plans for needed varieties.
Some technical risks could arise in formulating WP5 Theseunexpectedeventscanbemitigatedbyapplying
100% MRT-based dry pasta and bread, due to different processing techniques and/or mixing with ce-
technological issues caused by real flours with gluten or low to no gluten content.
theprocessingofthedough.
Droughtorotherclimaticeventsthataffect WP3,4,5,6 Activitieswillbeadaptedtomitigatetheimpactof
on-stationandon-farmtrials[L:Low,S:High] climateonthepilotLLsconcerned.Ifneeded, activi-
ties will be rescheduled.
Plantingmaterialsarelackingforon-station WP4,6 Multiplicationofmaterialwillbeundertakenbyseed
and on-farm trials [L: Medium, S: High] producers in response to the need for planting
materialforfieldtrials.
Delaysinprojecttimetable[L:Low,S:Me- All WPs Project partners agree to apply contingency plans (tai-
dium] loredtomatchtheexactcircumstances)including
re-allocationofresources,parallelexecutionoftasks
and re-scheduling of activities.
Changesofkeypersonnelintheconsortium WP8 Partnerswill berequiredtoprovidesubstitutestaff
[L: Low, S: Medium] with equivalent (or higher) qualifications and experi-
ence.Thesubstitutestaffwillbeinformedin
detailabouttheproject,theirroleandduties.
#§RSK-MGT-RM§#
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26906 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Table3.1f: Summaryofstaffeffort
Total
WP1 WP2 WP3 WP4 WP5 WP6 WP7 WP8
PM
1-CIRAD 2 2 41.5 21.5 3 4 3 24.5 101.5
2–INRAE 2 24.5 3 8 4 14 1.5 1.5 58
3–CUT 2 1 1 9 35 3 1.5 52.5
4–UL 2 1 30.5 1 1 1.5 37
5–UMa 2 1 16 12 6 5 2 1.5 45.5
6–UAc 2 9 12 1 9 0.5 1.5 35
7–INIAV 2 6 19 11 0.5 12 3 1.5 55
8–CREA 2 1 1 22.5 0.5 1.5 28.5
9–ILRIC 2 1 1 9 1 1.5 15.5
10–ICIA 2 1 3 2 39.5 1 1.5 50
11–SRUC 2 6 1 0.5 1.5 11
12–ACOESTE 2 1 10 3 0.5 1.5 18
13–ENoLL 8.5 1 1 27 3 40.5
14–ITC 29 1 1 4.5 1.5 35
15–TP 2 1 13 0.5 1.5 18
16–AUA 2 0.5 1.5 0.5 19 1 1.5 26
17–PNKH 2 1 14 14 4.5 1.5 1.5 38
18-UMNG 2 1 1 10.5 4 1.5 1.5 21
Total PM 69.5 55.6 170.5 93.5 112.5 78.5 52 51.5 686
Table3.1g: ‘Subcontractingcosts’items
Participan tsSubcontracting
Descriptionoftasksandjustification
Cost (€)
1-CIRAD 75,000€ In T6.2: Taxonomic identification of trapped samples (15k). In T3.1: MRT Ge-
nome sequencing for pan-genome approach (50k). In T8.5: Ethical advisor to pro-
videsupportconcerningexchangesofbiologicalmaterialoranyothercritical
issue(10k)
5-UMa 31,000€ In T4.5: Implementation of a pilot Living Labs through the development of
educationalandsocialactivities(20k).InT5.2:Developmentofnewformulations
ofMRT-basedmilkalternativesice-creambyanice-creammakercompany(11k)
9-ILRIC 10,000€ InT5.4:VideocapsuleofnewrecipestoshowcasetheinnovativeuseofMRT
crops
10-ICIA 16,400€ In T5.3: Specific root and plant physicochemical analyses (5k), analyses of ensila-
bilityandfermentativequalityofsilages(5,4k),analysesofaminoand
fattyacidsinlivestockproducts(6k)
11-SRUC 40,000€ In T2.2: Marketing company for the implementation of economic experiment sur-
veys (online questionnaire, choice of experiment, laboratory experiment) conducted
with consumers in case studies.
15-TP 6,739€ InT3.1&2:Rentinglandforfieldtrialsandlaboratoryanalyses
Total 179,139€
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26907 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
Table3.1h: ‘Purchasecosts’items
Participants Cost(€) Justification
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566
DARIC-1
Traveland 99,174€ WP3: Follow up meetings (Guadeloupe –France –3 (9k), trips to Madeira & Greece for
subsistence phenotyping(5k),Participationincongresses(3.5k),localfieldtripswithinFrench Gui-
(TS) ana –28 days (per diem & car rental, 6k). WP4: Field trips (10.1k). WP5: Partner
follow-upmeetings(13.5k).WP6:TripstosupportPartners–10(22.5k).WP8:Travel
by advisory board–6 (9.6k), Trips for the purpose of governance–10 (20k)
Equipment3,200€ WP4:Weatherstation(1.6k),Auger(1.6k).
Other goods, 153,790€ WP3: Open access publications (5k), Laboratory & field consumables (30k), field workers
worksand (10k),transportationof samples (4k).WP4: Soilanalysis(15k),Fieldworkers -45 days
services (15,6k), Probe tubes –80 (4,8k). WP5: Chemical products, laboratory supplies and devices
(OGS) (13k), Consumables for processing devices (10,5k). WP6: Traps for entomofauna & ship-
ment (6k), camera traps & shipment (8k). WP9: Financial audit
(5,7k), Kick-offmeeting(8k),graphicdesigner(10k),Projectmanagementsoftware(8k).
Total256,164€ Remaining(<15%):43,600€
EARNI-2
TS37,000€ WP2:Travelrequiredforcasestudies&topresentresultstostakeholders(8)(18,5k).
WP8:Participationsinprojectmeetings(4)-2pax(18,5k)
OGS34,692€ WP1:Stakeholderengagementactivities(1,5k).WP3:Introductionofplantsinin-vitro
culture (9k). WP4: Pilot LL workshops (3) (7,1k). WP6: Insect traps, phone Apps, barcod-
ingof bacteria&fungi, 3 bacterial gene functions, etc.(7,1k).WP7: Conference
&publicationfees(10k).
Total71,692€ Remaining(<15%):12,175€
TUC-3
TS10,000€ WP8:Participationinannualprojectmeetings(4)-2pax(10k)
OGS43,112€ WP4:PilotLLworkshops(3)(7,1k).WP6:Consumablesforbiodiversityandsoil health
assessments (chemicals, plasticware, molecular biology kits-NGS) (30k),
BioFuncTool®kit(6k).
Total53,112€ Remaining(<15%):7,350€
aMU-5
TS10,000€ WP8:Participationinannualmeetings(3)-2pax
Equipment55,000€ WP3:PerkinElmerSPECTRUMTWONIR(44k),Greenhouseforphenotypingtaro's tol-
erance to extreme climatic conditions (11k)
OGS14,612€ WP4:PilotLLworkshops(3)(7,1k).WP8:Hostingofanannualprojectmeeting(40
pax, catering & local transport)
Total79,612€ Remaining(<15%):8,452€
cAU-6
TS6,800€ WP8:Participationinannualmeetings–2pax(4)
OGS15,000€ WP3: Consumables for collection & in vitro preservation of sweet potato & taro
germplasm (3k), molecular biology consumables for genetic diversity analysis (4k),
consumables for screening viruses on sweet potato and taro germplasm and for the
sanitation of sweet potato (8k)
Total21,800€ Remaining(<15%):3,800€
VAINI-7
TS38,400€ WP7:Participationinconferences(4)-2pax(24k).WP9:Participationinproject meet-
ings (4) -4 pax (14,4k)
Equipment15,451€ WP6:Stereoscopicmicroscopeforidentificationoffunctionalgroupsofarthropods
(5,6k),Digestor(digiblockforsamplepreparation)(9,8k)
OGS89,462€ WP3:Rentingoffarmers’fieldsforSPvarieties(4k),chemicalreagentsandconsumables
(HPLC analysis) (6k), orthophoto map analysis (8k), field assays to monitor seed-borne
diseases (4k).WP4:Rentingoffarmers’fields forexperimentaltrials(4k),Sweetpotato
plants (3k), Monitoring ofpests, diseases and weeds (2k). WP4: Pilot LL workshops (3)
(7,1k). WP6: Chemical reagents and small-scale lab material, DNA extraction kits, se-
quencing(around160Gb),bioinformaticanalysis,BioFuncTool®kit(28,4k),chemical
reagentsandconsumablesforanalyticaldeterminationofnutrientcontaminationinwater
(19k). WP7: Open access publications -2 (4k).
Total143,313€ Remaining(<15%):21,362.44€

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26908 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
TS7,800€ WP8:Participationin3projectmeetings–3/4pax
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566
AERC-8
Equipment3,696€ WP5:Industrialpotatoespeeler/slicer
OGS25,500€ WP5:Enzymatickits,reagents,laboratorydevicesforthecharacterisationofphysical&
phytochemicals (8,5k), Chemical reagents, lab devices and consumables for food pro-
cessing (5k). WP8: Hosting of an annual project meeting (40 pax, catering & local
transport)(12k).
Total36,996 Remaining(<15%):6,500€
CIRLI-9
TS5,000€ WP8:Participationinprojectmeetings(4)–1or2pax
OGS36,110€ WP5:Culinaryingredients(6,3k),Headbaker&pastrychefservices(11k),Maître
d'hôtelservice&incentivesfortestingconsumers(10,6k),Graphist(7k),Photographer
(4,5k) for culinary booklet.
Total41,110€ Remaining(<15%):6,000€
AICI-01
TS8,600€ WP7:Participationininternationalconferences–2(4,8k).WP8:Participationinannual
meetings (4) -2 pax (3,8k)
OGS47,180€ WP3: Collection and shipment of samples (13,1k). WP5:Local irrigation system (4k),
Chemical reagents for analysis of feed nutritive value (2,5k), Chemical reagents and mis-
cellaneous material for experimental microsilos/dehydrated products (2k), Experimental
farm silos (1k), Goats feeding (6,5), Biochemical blood reagents (2k), Materials required
for dairy laboratory & sensory analysis of cheese (1,2k), Hens and broilers(1k),Poultry
feeding(3,8k),Vaccinations,treatments(0,8k),Materialsforegg
andmeatanalyses(2,5k).WP7:Openaccesspublication,conferencesregistrationfees,
brochures (5,8k)
Total55,780€ Remaining(<15%):8,800€
CURS-11
TS20,000€ WP2:Tripsfordiagnosis–1pax,5days(5k),Traveltocasestudylocations(2)-2pax, 3
days (9k). WP8: Participation in annual meetings (4) -2pax (6k).
Total20,000€ Remaining(<15%):3,000€
LLoNE-31
TS28,500€ WP7: 5 capacity-building trips –2 pax (10k), 6 trips for dissemination & communica-
tionactivities–1or2pax(10,5k).WP8:Participationinannualmeetings
(4)-2pax(8k)
OGS24,000€ WP7&8:Roomrental,catering,printing,videoproduction,translationsfor dissemina-
tion & communication activities and final project meeting (24k)
Total52,500€
PT-51
Equipment12,862€ WP3:Cultureandconservationroom,coldroom,autoclave,reverseosmosis, green-
house equipment
OGS32,711€ WP3: Energy consumption (electricity, gas) and consumables for maintenance and
multiplicationofin-vivogenetics(sowing,pottransfer,cuttings,etc.) (24,4k),laboratory
consumables for multiplication and maintenance in vitro (disinfection, culture media,
trays, test tubes, etc.) (8,3k)
Total45,573€ Remaining(<15%):7,106€
AUA-61
TS20,400€ WP3:Tripstocollectmaterial/phenotyping(5)(8,4k).WP8:Participationsinannual pro-
ject meetings (4) -2pax (12k)
OGS25,082€ WP5:SPcultivation,harvesting,evaluationforsheepfeed(15,4k),Consumablesfor anal-
yses of animal products (9,7k)
Total45,482€ Remaining(<15%):6,800€
HKNP-71
TS 6,000€ WP4:TravelfromFrenchGuianatotheRepublicofCongoforexchangelearning–2
pax
OGS43,112€ WP3:Landpreparationforplanting,collection,andmaintenance(15k).WP4:Field
consumablesforexperimentaltrials(15k),PilotLLworkshops(3)(7,1k).WP6: Biofunc-
tool® kit (6k).
Total49,112€ Remaining(<15%):4,000€
TS23,500€ WP4: Consolidating methodologies and sharing experience in French Guiana, 2 pax, 14
days,France2pax,7days(15k).WP8:Participationinannualprojectmeetings(4)-1

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26909 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
pax(8,5k).
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566
GNMU-81
Equipment 7,800€ WP4:Spectrophotometer(MicroNIR)
OGS 40,112€ WP4:Fieldworkers(27k),PilotLLworkshops(3)(7,1k).WP6:Biofunctool®kit(6k).
Total 71,412€ Remaining(<15%):11,300€
Table3.1i: ‘Othercostscategories’items
4-UL Cost (€) Justification
Internally 7,000€ Highthroughputsequencing(HTS)ofnucleicacidextractedfromthesampled
invoicedgoods and plants (WP3)
services
Each partner will provide adequate resources to fulfil their roles in the project as shown in Table 3.1f.The total budget is 5
251 K€ and the requested grant is 4999 763€. CIRAD, INRAE, ICIA are providing 251k€ as own resources contribution.
Thedistributionofthe budget and ofthe grant is well balanced among the differenttypes of Partnerswith49%forResearch
institutes,32%forUniversities,7%forSME,4%forFarmersorganisationsand8% fortheNGO.Thetypesofcostsarealso
welldistributedwith54%ofdirectpersonnelcosts,24%forpurchases,and 19% for indirect costs.
#§QUA-LIT-QL§# #§WRK-PLA-WP§#
3.2 Capacityofparticipantsandconsortiumasawhole#@CON-SOR-CS@# #@PRJ-MGT-PM@#
Consortiumdescription
The consortium encompasses 18 partners from nine European countries, five outermost regions and one African country.It
hasallthenecessaryskillsandcompetencestosuccessfullycarryouttheactivitiesdefinedbytheproject andtomeet the
call requirement.ROTATESembracesamultidisciplinaryandmulti-actor approach.Thus,itbrings together scientists rep-
resenting different disciplines and stakeholders from all levels of the value chain (Farmers, Processors,Marketingpersonnel,
Consumers).TheconsortiumcomprisesfiveResearchInstitutesincludingonethat isadigitalinnovationhub(ITC),six
Universities,twoFarmers’associations,twoSMEs(oneseedcompanyThomas Plants,andonefoodandhospitabilityInsti-
tute(ILRICinstitute,formerPaul-BocuseInstitute)andoneNGO(ENoLL –living lab network).
Consortiumdisciplinaryandinter-disciplinaryknowledge
Theconsortiumcoversdifferentfieldsanddisciplinesandtogetherrepresentstheentirevaluechain.
Consortiumpartners’maincontributiontotheproject
CIRAD, the ROTATESprojectcoordinator(WP8leader),isapublicindustrial and commercialenterprisefocused on
developmentfromlocaltoglobalscales.CIRADisaffiliatedwiththeUniversityofMontpellier,aShanghaiWorld University
top-ranking institution in Ecology. With over 100 years of experience in Root and Tuber crops across Africa, the Pacific
region,Latin America,andEuropeanoutermost regions, CIRADwill leverage its expertisein

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26910 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
globalagrobiodiversity,agroecology,anditsdeepunderstandingofEUbiodiversitypolicies(ithasbeeninvolvedin more
than100Europeanprojects).CIRADwillleadWP4,therebyensuringthesustainabilityoftheintroductionof MRT in the
European agrosystems. It will contribute its expertise on entomology and ecology (WP6 task leader), on RT crop biodi-
versity and breeding (WP3 task leader, Yam Hub) and on food quality (contributes to WP5).
INRAE, a national research institute for sustainable agriculture, food, and the environment, has over 50 years of expertise
inRootandTuberCropsinGuadeloupe.Itmanages430in-vitroyamaccessions,including80inthefield. INRAE leads
WP2 on experimental economics and social sciences, contributes to WP3 on yam viruses and sanitation, and leads Task
5.1on physico-chemical properties of Tropical RT. It hosts the MetaboScope platform,has experience in agroforestry, and
will provide facilities for on-site field assays (pLL2-France).
INIAV, the State Laboratory of the Ministry of Agriculture and Fisheries, supports sustainable agricultural development
through scientific and policy research. Itmanages plant and animalgermplasm databases and national reference collections.
In the ROTATES project, INIAV will contribute its expertise on sweet potato viruses and sanitation,onsettingupaSweet
PotatoHub(Task3.4),leadsTask4.3onexperimentalagroecologyforbiological control, and contributes to WP6 on
ecosystem services, particularly biodiversity (pLL3-Portugal).
CREA,Italy'sleadingagri-foodresearchinstitutebelongstotheMinistryofAgriculture,focusesonagro-industrialpro-
cessesandsustainableagri-foodsupplychains.CREAspecialisesinenhancingthequalityofagri-foodproducts, particularly
pastaandbakerygoodsmadefromwheat,minorcereals,andlegumes.Withover40yearsofexperience, CREA will use its
advanced labs for biochemical and technological analysis WP5 leader.
ICIA, the leading agricultural research centre in the Canary Islands, focuses on subtropical and arid-adapted crops. The
AnimalProductionUnit,withover40yearsofexperienceimprovingCanarianlivestock,particularlygoatsand poultry,will
assessthepotentialofusingMRTcropresiduesforhigh-nutritionalanimalfeed.ICIAwillalsoevaluate the quality of derived
livestock products such as milk, cheese, meat, and eggs, leads Task 5.3
UAcplaysakeyroleinresearchandinnovationinagricultureandagro-industry,particularlyinareasprioritizedby RIS3
Azores 2022-2027. Known for its strong R&D capacity, UAc focuses on agriculture, biotechnology, genetic characterisa-
tion, and animal nutrition. In the ROTATES project, UAc will contribute expertise in feed processing (contributes to Task
5.3, case study in WP2) and virus sanitation (contributes to Task 3.4), with a focus on traditional crops like sweet potato
and taro.
AUA,Greece'slargestagriculturaluniversity,specialisesinagriculturalandenvironmentalsciences.TheLaboratory of Nu-
tritional Physiology and Feeding excels in animal nutrition and in evaluating alternative feed resources. In ROTATES,
AUAwillcontributetoidentifyingandcharacterisinglocalsweetpotatospecies(contributestoWP3), and determining
their nutritional and antinutritional value in sheep feed (Case study WP2 &5).
CUT, Cyprus' only academic institution, was founded in 2004. The Laboratory of Agricultural Microbiology and Biotech-
nology at CUT has an experienced research team focussed on microbiology from farm to fork, supporting the One Health
concept—healthy soils, plants, animals, and foods. In ROTATES, CUT leads WP6 on microbial ecology and biotechnology,
will use remotesensingfor agriculture(Task 6.4),andwill conduct field trials for both research and demonstration (con-
tributes to WP4, pLL1-Cyprus).
TheULplantpathologylaboratoryhasmorethan30yearsofexperienceinthestudyofplantpathogensonclonally propa-
gated crops, including potato, cassava, banana. As WP3 task leader, the laboratory will mobilize and share with members
ofthe consortium its cutting-edge expertise gathered in previous EU and international projects for pathogen detection and
for the development of healthy seed systems. The laboratory is equipped with all necessary materials and has access to the
university sequencing platform.
UMafocusesonagro-diversity,geneticresources,andfoodtechnology,andparticipatesinnationalandinternational re-
searchprojects.ItbelongstotheFAORegionalNetworkofGermplasmBanksandcontributestotheEMPHASIS European
Infrastructure and Portuguese Plant Phenotyping platform, UMa-ISOPlexis supports genetic resources strategies and local
varieties. In theROTATES project, itleads WP3, it will implementa TaroHub,contributeto WP4 & WP6 through the
development of management practices that promote water use efficiency, and provide expertise in food processing (con-
tributes to task 5.2) and through the pLL5-Madeira (WP1, 4,6).
SRUCisaknowledge-basedorganisationthatsupportsland-basedindustriesandruralcommunities.Recognisedfor its im-
pactful veterinary and agricultural research, SRUC collaborates with the University of Edinburgh, ranked top in the domain
in the UK. SRUC focuses on policy-led research, particularly in social science applied to the ruraleconomy, environment,
and society. In ROTATES, SRUC will be responsible for the activities onthe development of MRT value chains (WP2
leader).
PNKH, a non-profit association founded in 2014, works on the transmission and promotion of traditional Amerindian
knowledgeandsupportsfamilyagricultureinFrenchGuiana.InROTATES,PNKHwillimplementaCassava-HUB and
willbeinvolvedinthedevelopmentofagroecologicalmanagementpractices(contributestoWP3,WP4,WP6), pLL4-
French Guiana.
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26911 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
ACOESTE, a non-profit agricultural association founded in 2015, supports and trains farm-
ers across Madeira. It organises agricultural events and provides public counselling services.
In ROTATES, ACOESTE will conduct surveys (contributes to WP3, WP4, WP6), main-
tain a collection of elite MRT cultivars and establish local pilot living labs with intercropping
systems from associated farmers (contributes to WP1, WP4 & 6).
The TP Group is a leading French producer of vegetable and fruit planting material for pro-
fessional market gardeners.Operatingacrosstwoagroclimaticareas:HumidAtlantic(Brit-
tany)anddryMediterranean(Provence),it managesaround40hectaresofproductionfacili-
ties,includinggreenhouses,agraftingroom,andamolecularbiology lab.TheTPGrouphas
developedabreedingprogrammefocusedonsweetpotato,aimingtoofferfarmersproductive
varieties suited to a variety of European climates. In ROTATES, TP Group contributes to
WP3 & 6.
ILRIC conducts research on food and hospitality, focusing on pleasure and health. It offers
a doctoral programme, collaborates with universities, and develops industry knowledge
through researcher-expert cooperation. The centre emphasizes transferring scientific
knowledge to the food and food service industries for public well-being. In the ROTATES
project, ILRIC will lead Task 5.5, contributingexpertise inculinarydevelopment, product
evaluationby experts, and consumer testing.
ITC, a non-profit BusinessSupport Organisation in North-Eastern Slovenia, supports cross-
sectoral innovation and ICT in rural sectors. ITC focuses on transforming SMEs, food system
actors, and farmers into "Smart" entities, fostering a resilient and sustainable rural innovation
ecosystem. It manages the Green Point Living Lab and the European Digital Innovation Hub
- DIH AGRIFOOD, and provides support for the Multi-Actor Approach (MAA). ITC has
developed an MAA implementation methodology for Living Labs and innovation ecosys-
tems,andwilllead WP1 in the ROTATES project.
ENoLL, the European Network of Living Labs, is an international association of certified
Living Labs specialising in user-driven and open innovation ecosystems. With expertise in
creating and certifying Living Labs, ENoLL facilitates knowledge exchange and partnerships
among its 550+ members worldwide. ENoLL will lead WP7 on capacitybuilding and con-
tribute to WP1 on the methodological framework.
UMNGinRepublicoftheCongo,throughitsagronomyschoolhasexpertiseinagronomic
practicesandmanagement with a strong tradition of stakeholder involvement (particularly
that of farmers). UMNG has researchers who will provide technical knowledge on growing
cassava and on agricultural practices in the Congo. The country has a favourableenvironment
foragronomicdiagnosisandfieldexperimentation(pLL6-Congo,WP4taskleader).Asin
French Guiana, cassava isthe main root andtuber crop in the Republic of Congo. Both re-
gions arefacingproblems ofdeforestation,whicharethreateningtheforestsoftheAmazon
and the Congo. The research activities to be carried out in the Republic of the Congo and
FrenchGuiana,theexchangeof knowledgeandexperience,andthereciprocal pilot LLs vis-
its will benefit both regions.
 Industrial/commercial involvement in the project to ensure exploitation of the
results
ROTATES aims to have an impact beyond the timeline of the project. The activities con-
cerning the value chain are designed to account for the different actors and the different
products to be obtained from MRT, including raw materials processed into food (pasta, ice-
cream and bread) and by-products from feed processing. CREA already works in close col-
laboration with large-scale pasta-sector companies (e.g. Barilla) as well as small companies
(Fornovecchino,VerdiTerre,Eocene,Pirro).ICIAworksinclosecollaborationwithindus-
trial feed companies such as Graneros de Tenerife, Compañía Canaria de Piensos S.A
(CAPISA) and Cereales Archipiélago. ILRIC collaborates with company restaurants, with
industryand with distributors.This also appliestothe partners working onfood(UMaand
CIRAD)andthoseworkingonfeedprocessing(UAcandCUT).Thepartnersandtheirasso-
ciated industrial partners will be involved in the economic, social, and cultural studies to
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566

Boletín Oficial de Canarias núm. 144 26912 Lunes 20 de julio de 2026
ensure the uptake of MRT. ROTATES will implement a gender sensitive, multi-actor ap-
proach ensuring, co-creation, co-design, co- implementation and co-exploitation of RO-
TATES outcomes. The involvement of farmers through the pilot LL will ensure the sustain-
able use of MRT beyond the project lifespan while taking the importance of income for
farmers into account (provisioning services and avenues for value chain).
#§CON-SOR-CS§# #§PRJ-MGT-PM§#
https://sede.gobiernodecanarias.org/boc boc-a-2026-144-2566